Google 



This is a digital copy of a book that was preserved for generations on library shelves before it was carefully scanned by Google as part of a project 

to make the world's books discoverable online. 

It has survived long enough for the copyright to expire and the book to enter the public domain. A public domain book is one that was never subject 

to copyright or whose legal copyright term has expired. Whether a book is in the public domain may vary country to country. Public domain books 

are our gateways to the past, representing a wealth of history, culture and knowledge that's often difficult to discover. 

Marks, notations and other maiginalia present in the original volume will appear in this file - a reminder of this book's long journey from the 

publisher to a library and finally to you. 

Usage guidelines 

Google is proud to partner with libraries to digitize public domain materials and make them widely accessible. Public domain books belong to the 
public and we are merely their custodians. Nevertheless, this work is expensive, so in order to keep providing tliis resource, we liave taken steps to 
prevent abuse by commercial parties, including placing technical restrictions on automated querying. 
We also ask that you: 

+ Make non-commercial use of the files We designed Google Book Search for use by individuals, and we request that you use these files for 
personal, non-commercial purposes. 

+ Refrain fivm automated querying Do not send automated queries of any sort to Google's system: If you are conducting research on machine 
translation, optical character recognition or other areas where access to a large amount of text is helpful, please contact us. We encourage the 
use of public domain materials for these purposes and may be able to help. 

+ Maintain attributionTht GoogXt "watermark" you see on each file is essential for in forming people about this project and helping them find 
additional materials through Google Book Search. Please do not remove it. 

+ Keep it legal Whatever your use, remember that you are responsible for ensuring that what you are doing is legal. Do not assume that just 
because we believe a book is in the public domain for users in the United States, that the work is also in the public domain for users in other 
countries. Whether a book is still in copyright varies from country to country, and we can't offer guidance on whether any specific use of 
any specific book is allowed. Please do not assume that a book's appearance in Google Book Search means it can be used in any manner 
anywhere in the world. Copyright infringement liabili^ can be quite severe. 

About Google Book Search 

Google's mission is to organize the world's information and to make it universally accessible and useful. Google Book Search helps readers 
discover the world's books while helping authors and publishers reach new audiences. You can search through the full text of this book on the web 

at |http: //books .google .com/I 





rn^. 



■<"■■. , /■ < ■ 



/ 



Cfie Otat^oUc Setter. 



1^ For Prospectus indicating the character and purpose of the Catholic 
Series, and for list of Books already published, see Catalogue at the end 
of this Work. 



THE WAY 



THE BLESSED LIFE; 



THE DOCTSraE OF RELIGION. 



JOHANN GOTTLIEB FICHTE. 



Stanfllaltfe from t^r ffittman. 



WILLIAM SMITH. 



" TiM Utftt lUnMh In DtAiuaa. nod tbe DarknMa comprelundNh It aM.' 




. The following work is the completion of that series 
of Fiohte's popular-philosophical writings, the previous por- 
tions of which are already before the English Public under 
the titles of " The Vocation of the Scholar/'—" The Nature 
of the Scholar,"—" The Vocation of Man,"— and " The 
Characteristics of the Present Age;" and it is directly con- 
nected with the last-mentioned work as being the continua- 
tion, in the immediately succeeding year, of the lectures of 
1805, of which that other is composed. The point of view 
taken in most of these previous writings is likewise that of 
the present; but in the former the design of the Author 
was limited to a surrey of particular phases of human 
development, either in the Individual or the Bace, — al- 
though indeed even this cannot be accomplished without a 
true knowledge and recognition of what is Permanent and 
Universal in Man, — while in the present he contemplates 
and describes the Essential Nature of all Being, and the 
relations which must eternally subsist between the Human 
and the Divine. The work therefore presents the highest 
aspect of the Fichtean Philosophy, in so far as that can be 
exhibited in a popular form ; and it thus also furnishes the 
most conclusive refutation of those imperfect and erroneous 
conceptions of this doctrine which have arisen from an 
incomplete study of the writings of the philosopher, and 

A 



VI 



which prevail, even among professed historians of Philo- 
sophy, down to the present day. 

The relation between Philosophy, properly so called, and 
Religion, has not as yet attracted that attention in this 
country which is due to its vast importance. This, however, 
is not to be wondered at ; for, in the absence of anything 
worthy of the name of a philosophical school or a philo- 
sophical training among us, it was next to impossible that 
the philosophical spirit should attain suffioi^it maturity to 
to apply itself to the elucidation of its highest theme. 
In a valuable and eloquent work lately published under 
the title of " The Philosophy of Religion," Mr. Morell has 
made a first step towards supplying this deficiency in our 
literature, although, as he himself admits, he is very far 
from having exhausted this great subject. Indeed the 
combination of the Scotch philosophy of Reid and his fol- 
lowers with the Eclecticism of Cousin and Jouflfroy which 
has been adopted by this able and popular writer, while it 
naturally produces an attractive clearness and brilliancy of 
exposition, has not as yet given birth to any of the pro- 
founder efforts of intelligence; — ^nor was this to be antioi* 
pated. Embracing the leading features of two systems, — 
the one of psychological analysis and methodology, and 
the other of historical generalization, — both of which have 
confessedly brought about many important and instructive 
results in their respective fields of inquiry, while neither 
has far transcended its own department, nor exhibited 
much depth or originality of speculation,— it was not 
likely that this their combination should evolve that intense 
creative element of Thought which stands, as it were, face 
to face with the great mystery of Being, and proclaims 



Vll 

to man the oracles of the Highest Truth. The present 
work, although laying no claim to the rank of a scientific 
treatise, but being on the oontrary expresslj addressed 
to the popular mind, contains the deliberate thoughts of 
one of the most powerful and gifted men that haye ever 
appeared in the world, on this highest theme of human 
interest and aspiration. 

It is in no spirit of affectation or of arrogance that this 
work is entitled " The Way towards the Blessed Life ;" for 
in setting forth, with all his accustomed power and lumin-* 
ousness^ the Truth at which he had arrived on the highest 
theme to which Humanity can aspire, the Author neces- 
sarily indicates, at the same time, the springs of the highest 
Blessedness which Humanity can attain. That these lie 
wholly within ourselves, — that in Thought alone we have 
the pure foimtain whence issue the kindred streams of 
Knowledge and Life, on whose undiverging current the 
Intellectual and the Moral nature of man are borne onward 
through Eternity, — that this only True Thought has its 
beginning, continuing, and ending in God, — and that thus 
there is neither True Knowledge, True Life, nor True 
Blessedness anywhere but in God and from God: — this 
Faith in which the greatest of men — ^yea, even the Greatest 
of all — have lived, died, and been blessed, is here set forth, 
not as a mere dead historical tradition of the Past, but as 
the living foimtain of spiritual life in the Present, and the 
only true source from which a Future can arise. That 
the view here taken of man, and of the highest form of 
his Life — the Religious — that which alone contains True 
Blessedness — should seem as strange and unintelligible to 
the majority of our Age as it did in the Author's own day. 



VUl 

— may well happen; nor will it appear a matter of surprise 
to any one who beholds and considers the amazing and daily 
increasing amoimt of cant and formalism in Religion which 
is the deep disgrace of our times. It may well be that such 
an Age should be blind to its own true wants; but it is 
even on that accoimt the more incumbent on those who can 
probe its errors to the bottom, and see their essential falsity, 
and who thus possess an assured conviction that, like all 
Error, they are fleeting and perishable, and who, • with this 
conviction, likewise maintain an imshaken Faith in the 
power and eternity of Truth, — on such it is on that account 
the more incumbent to do all that in them lies in order 
that the mask may be torn from such Error, and that the 
Truth of God may have free course and be glorified. May 
this little volume perform its part in this great work of 
preparing the way of the Lord over the strongholds of 
fanaticism and sin, and making straight, even in the desert 
of Pharisaism and worldliness, a highway for our God ! 

W. SMITH. 

Edisbubgh, AprU 1849. 



PREFACE. 



These Lectures^ coxyoined with those which have already 
appeared under the titles of " The Characteristics of the 
present Age," and " The Nature of the Scholar," in the 
latter of which the tone of thought that governs the present 
course is applied to a particular subject, form a complete 
scheme of popular instruction, of which the present work 
exhibits the highest and clearest summit; and, taken to- 
gether, they are the result of a process of self-culture, un- 
ceasingly pursued during the last six or seven years of my 
life, with greater leisure and in riper maturity, by means of 
that Philosophy in which I have been a partaker for thirteen 
years, and which, although, I hope, it has changed many 
things in me,* has nevertheless itself suffered no change 
whatever during that period. The existence of such writings, 
as well as the form, both external and internal, which the 
doctrine has assumed in them, was the result of outward 
causes ; and thus their execution was never dependent on 
my own will, but on the time within which it was necessary 
that they should be ready for delivery. Their publication 
has arisen out of the persuasions of some friends among my 
hearers who thought not imfavourably of them ; and to re- 
write them for publication would have been, according to 
my mode of working, the surest way never to complete them 

A 2 



X PREFACE. 

at alL Should the result not accord with their expectations, 
these friends must answer for it themselves. For myself, 
the view of 'the infinite perplexities which, in this Age, at- 
tend every undertaking in which aught of vigour or manly 
energy is apparent^ and of the inevitable reward which 
awaits him who would pursue the right path, has so set 
me at variance with the general public, that I no longer 
take counsel with myself in matters of this sort, and no 
longer know how to communicate with this pubUc, nor 
indeed whether it be worth while to communicate with 
it at all through the press. 

Berlin, April 1806. 



CONTENTS. 



Leotusb I page 1 

Life is Love ; and hence Life and Blessedness are, in them- 
selves, one and the same. Distinction of the True Life 
from mere Apparent Life. Life and Being are also one 
and the same. The True Being is for ever at one with 
itself, and unchangeable ; the Apparent is, on the contrary, 
changeable and transitory. The True Life loves this One 
Being, or Gk)d ; the Apparent loves the Transitory, or the 
World. This Apparent Life is itself produced and main- 
tained in Existence only by aspiration towards the Eternal; 
this aspiration can never be satisfied in the mere Apparent 
Life, and hence this Life is Unblessed ; the Love of the 
True Life is, on the contrary, continually satisfied, and 
hence this Life is Blessed. The element of the True Life 
is Thought. 

Leotube IL ....... 19 

The present subject is, at bottom. Metaphysics, and particu- 
larly Ontology ; and these are here to be set forth in a po- 
pular way. Eefiitation of the objections of the impossibility 
and unadvisableness of such an exposition, — by the neces- 
sity which there is for attempting it, — by the investigation 
of the peculiar nature of the Popular discourse in opposition 
to the Scientific, — and by the practical proof that since the 
introduction of Christianity this undertaking has at all 
times been actually accomplished. Great hindrances which 
exist in our own day to the communication of such Enow- 
ledge, — partly because its strictly determinate /orm is op- 



'**. 



xii THE DOCTRINE OF RELIGION. 

posed to that propensity towards arbitrary opinion and 
indecision of character which calls itself Scepticism; — 
partly because its Bvbstance seems strange and monstrously 
paradoxical; — and finally, because unprejudiced persons 
are led astray by the objections urged by the fanatics of 
perversity. Oenetic exposition of this species of ^Einaticism. 
The accusation of Mysticism which may be expected from 
these fematics against our doctrine noticed. The true ob- 
ject of this and similar accusations. 

Lboturb hi. page 39 

Solution of the problem how — since Life must be an organic 
whole — a part of this necessary Life may yet be wanting 
in Actual Life, as is the case, according to our preyious 
teaching, in the Apparent Life, — by the remark that the 
Spiritual Life only developes itself gradually in Beality, 
illustrated by the striking example that the great masses 
of mankind refer the thought of outward oljects to sen- 
sible perception of such objects, and know no better than 
that all our Knowledge is founded on experience. What, 
in opposition to this thou^t of outward objects, which 
is after all not founded on perception, is true and proper 
Thought; and how this is distinguished from mere Opi- 
nion, with which in reference to its region of activity it 
coincides in Form. 

Actual realization of this Thought in the highest de- 
ments of Knowledge, from which we have these results : — 
Being (8eyn) has neither arisen, nor has anything in it 
arisen, but it is absolutely One and Simple in its Essence ; 
from it we have to distinguish the Ex-istence (Daseyn) of 
Being, which is necessarily Consciousness of Being; and this 
Consciousness, which is also necessarily Self-consciousness, 
cannot, either in its Essential Ex-istence (Daseyn), or in 
the particular actual determinations of that Ex-istence, 
be genetically derived from Being {Seyn) itself; although 
it may be in general understood that this its actual deter- 
minate Ex-istenoe is, in its Essential Nature, one with the 
Essential Nature of Being. 

Leoturb IV. 59 

Expof^tion of what is ess^itlal to the Blessed Life, and what is 
only conditionally necessary. The answer to the question :— 



CONTENTS. xiii 

" How, since Being (Seyn) ex-iats as it is in itself, namely, 
as One, yet in this its Ex-istence (Daseyn), or Conscious- 
ness, Multiplicity may nevertheless find a place]" — only 
conditionally necessary. Answer to the question. The"flw," 
or characterization by means of opposition, which arises 
from the distinction that takes place in Ex-istence, is an 
absolute opposition, and the principle of all other division. 
This " as," or act of characterization, presupposes a fixed 
and abiding Being that is characterized, whereby that 
which in itself is the inward Divine Life, is changed into a 
permanent and unmeving "World. This World is charac- 
terized or formed by the feet of this " as," — which f&ct is 
absolutely free and independent, — without any end or 
limit to the process. 

Lbotxjbb V. . . . . . . . pag^ 77 

Principle of a new division in Knowledge, not immediately 
afiecting the Object, but only the Reflexion of the Object, 
and hence only giving different views of the One abiding 
World; which latter division is nevertheless intimately 
connected with the first, and interpenetrated by it. This 
division, and hence the diverse views of the World which 
result from it, are five-fold. The first and lowest, being that 
of the prevalent Philosophy, in which reality is attributed 
to the Sensual World, or Nature. The second, in which 
reality is placed in a Law of Order in the Existing World, 
addressed to Freedom; — the Standing-point of Objective 
Legality, or of the Categorical Imperative. The third, 
which places the same reality in a new Creative Law 
addressed to Freedom within the Existing World; — the 
standing-point of the Higher Morality. The fourth, which 
places reality in God alone and in his Ex-istence ; — the 
standing-point of Religion. The fifth, which clearly dis- 
cerns the Manifold in its outgoings from the One Reality; 
— ^the standing-point of Science. The True Religious Life, 
however, is not possible as a mere view, but only exists in 
union with an Actual Divine Life, and without this union 
the mere view is empty Fanaticism. 

Lecture VI. ^ . 95 

Proof of our previous assertion, that this Doctrine is like- 
wise the Doctrine of pure Christianity, as contained in the 



XIV THE DOCTRINE OF RELIGION. 

writings of ^the Apostle John. Beasons why we especially 
appeal to this Evangelist. Our hermeneutical principle. 
In John we have to disting^h that which iB trae, abso- 
lutely and in itself, from that which is true only from his 
temporary point of view. The first is contained in the 
Introduction to the Gospel, up to Terse 5. Estimate of this 
Introduction, not as the unauthoritative opinion of the 
Evangelist^ but as the immediate doctrine of Jesus. Ex- 
position of itw The view that possesses a mere temporary 
validity is the, not metaphysical, but merely historical pro- 
position, that the Divine Ex-istence, in its original purity, 
and without any individual limitation, has manifested itself 
in Jesus of NaEsreth. Explanation of the difference of these 
two views, and of their union, likewise and expressly accord- 
ing to the Christian Doctrine. Estimate of this historical 
dogma. Comprehension of the substance of the whole 
(Gospel from this point of view, in an answer to the ques- 
tions : — What does Jesus teach respecting himself, and his 
relation to God) — and what respecting his followers, and 
their relation to him 1 

Appendix to Leoturb VI page 116 

Farther explanation of the distinction drawn in the preceding 
lecture between the Historical and Metaphysical, with re- 
ference to the fundamental dogma of Christianity. 

LbotitbbVII 125 

More thorough delineation of the mere Apparent Life from 
its fundamental principle. A complete exposition of all 
the possible modes of man's Enjoyment of himself and of 
the World is requisite for the demonstration of the Blessed- 
ness of the Religious Life. Of these there are five, — the 
five modes of viewing the World, already enumerated, being 
also BO many modes of its Ei\joyment ;— of which, in con- 
sequence of the exclusion of the Scientific standing-point, 
fbur only come under consideration here. Enjoyment in any 
form, as the satisfiuition of Love, is founded on Love; — 
Love is the Affection of Being. Sensual Enjoyment, and 
the Affections which are produced by means of fancy, in the 
first standing-point. The Affection of Reality in the second 
standing-point, — viz. Law, is a commandment, from which 
proceeds a judgment, in itself disinterested, which, how- 



CONTENTS. XV 

ever, being assooiated with the interest of man in his own 
personality, is changed into the negation of Self-contempt 
This mode of thought destroys all Love in man, but even 
on that account it exalts him above all want. Stoicism, as 
mere Apathy, in relation to Happiness and Blessedness. 

Leotuke VIII page 144 

More profound exposition of our Doctrine of Being. Eveiy- 
thing that arises from mere Ex-istence, as such, compre- 
hended under the name of Form ; — in Reality, Being is 
absolutely inseparable from Form, and the Ex-istence of the 
latter is itself founded in the inward necessity of the Divine 
Nature. Application of this principle to the first portion 
of Porm,-r-Infinity. Application of it to the second portion 
of Form, — ^the five-fold division previously set forth. This 
gives a free and independent Ego as the organic central- 
point of all Form. Exposition of the nature of Freedom. 
Affection of the Ego for its personal independence, which 
necessarily disappears as soon as the individual standing- 
points of mere possible Freedom are destroyed by perfect 
Freedom; — and thus again the presence or abatnce of this 
Love of Self gives us two completely opposite modes of 
viewing and enjoying the "World. From the first arises, in 
the first place, the impulse towards Sensual Enjoyment, as 
the Love of a Self determined in a particular way by means 
of outward objects ; and, in the second place, the standing- 
point of Legality, the Love of mere formal Freedom after 
the renunciation of the Love of objective self-determination. 
Characterization of the Love from which a Categorical 
Imperative arises. Through the annihilation of that Love 
of Self the Will of the Ego is brought into harmony with 
the Will of God ; and there arises therefrom, in the first 
place, the standing-point, previously described as the third, 
of the Higher Morality. Eelation of this mode of thought 
to outward circumstances, particularly in contrast with the 
superstition of sensual desire. 

Lectube IX. ....... 166 

The New World which the Higher Morality creates within 
the World of Sense is the immediate Life of God himself in 
Time; — it can only be felt in immediate consciousness, 
and can only be characterized in general by the distinctive 
mark that each of its Forms is a source of pleasure solely 



Xvi THE DOCTRINE OF RELIGION. 

on its own account, and not as a means towards any other 
end. Illustrations by the examples of Beauty, of Science, 
&c., and by the phenomena presented by a natural Oenius 
for these. This Life' nevertheless strives after an outward 
result; and so long as the desire for this result is still 
mixed up with the joy arising from the deed itself, even 
the Higher Morality is not exempt from the possibility of 
pain. Separation of these by the standing-point of Religion. 
Foundation of Individuality. Each Individual has his own ^ 
especial portion in the Divine Life. The first fundamen- 
tal Law of Morality and of the Blessed Life : — that each 
should devote himself wholly to his own portion. General 
external characterization of the Moral-Religious Will, in so 
f&t as this comes forth from its inward Life into outward 
Manifestation. 

Lectube X. ...... pcig^ 185 

Comprehensive view of the whole subject from its deepest 
standing-point. Being, which is projected forth from itself 
in the form of the independent Ego as the necessary Form 
of Reflexion, is, beyond all Reflexion, united with Form by 
Love alone. This Love is the creator of the abstract con- 
ception of God ; — is the source of all certainty ; — is that 
which, in Life, embraces the Absolute, immediately and 
without modification, by means of Conception ; — is that by 
which Reflexion, the Form of which contains only the 
possibility of Infinity, is stretched out into an Actual 
Infinity ; — finally, is the source of Science. In living and 
actual Reflexion this Love manifests itself immediately in 
the phenomena of Moral Action. 

Characterization of the Philanthropy of the Moral-Religious 
Man. Delineation of his Blessedness. 

LeotubeXI 202 

General application of the subject. Hindrances to a thorough 
communication between the speaker and hearer: — the want 
of thorough openness of mind; — so-called Scepticism; — the 
surrounding influences of the Age. Deeper characteriza- 
tion of these influences by the principle of the absolute 
mutual recognition of all men as miserable sinners (Mo- 
dem Humanity.) How the good and upright man may 
rise superior to these influences. 



LECTURE I. 



THE TRtJE LIFE AND THE APPARENT LIFE. 



The Lectures which I now commence have been an- 
nounced imder the title of " The Way towards th© 
Blessed Life/' Following the common and customary 
view, which no one can rectify unless he first accom- 
modate himself to it, I could not avoid thus expressing 
myself; although, according to the true view of the 
matter^ the expression " Blessed Life" has in it some-' 
thing superfluous. To wit : — Life is necessarily blessed, 
for it is Blessedness ; the thought of an unblessed life, 
on the other hand, carries with it a contradiction. 
Death alone is unblessed. Thus, had I expressed my* 
self with strict precision, I should have named my 
proposed lectures " The Way towards Life, or the Doc- 
trine of Life" — or, viewing the idea on the other side, 
" The Way towards Blessedness, or the Doctrine of 
Blessedness." That, in the meantime, not nearly all 
that seems to live is blessed, arises from this — that 
what is unblessed does not really and truly live, but, 
in most of its component parts, is sunk in Death and 
JS^othingness. 

Life is itself Blessedness, I said. It cannot be other- 
wise ; for Life is Love, and the whole form and power 

B 



2 LECTURE I. 

of Life consist in Love, and spring from Love. In 
this I have given utterance to one of the most pro- 
fomid axioms of knowledge; which nevertheless, in my 
opinion, may be at once made clear and evident to every 
one, by means of really earnest and sustained attention. 
Love divides an existence which is in itself dead, as it 
were into a two-fold being, holding it up before its own 
contemplation, — and thereby makes it an Ego or Self, 
which beholds and is cognizant of itself; and in this 
personality lies the root of all Life. Love again re- 
unites and intimately binds together this divided per- 
sonality, which, without Love, would regard itself coldly 
and without interest. This latter unity, within a duality 
which is not thereby destroyed but eternally remains 
subsistent, is Life itself; as every one who strictly con- 
siders these ideafi and combines them together must at 
once distinctly perceive. Further, Love is satisfaction 
with itself, joy in itself, enjoyment of itself, — and there- 
fore Blessedness ; and thus it is clear that Life, Love, 
and Blessedness, are absolutely one and the same. 

I said further, that not everything which seems to be 
living does really and truly live. It foUows that, in my 
opinion. Life may be regarded from a double point of 
view, and shall be so regarded by me ; — that is, partly 
as regards Truth, and partly as regards Appearance. 
Now it is clear, before all things, that this latter merely 
Apparent Life could never even have become apparent, 
but must have remained wholly and entirely non- 
eidstent, had it not been, in some way or other, sup- 
ported and maintained by the True Life — and, since 
nothing has a real existence but Life, had not the True 
Life, in some way or other, entered into the Apparent 
Life and been commingled with it. There can be no 



THE TRUE LIFE AND THE APPARENT LIFE. 3 

real Death, and no real Unblessedness ; for, were we 
to admit this, we should thereby attribute to them an 
existence, while it is only the True Being and Life that 
can have existence. Therefore all incomplete existence is 
but an admixture of the dead with the hving. In what 
way this admixture generally takes place, and what, 
even in the lowest grades of Ufe, is the indestructible 
representative of the True Life, we shall betimes de- 
clare. We have further to remark, that Love is at all 
times the seat and central-point even of this merely Ap^ 
parent Life. Understand me thus : — the Apparent can 
shape itself into manifold, infinitely varied forms ; as we 
shall soon perceive more clearly. These various forms 
of the Apparent Life have all a common hfe, if we use 
the language of Appearance; or, they all appear to have 
a common life, if we use the language of Truth. But 
if again the question should arise : — By what is this com- 
mon Ufe distinguished in its various forms ; and what 
is it that gives to each individual the pecuUar character 
of his particular life ? — I answer : — It is the love of this 
particular and individual life. Show me what thou 
truly lovest, what thou seekest and strivest for with 
thy whole heart when thou hopest to attain to true en- 
joyment of thyself, — and thou hast thereby shown me 
thy Life. What thou lovest, in that thou Uvest. This 
very Love is thy Life, — the root, the seat, the central- 
point of thy being. All other emotions within thee 
have life only in so far as they are governed by this 
one central emotion. That to many men it may be no 
easy matter to answer such a question, since they do 
not even know what they love, only proves that they 
do not in reality love anything ; and, just on that ac- 
count, do not live because they do not love. 



4 LECTURE I. 

So much, in general, respecting the identity of life, 
Love, and Blessedness. Now for the strict discriminar 
tion of the True Life from the mere Apparent Life. 

Being, — Being, I say, and Life, are, once more, one 
and the same. Life alone can possess independent ex- 
icrtence, of itself and through itself; and, on the other 
hand. Life, so surely as it is Life, carries with it such 
an existence. It is usual for men to conceiye of Being, 
as something fixed, rigid and dead ; philosophers them- 
selves, almost without exception, have so conceived of 
it, even while they declared it to be Absolute. This 
only arises from the thinker himself bringing to the 
contemplation of Being, not a Uving, but a mere dead 
conception. Not in Being, as it is in and for itself, 
is there Death ; but only in the deadly gaze of the dead 
beholder. That in this error is to be found the ori- 
ginal source of all other errors, and that through it the 
World of truth and the whole spiritual universe is for 
ever closed to man, we have proved in another place, — 
at least to those who were capable of accepting the 
proof; here, the mere historical statement of the prin^ 
oiple is sufficient. 

On the other hand, as Being and Life are one and 
the same, so are Death and Nothingness one and the 
same. But there is no real Death and no real Nothing- 
ness, as we have already said. There is, however, an 
Apparent Life, and this is the mixture of life and death, 
of being and nothingness. Hence it follows, that the 
Apparent, so far as regards that in it which makes 
it mere Appearance and which is opposed to the True 
Being and Life, is mere Death and Nothingness. 

Further: — Being is throughout simple, not mani- 
fold ; there are not many beings, but only One Being. 



THE TRUE LIFE AND THE APPARENT LIFE. 6 

This principle, like the former, contains an idea which 
is generally misunderstood, or even wholly imknown, 
but of the evident truth of which any one may convince 
himself, if he will only give his earnest attention to the 
subject for a single moment. We have here neither 
time nor intention to undertake, with our present audi- 
ence, those preparatory and initiative steps, which the 
mass of men require in order to render them capable 
of such earnest reflection. 

We shall here bring forward and employ only the 
results of these premises, and these results will recom- 
mend themselves to our natural sense of truth without 
need of argument. With regard to the profounder 
premises, we must content ourselves with stating them 
clearly and distinctly, and so securing them against all 
misconception. Thus, with reference to the principle 
we have last adduced, our meaning is the following : — 
Being alone is ; nothing else is ; not, in particular, a 
something which is not Being, but which Ues beyond 
all Being ; — an assumption, this latter, which, to every 
one who imderstands our words, must appear a mani- 
fest absurdity, but which, nevertheless, lies, dim and 
unrecognised, at the bottom of the common notion of 
Being. According to this common notion, something 
which, in and through itself, neither is nor can be, 
receives from without a superadded existence, — which 
thus is an existence of nothing ; — and from the union 
of these two absurdities, all truth and reahty arise. 
This common notion is contradicted by the principle 
we have laid down: Being alone is, — i.e, that only 
which is by and through itself — is. We say further : 
This Being is simple, homogeneous, and immutable ; 

B2 



6 LECTURE I. 

there is in it neither beginning nor ending, no variation 
nor change of form, but it is always and for ever the 
same, unalterable, and continuing Being. 

The truth of this proposition may be briefly shown 
thus .-—Whatever is, in and through itself, that indeed 
ii, and is perfect , — once for all existing, without inter^ 
ruption, and without the possibiUty of addition. 

And thus we have opened the way towards an insight 
into the characteristic distinction of the True Life, 
which is one with Being, from the mere Apparent Life, 
which, in so far as it is mere appearauce, is one with 
Ifothingness. Being is simple, imchangeable, ever the 
same; therefore is also the True Life simple, unchanged 
able, ever the same. Appearance is a ceaseless change, 
a continual floating between T)irth and decay; therefore 
is also the mere Apparent Life a ceaseless change, ever 
floating between birth and decay, hurried along through 
never-ending alternations. The central-point of aU Life 
is Love. The True Life loves the One, Unchange- 
able, and Eternal ; the mere Apparent Life attempts to 
Ipve the Transitory and Perishable, — were that capable 
of being loved, or could such love uphold itself in 
being. 

That object of the Love of the True Life is what 
we mean by the name God> or at least ought to mean 
by that name; the object of the Love of the mere 
Apparent Life — the transitory and perishable — is 
that which we recognise as the World, and which 
we so name. The True Life thus Uves in God, and 
loves God ; the mere Apparent Life lives in the World, 
and attempts to love the World. It matters not on 
what particular side it approaches the world and com- 
prehends it; — that which the common view terms 



THE TRUE LIFE AND THE APPARENT LIFE. 7 

moral depravity, sin, crime, and the like, may indeed 
be more hurtful and destructive to human society 
than many other things which this common view 
permits or even considers to be praiseworthy ;-^ but, 
before the eye of Truth, all Life which fixes its love 
on the Temporary and Accidental, and seeks its en-r 
joyment in any other object than the Eternal and 
Unchangeable, for that very reason, and merely on 
account of thus seeking its enjoyment in something 
else, is in like manner vain, miserable, and unblessed. 

The True Life lives in the Unchangeable : it is thus 
susceptible neither of abatement nor of increase, just 
as little as the Unchangeable itself, in which it lives, 
is susceptible of such abatement or increase. In each 
moment of Time it is perfect, -^ihe highest possible 
Life ; and throughout Eternity it necessarily remains 
what it is in each moment of Time. The Apparent 
Life lives only in the Transitory and Perishable, and 
therefore never remains the same in any two sue* 
cessive moments; each succeeding moment consumes 
and obliterates the preceding ; and thus the Apparent 
Life becomes a continous Death, and lives only in dy* 
ing and in Death. 

We have said that the True Life is in itself blessed, 
the Apparent Life necessarily miserable and unblessed. 
The possibility of all pleasure, joy, blessedness, or by 
whatever word we may express the general conscious- 
ness of Well-being, is founded upon love, eflTort, 
impulse. To be imited with the beloved object, and 
molten into its very essence, is Blessedness; to be 
divided from it, cast out from it, while yet we cannot 
cease to turn towards it with longing aspiration, is 
Unblessedness. 



8 LECTURE I. 

The following is the relation of the Apparent, or of 
the Actual and Finite, to the Absolute Being, or to 
the Infinite and Eternal. That which we have already 
mentioned as the element which must support and 
maintain the Apparent, and without which it could not 
attain even the semblance of Existence, and which we 
promised soon to characterize more distinctly, is the 
aspiration towards the Eternal. This impulse to be 
united with the Imperishable and transfused therein, 
is the primitive root of all Finite Existence ; and in no 
branch of this existence can that impulse be wholly 
destroyed, imless that branch were to sink into utter 
nothingness. Beyond this aspiration upon which all 
Finite Existence rests, and by means of it, this exist- 
ence either attains the True Life, or does not attain it. 
Where it does attain it, this secret aspiration becomes 
distinct and intelligible as Love of the Eternal: we learn 
what it is that we desire, love, and need. This want 
may be satisfied constantly and imder every condition : 
the Eternal surrounds us at all times, offers itself in- 
cessantly to our regards ; we have nothing more to do 
than to lay hold of it. But, once attained, it can never 
again be lost. He who lives the True Life has attained 
it, and now possesses it evermore, whole, imdivided, 
in all its fiillness, in every moment of his existence; and 
is therefore blessed in this union with the object of his 
Love, penetrated with a firm, immovable conviction that 
he shall thus enjoy it throughout Eternity, and thereby 
secured against all doubt, anxiety, or fear. Where the 
True Life is not attained, that aspiration is not felt the 
less, but it is not imderstood. Happy, contented, sa- 
tisfied with their condition, aU men would willingly be; 
but wherein they shall find this happiness they know 



THE TRUE LIFE AND THE APPARENT LIFE. . 9 

not ; what it is that they specially love and strive after, 
they do not understand. In that which comes into 
immediate contact with their senses, and offers itself to 
their enjo3anent,— in the World, they think it must 
be found, because to that frame of mind in which they 
now find themselves there is really nothing else existing 
but the World. Ardently they betake themselves to 
this chase after happiness, devoting themselves, with 
their whole powers and aflTections, to the first best 
object that pleases them and promises to satisfy their 
desires. But as soon as such an one returns into him- 
self, and asks, " Am I now happy?" he is loudly an- 
swered from the very depths of his own soul, " no, 
thou art as empty and needful as before." They now 
imagine that they have been mistaken in their choice of 
an object, and throw themselves eagerly into another. 
This satisfies them as little as the first : — ^ there is no 
object under the sun or the moon that vrill satisfy them. 
Would we that any such object should satisfy them ? 
By no means : — that nothing finite and perishable can 
satisfy them, — this it is precisely which is the only 
tie that still connects them vrith the Eternal and pre- 
serves them in existence :— did they find any one earthly 
object that should fill them with perfect satisfaction, 
then were they thereby irretrievably thrust forth from 
the Godhead, and cast out into the eternal death of 
Nothingness. And thus do they long and vex away 
their life ; in every condition in which they find them- 
selves, thinking that if it were but otiierwise with them 
it would be better with them, and then, when it has 
become otherwise, discovering that it is not better ; in 
every position which they occupy for the moment, be- 
lieving that if they had but attained yonder height on 



10 LECTURE I. 

which their eye is gazing, they would be freed from their 
anguish, but finding nevertheless, even on the desired 
height, their ancient sorrow. In riper years, perchance, 
when the fresh enthusiasm and glad hopefulness of 
youth have vanished, they take counsel with themselves, 
review their whole previous life, and attempt to draw 
therefrom some definite conclusion; — attempt, it maybe, 
to convince themselves that no earthly good whatever 
can give them satisfaction : — And what do they now ? 
They determine perhaps to renounce all fidth in happi- 
ness and peace ; blunting or deadening, as far as pos- 
sible, their still inextinguishable aspirations; and then 
they call this insensibiUty the only true wisdom, this 
despair of all salvation the only true salvation, and their 
pretended knowledge that man is not destined to hap- 
piness. but only to this vain striving with nothing and 
for nothing, the true imderstanding. Perchance they 
renounce only their hope of satisfaction in this earthly 
life; but please themselves with a certain promise, 
handed down to them by tradition, of a Blessedness 
beyond the grave. Into what a mournful delusion do 
they now fall ! Full surely, indeed, there Ues a Blessed- 
ness beyond the grave for those who have already en- 
tered upon it here, and in no other form or way than 
that by which they can already enter upon it here, in 
this moment ; but by mere burial man cannot arrive 
at Blessedness — and in the future life, and throughout 
the whole infinite range of all future life, they would 
seek for happiness as vainly as they have already sought 
it here, if they were to seek it in aught else than in 
that which already surrounds them so closely here be- 
low that throughout Eternity it can never be brought 
nearer to them, — in the Infinite. — And thus does the 



THB TRUE LIFE AND THE APPARENT LIFE. 11 

poor child of Eternity, cast forth from his native home, 
and surroimded on all sides by his heavenly inheritance 
which yet his trembling hand fears to grasp, wander 
with fugitive and uncertain step throughout the waste, 
everywhere labouring to establish for himself a dwelUng- 
place, but happily ever reminded, by the speedy down- 
fall of each of his successive habitations, that he can 
find peace nowhere but in his Father's house. 

Thus, my hearers, is the True Life necessarily Bless- 
edness itself; and the Apparent Life necessarily Un- 
blessedness. 

And now consider with me the following: — I say, 
the element, the atmosphere, the substantial form — if 
this latter expression may be better understood — the 
element, the atmosphere, the substantial form of the 
True Life, is Thought. 

In the first place, no one surely will be disposed, 
seriously, and in the proper meaning of the words, to 
ascribe Life and Blessedness to anything which is not 
conscious of itself All Life thus presupposes self- 
consciousness, and it is self-consciousness alone which 
is able to lay hold of Life and make it an object of 
enjoyment. 

Thus then : — The True Life and its Blessedness con- 
sists in a union with the Unchangeable and Eternal : 
but the Eternal can be apprehended only by Thought, 
and is in no other way approachable by us. The One 
and Unchangeable is apprehended as the foundation of 
ourselves and of the world ; and this in a double re- 
spect : — partly as the cause fJpom whence it arises that 
all things have existence, and have not remained in 
mere nothingness; partly that in Him, and in His 
essential nature — which in this way only is conceivable 



12 LECTURE I. 

to US, but in all other ways remains wholly inconceiv- 
able — ^is contained the cause why all things exist as 
they are, and in no other way. And thus the True 
Life and its Blessedness consists in Thought ; that is, 
in a certain definite mode of viewing ourselves and the 
world as proceeding from the inner Divine Nature 
which is concealed from us in itself: — and therefore 
a Doctrine of Blessedness can be nothing else than a 
Doctrine of Knowledge, since there is absolutely no 
other doctrine but a Doctrine of Knowledge. In the 
mind, — in the self-supporting hfe of Thought, — Life 
itself subsists, for beyond the mind there is no true 
Existence. To live truly, means to think truly, and 
to discern the truth. 

Thus it is : — ^let no one be deceived by the invectives 
which, in these later godless and soulless times, are 
poured forth on what is termed speculation. It is a 
striking characteristic of these invectives that they pro- 
ceed from those only who know nothing of speculation ; 
-—no one who does know it has inveighed against it. It 
is oidy to the highest flight of thought that the Godhead 
is revealed, and it is to be apprehended by no other 
sense whatever ; — to desire to render men suspicious of 
this mental elevation, is to wish to cut them off for ever 
from God and from the enjoyment of Blessedness. 

Wherein should Life and the Blessedness of Life 
have their element if they had it not in Thought ? 
Perhaps in certain sensations and feelings, with re- 
ference to which it matters not to us whether they 
minister to the grossest sensual enjoyments or the most 
refined spiritual raptures ? How could a mere feeling, 
which by its very nature is dependent on circumstance, 
secure for itself an eternal and unchangeable dura- 



THE TRUE LIFE AND THE APPARENT LIFE. 13 

tion; and how could we, amid the obscurity which, 
for the same reason, necessarily accompanies mere feel- 
ing, inwardly perceive and enjoy such an unchangeable 
continuance ? No : it is only the hght of pure Know- 
ledge, thoroughly transparent to itself, and in free pos- 
session of all that it contains, which, by means of this 
clearness, can guarantee its unalterable endurance. 

Or, shall the Blessed Life consist in yirtuous action 
and behaviour? What the profane call virtue, — i.e, 
that a man pursue his calling or occupation in a legi- 
timate way, give other men their due, and perhaps 
bestow something on the poor :— this virtue wiU, here- 
after as hitherto, be exacted by law, and prompted by 
natural sympathy. But no one can rise to True Virtue, 
to god-like action, creating the True and the Good in 
this world, who does not lovingly embrace the God- 
head in clear comprehension; while he who does so 
embrace it will thus act without either formal intention 
or positive reward, and cannot act otherwise. 

We do not here, by any means, promulgate a new 
doctrine regarding the spiritual world, but this is the 
old doctrine which has been taught in all ages. Thus, 
for example, Christianity makes Faith the one indis- 
pensable condition of True Life and Blessedness, and 
rejects, as worthless and dead, everything without ex- 
ception that does not spring from this Faith. But 
this Faith is, to Christianity, the same thing which we 
have here named the only true view of ourselves and 
of the world, in the One Unchangeable Divine Being. 
It is only after this Faith, — i, e. this clear and living 
vision of the world, — has disappeared, that men have 
placed the conditions of the Blessed Life in what is 

c 



14 LECTURE I. 

called virtue, and thus sought a noble fruit on a wild 
and uncultivated stem. 

To this Life, the general characteristics of which 
have been set forth in this preUminary sketch, I have 
here promised to point you the way ; — I have pledged 
myself to show you the means by which this Blessed 
Life may be attained and enjoyed. This instruction 
may be comprised in a single remark, this namely: — It 
is not required of man that he should create the Eter- 
nal, which he could never do ; — the Eternal is in him, 
and surrounds him at aU times ; — ^he has but to forsake 
the Transitory and Perishable with which the True 
Life can never associate, and thereupon the Eternal, 
with all its Blessedness, will forthwith descend and 
dwell with him. We cannot win Blessedness, but we 
may cast away our wretchedness ; and thereupon Bless- 
edness will forthwith of itself supply the vacant place. 
Blessedness, as we have seen, is imwavering repose in 
the One and Eternal ; wretchedness is vagrancy amid 
the Manifold and Transitory : and therefore the con- 
dition of becoming blessed is the return of our love 
from the Many to the One. 

That which is vagrant amid the Manifold and Tran- 
sitory is dissolved, poured forth, and spread abroad 
like water ; notwithstanding its desire to love this and 
that and many things besides, it really loves nothing ; 
and just because it would be everjrwhere at home, it is 
nowhere at home. This vagrancy is our peculiar 
nature, and in it we are bom. For this reason the 
return of the mind to the One Eternal, which is never 
produced by the common view of things but must be 
brought about by our own effort, appears as concen- 
tration of the mind, and its absorption in itself; as 



THE TRUE LIFE AND THE APPARENT LIFE. 15 

earnestness, in opposition to the merry game we play 
amid the manifold diversities of Ufe; and as pro- 
fowad thoughtfulness, in opposition to the light-hearted 
thoughtlessness which, while it has much to compre- 
hend, yet comprehends nothing thoroughly. This 
profound and thoughtful earnestness, this strict con- 
centration of the mind, and its absorption in itself, is 
the one condition under which the Blessed Life can 
approach us; but imder this condition it approaches 
and dwells with us surely and infalhbly. 

It is certainly true, that, by this withdrawal of our 
mind from the Visible, the objects of our former love 
fade from our view, and gradually disappear, until we 
regain them clothed with fresh beauty in the aether of 
the new world which rises before us; and that our 
whole previous life perishes, until we regain it as a 
sUght adjunct to the new life which begins vrithin us. 
But this is the destiny inseparable from all Finite Ex- 
istence; only through death does it enter into life. 
Whatever is mortal must die, nothing can deUver it 
from the power of its own nature ; in the Apparent 
Life it dies continually ; where the True Life begins, in 
that one death it dies forever, and for all the unknown 
series of ftiture deaths which, in its Apparent Life, 
may yet Ue before it. 

I have promised to show you the way towards the 
Blessed Life I But with what appUcations, and under 
what images, forms, and conceptions, shall such in- 
struction be addressed to this age, in these circum- 
stances? The images and forms of the established 
religion, which say the same things which alone we 
can here say, and which say them besides in the same 
way in which alone we can here say them, because it 



16 LECTURE I. 

is the most fitting way, — these images and forms have 
been first of all emptied of their significance, then 
openly derided, and lastly given over to silent and 
poUte contempt. The propositions and syllogisms of 
the philosophers are accused of being pernicious to the 
country and the nation, and subversive of sound sense, 
and that before a tribimal where neither accuser nor 
judge appears; — and this might be endured: — but 
what is worse, every one who desires to beUeve in 
these propositions and syUogisms is told beforehand that 
he will never understand them; — for this purpose, that 
he may not accept the words in their natural sense, and 
as they stand, but seek behind them for some peculiar 
and hidden meaning ; — and in this way misconception 
and confusion are sure to arise. 

Or, even were it possible to discover forms and 
applications by means of which we might communicate 
such iostruction, how should we awaken a desire to 
receive it, here, where it is universally taught, and 
now with greater applause than ever, that despair of 
all salvation is the only possible salvation; and that 
the faith that mankind are but the sport of an arbi- 
trary and capricious God is the only true wisdom ; and 
where he who stiU beheves in God and Truth, and in 
Life and Blessedness therein, is laughed at as an inex- 
perienced boy who knows nothing of the world ? 

Be this as it may, we have yet courage in store; 
and to have striven for a praiseworthy end, even if it 
be in vain, is yet worth our labour. I see before me 
now, and I hope stiU to see here, persons who have 
partaken in the best culture which our age affords : — 
First of all, the female sex, to whom, by the social ar- 
rangements of mankind, has been assigned the task of 



THE TRUE LIFE AND THR APPARENT LIFE. 17 

caring for the minor external wants, and even tbe de^ 
corations of human Ufe, — an employment which, more 
than any other, distracts the mind and draws it away 
fjpom clear and earnest reflection, — while, by way of 
compensation, nature has implanted in them warmer 
aspirations towards the Eternal, and a more refined 
perception of it. Then I see before me men of busi- 
ness, whose caUing drags them, every day of their hves, 
throughout a multitude of varied trifles, which are, 
indeed, connected with the Eternal and Unchangeable, 
but so that not every one can discover, at the first 
glance, the Unk that unites them. Lastly, I see before 
me young scholars, in whom the form in which the 
Eternal is destined to pervade their being still labours 
in the preparation of its future abode. While, with 
reference to this last class, I may perhaps venture to 
flatter myself with the hope that some of my sugges- 
tions may contribute towards that preparation, with re- 
ference to the two first classes, I make far more modest 
pretensions. I ask them only to accept fJpom me what 
they themselves, without dubiety and independent of 
my help, might have acquired, but which I may have 
reached with less labour and by a shorter path. 

While all these are disturbed and divided by the 
multifarious objects to which their thoughts must be 
appUed, the Philosopher pursues, in soUtary silence 
and in unbroken concentration of mind, his single and 
imdeviating course towards the Good, the Beautiful, 
and the True ; and that is his daily labour, to which 
others can only resort at times for rest and refreshment 
after toil. This fortunate lot has fallen among others 
upon me ; and therefore I now propose to communicate 
to you here, as fully as I myself possess it and under- 

C2 



18 LECTURE I. 

stand how to communicate it to you, whatever may be 
so appropriated from my speculative labours, intelli- 
gible to the general mind, and conducive to the attain- 
ment of the Good, the Beautiful, and the Eternal. 



(19) 



LECTURE II. 

REFUTATION OF OBJECTIONS TO POPULAR 
METAPHYSICAL TEACHING. 



Strict order and method will, naturally and without 
farther care on our part, arise throughout the whole 
subject-matter of the discourses which I here propose 
to address to you, as soon as we shall have made good 
our entrance within its boundaries, and set our foot 
firmly on its domain. As yet we are still occupied 
with this last-mentioned business ; and with regard to 
it, the chief thing we have now to do is to acquire a 
clearer and freer insight into the essential principles 
which were set forth in our last lecture. In our next 
lecture, therefore, we shall go over once again that 
which we have already said ; proceeding however from 
a different starting-point, and employing a different 
language. 

For to-day I entreat you to enter with me on the 
following preliminary considerations : — 

We wish to acquire a clear insight, I said : — clear- 
ness, however, is only to be found in depth ; on the 
surface there never lies aught but obscurity and confii- 
sion. He, therefore, who invites you to clearer know- 
ledge, must necessarily invite you to descend with him 
into the depths of thought. And thus I will by no 



20 LECTURE II. 

means deny, but rather openly declare at the outset, 
that I have already in my previous lecture touched 
upon the deepest foundations and elements of all 
knowledge, beyond which there is no knowledge ; and 
that in my next lecture I propose to set forth these 
same elements, — or, in the language of the schools, 
the profoundest Metaphysics and Ontology, — in a dif- 
ferent, and indeed in a popular, way. 

Against such an undertaking as the present two 
objections are commonly urged, — either that it is wn- 
possible to treat these subjects in a popular way, or 
that it is unadvisable to do so, — the latter objection 
being sometimes made by philosophers who would 
willingly make a mystery of their knowledge ; and I 
must before all things answer these objections, in order 
that in addition to the difficulties of the subject itself 
I may not also have to combat an aversion to it on 
your part. 

In the first place, as regards the possibility : — I in- 
deed do not know whether any philosopher whatever, 
(5f in particular myself, has ever succeeded or ever shall 
succeed in elevating, by way of popular instruction, 
those who either will not or cannot study philosophy 
systematically, to the comprehension of its fundamental 
truths. But, on the other hand, I do know, and per- 
ceive with absolute certainty, the two following truths: 
— First, that if any man do not attain to insight into 
these elements of all knowledge, — the artistic and 
systematic development of which alone, but not their 
substance, has become the exclusive property of Scien- 
tific Philosophy, — if any man, I say, do not attain to 
insight into these elements of all knowledge, then such 
a man can hkewise never attain to Thought, and to 



POPULAR OBJECTIONS REFUTED. 21 

a true inward independence of spirit, but remains en- 
thralled within the limits of mere Opinion; and, during 
his whole life, is never a proper individual mind, but 
only an appendix to other minds ; he wants an organ 
of the spiritual sense, and that the noblest of them 
all: — that, therefore, the assertion, that it is neither 
possible nor advisable to elevate those who cannot 
study philosophy systematically to an insight into the 
nature of the spiritual world by some other means, is 
just equivalent to this, — that it is impossible that any 
one who has not studied in the schools should ever 
attain to true Thought and spiritual independence, the 
school alone, and nothing but the school, being the 
sole progenitor and nursing mother of mind ; or that, 
even were it possible, it would not be advisable ever 
to give spiritual freedom to the unlearned, but that 
these must always remain under the guardianship of 
pretended philosophers, a mere appanage to their sove- 
reign understanding. For the rest, the distinction which 
we have here touched upon between true Thought 
and mere Opinion will become perfectly clear and dis- 
tinct at the beginning of our next lecture. 

Secondly^ I know and perceive, with like certainty, 
the following : — that it is only by means of Thought, 
proper, pure, and true thought, and absolutely by no 
other organ, that man can approach the Godhead and 
the Blessed Life which proceeds from the Godhead, 
and can bring them home to himself; — that therefore 
the assertion that it is impossible to communicate 
profoimd truth in a popular way is equivalent to this, 
— that only through a systematic study of philosophy 
is it possible for man to elevate himself to Religion 
and its blessings, and that every one who is not a 



22 LECTURE II. 

philosopher must remain for ever shut out from God 
and his kingdom. In this argument everything de- 
pends upon the principle that the True God and the 
True ReUgion are only to be approached and compre- 
hended by pure Thought, and we must often dwell 
upon this principle, and endeavour to make it evident 
on all sides. ReUgion does not consist in that wherein 
it is placed by the common mode of thought, — namely 
in this, that man should beUeve, be of opinion, and 
rest satisfied, if no one has the hardihood to assert the 
opposite, — his belief resting wholly on hearsay and 
outward assurance, — that there is a God: — this is a 
vulgar superstition by which, at most, a defective po- 
Uce system may be remedied, while the inward nature 
of man remains as bad as before, and frequently is 
made worse, smce he forms this God after his own 
image, and in him only manufactures a new prop for 
his own corruption. But herein ReUgion does consist, 
that man in his own person and not in that of an- 
other, with his own spiritual eye and not through that 
of another, should immediately behold, have, and pos- 
sess God. This, however, is possible by means of pure, 
independent Thought alone, for only through this does 
man assume true and real personaUty, and this alone 
is the eye to which God can become visible. Pure 
Thought is itself the Divine Existence ; and, on the 
other hand, the Divine Existence, in its immediate 
essence, is nothing else than pure Thought. 

Besides, to look at this matter historically, the as- 
sumption that absolutely all men without exception 
may come to the knowledge of God, as well as the 
effort to raise them aU to this knowledge, is the as- 
sumption and the effort of Christianity; and, since 



POPULAR OBJECTIONS REFUTED. 23 

Christianity is the developing principle and peculiar 
characteristic of modem time, this assumption and this 
effort form the peculiar spirit of the Age of the New 
Testament. Now the two expressions, — to elevate all 
men without exception to the knowledge of God, — 
and, to communicate to mankind at large the deepest 
elements and foimdations of knowledge in another way 
than that of systematic instruction, — mean strictly and 
entirely one and the same thing. It is clear, there- 
fore, that every one who does not wish to return to 
the ancient times of Heathendom must admit, not only 
the possibiUty, but the irremissible duty, of commu- 
nicating to men the profoundest principles of know- 
ledge in a generally comprehensible form. 

But, — to close this argument for the possibihty of 
a popular exposition of the profoimdest truth with the 
most decisive proof, that of facts: — Has this know- 
ledge, then, — which we have undertaken, by means of 
these lectures, to imfold in those who as yet have it 
not, and to strengthen and purify in those who already 
possess it,— has it never until our time been present 
in the world, and do we pretend now to introduce 
something wholly new and hitherto nowhere discover- 
able ? We would not wish to beheve that this latter 
had even been said of us ; but, on the contrary, we 
maintain that this knowledge, in all its clearness and 
purity which we can by no means surpass, and in 
every age from the origin of Christianity downwards, 
although for the most part imrecognised, and perse- 
cuted by the dominant church, has yet, here and there, 
secretly ruled the minds of men, and disseminated itself 
abroad. On the other hand, we do not hesitate to 
declare that the method of regular, systematic, and 



24 LECTURE II. 

scientific investigation, by which we for our part have 
attained to this knowledge, has in former times, not 
indeed in respect of trial, but certainly in respect of 
success, been unknown in the world, and, under the 
guidance of the spirit of our great forefathers, has 
been for the most part our own work. If, then, 
scientific, philosophical insight has had no previous 
existence, in what way did Christ, — or — since, in his 
case, some will assume for it a miraculous, superna- 
tural origin, which I will not here dispute — in what 
way did Christ's Apostles, in what way did all those 
who, from their time down to our own, have possessed 
this knowledge, — in what way did they actually ac- 
quire it? Among the former, as among the latter, 
there were many very unlearned persons, wholly ig- 
norant of philosophy, or even opposed to it ; the few 
among them who meddled with philosophy at all, and 
with whose philosophy we are acquainted, so philoso- 
phized that it is easy for the educated man to perceive 
that it was not to their philosophy that they owed 
their insight. But to say, that they did not obtain 
that insight by way of philosophy, is just to say, that 
they did obtain it in a popular way. Why then should 
that which has been possible heretofore, in an un- 
broken sequence for nearly two thousand years, be now 
impossible ? Why should that which was possible, with 
very imperfect aids, at a period when general enUght- 
enment was nowhere to be found in the world, be no 
longer possible, now when the needful aids have been 
perfected, and, at least in philosophy, the requisite 
enhghtenment exists? Why should that which was 
possible when reUgious faith and natural understand- 
ing were yet at variance to a certain extent, become 



POPULAR OBJECTIONS REFUTED. 25 

impossible now that they have been reconciled to each 
other, and, forgetting thdr former disunion, pursue in 
friendship one and the same end. 

That which follows most decisively from all these 
considerations is the duty incumbent upon every man 
who is penetrated by this higher knowledge to exert 
all his powers to communicate that knowledge, where- 
ever possible, to the whole brotherhood of humanity ; 
presenting it to each individual in that form in which 
he is most open to its reception ; never debating with 
himself, nor wavering in doubt, whether or not it may 
succeed, but labouring as if it must of necessity suc- 
ceed; and after each completed efifort, rising with new 
and fresh vigour as if nothing had yet been attained I 
— and, on the other hand, the duty of each individual 
who is not yet in possession of this knowledge, or who 
does not possess it in fitting deamess and freedom 
and as an ever-present possession, to devote himself 
whoUy and unreservedly to the instruction thus offered 
to him, as if it were destined for him especially, and 
were his own property, and must of necessity be under- 
stood by him; not fearfully and timidly exclaiming 
" Ah I shall I indeed understand it?" or " Do I then 
understand it rightly?" Understand it rightly, in the 
sense of perfect comprehension? — in this sense, many 
will say, that these lectures can only be imderstood by 
such as could themselves have spoken them. But to 
understand, and that not erroneoiisly, lies within the 
power of every one who, moved by these discourses, 
is elevated above the common view of the world, and 
inspired with exalted sentiments and resolves. The 
reciprocal obligation to both these duties Hes at the 
foimdation of the contract which we entered into at 

D 



26 LECTURE II. 

the beginning of these lectures. I wiU unweariedly 
search for new forms, applications, and combinations, 
as if it were impossible to make myself fully intelligible 
to you : — do you on the other hand, that is, you who 
seek instruction here — for to the others I willingly 
limit myself to counsel — do you proceed with earnest- 
ness and courage to the business, as if you had to 
understand xx.e by half words only;-and in this way 
I believe that we shall agree well together. 

These considerations on the possibility and necessity 
of a generally comprehensible exposition of the deepest 
elements of knowledge acquire a new significance and 
convincing power, when we examine more strictly the 
pecuHar and characteristic distinction between the Po- 
pular and the Scientific discourse ; — a distinction which 
in my opinion is as good as unknown, and which, in 
particular, lies wholly concealed from those who talk 
so readily of the possibility and impossibihty of popu- 
lar expositions. The Scientific discourse extracts truth 
from the errors which surround and oppose it on all 
sides and in every form ; and, by demoUtion of these 
opposing views as error, and as impossible to true 
thought, shows the truth as that which alone remains 
after their^ withdrawal, and therefore as the only pos- 
sible truth : — and in this separation of opposites, and 
elucidation of the truth from the confused chaos in 
which truth and error lie mingled together, consists 
the peculiar and characteristic nature of the Scientific 
discourse. This method creates and produces truth, 
before our eyes, out of a world full of error. Now it 
is obvious that the philosopher, previous to such proof 
of truth, and before he could either project or begin 
it, and therefore independent of scientific proof, must 



POPULAR OBJECTIONS REFUTED. 27 

already possess truth. But how could he attain pos- 
session of it, except by the guidance of a natural sense 
of truth which exists in him only with higher power 
than in his contemporaries ; and in what other way, 
then^ has he at first attained it but by the unartificial, 
popular way ? To this natural sense of truth, which 
we have thus discovered to be the starting-point even 
of scientific philosophy, the Popular discourse ad- 
dresses itself immediately, without calling aught else to 
its aid, — setting forth the truth, and nothing but the 
truth, purely and simply, as it is in itself and not as 
it stands opposed to error, — and calculates upon the 
spontaneous assent of this natural sense. This dis- 
course cannot indeed prove anything; but it must 
certainly be understood, for inteUigence itself is the 
only organ whereby we can apprehend its import, and 
without this we receive nothing whatever by its means. 
The Scientific discourse presupposes in the hearer an 
entanglement in the meshes of error, and addresses 
itself to a diseased and perverted spiritual nature ; the 
Popular discourse presupposes an open and candid 
mind, and appeals to a healthy, although not sufiJ- 
dently cultivated, spiritual nature. After all this, how 
can the philosopher entertain a doubt that the natural 
sense of truth in man is sufiScient to lead him to the 
knowledge of truth, since he himself has attained to 
that knowledge by this means and no other? 

But notwithstanding that the comprehension of the 
deepest truths of Reason, by means of a popular ex- 
position, is possible, — ^notwithstanding further that this 
comprehension is a necessary purpose of humanity, 
towards the attainment of which every power ought 
to be directed, — we must nevertheless acknowledge 



28 LECTURE II. 

that there are, in the present age, greater hindrances 
to the accomplishment of this purpose than have ex- 
isted at any previous time. In the first place, the 
very form of this higher truth, — this strictly deter- 
minate, self-assured, absolutely unchanging and un- 
changeable form, — comes into collision, and that in a 
two-fold manner, with the hesitating modesty which 
this age — has not indeed in itself, but yet — demands 
from every one who undertakes to deal with it. It is 
not to be denied that this knowledge assumes itself to 
be true, and alone true, and true only in the sharp 
and complete precision in which it is thus announced; 
— and everything opposed to it, absohitely and without 
exception or mitigation, to be false ; — that therefore it 
desires to subdue, without forbearance, all partial af- 
fection, all freedom of fancy, and wholly disdains to 
enter into treaty with any other thing whatsoever. 
The men of these days are offended at this severity, 
as if they thereby sustained the greatest injury ; they 
would be consulted, and on that account courteously 
saluted, as to whether they will lend their sanction to 
such a matter; and would make conditions on their 
side, and there should be some elbow-room left them 
for their tricks of legerdemain. Others are dissatisfied 
with this form, because it requires them at once to 
take their part, for or against, and to decide, on the 
instant, yes or no. For they are in no haste to know 
for certain about that which nevertheless is alone worth 
knowing, and would willingly suspend their voices, in 
case it should afterwards turn out to be wholly other- 
wise ; and besides it is very convenient to conceal their 
want of understanding under the fashionable and high- 
sounding name of Scepticism, and to allow mankind to 



POPULAR OBJECTIONS REFUTED. 29 

believe that there, where in fact they have been found 
wanting in power to comprehend that which Ues be- 
fore them, it has been only their superior acuteness 
and penetration which has disclosed to them certain 
unheard-of, and to all other men inaccessible, grounds 
for doubt. 

Again, there is a hindrance to the successful issue 
of our undertaking in this age, in the monstrously 
paradoxical, strange, and unheard-of appearance of our 
doctrine, since it turns into falsehood precisely those 
things which the age has hitherto prized as the most 
precious and sacred results of its culture and enhght- 
enment. Not as if our doctrine were in itself new and 
paradoxical. Among the Greeks, Plato held the same 
views. The Johannean Christ said precisely the same 
things which we teach and prove, and even said them 
in the same language which we here employ ; and in 
these very times, and among our own nation, two of our 
greatest Poets have given expression to the same truth 
in manifold appUcations and under many forms. But 
the Johannean Christ has been superseded by his less 
spiritual followers ; and Poets, it is thought, desire only 
to utter fine words, and to produce musical sounds. 

That this ancient doctrine, which has thus been 
renewed from age to age down even to these later 
times, should yet seem so wholly new and unheard- 
of, arises in this way. After the revival of learning in 
Modern Europe, and particularly since, by means of 
the Church Reformation, the evidence of the highest 
rehgious truth was freely presented to the mind, there 
gradually arose a philosophy which made the experi- 
ment whether the books of Nature and of Knowledge, 
which were to it unintelUgible, might not assume a 

D 2 



30 LECTURE II. 

meaning when read backwards; whereby indeed every- 
thing without exception was taken out of its natural 
position, and set head downwards. This philosophy took 
possession, as every prevalent philosophy necessarily 
does, of all the avenues of pubUc instruction, — cate- 
chisms, schoolbooks, public rehgious discourses, books. 
All our youthful culture fell within this period. There 
is thus no wonder that, after the unnatural had become 
to us natural. Nature herself should seem to us un- 
natural; and that, after we had been accustomed to 
see all things upside-down, we should imagine them 
to be inverted when we beheld them restored to their 
true position. This indeed is an error which will dis- 
appear with the age which produced it ; for we, who 
explain death by Ufe, the body by the soul, — and not 
the reverse as these modems do, — we are the true 
followers of tbe Ancients; only that we see clearly 
what remained dark to them; while the philosophy 
which we have alluded to above is no advancement 
whatsoever in time, but only a ludicrous interlude, a 
petty appendix to thorough barbarism. 

Lastly, those who might perchance of themselves 
overcome the two hindrances now pointed out, may 
yet be scared back by the hateftJ and maUcious objec- 
tions urged by the fanatics of perversity. It may in- 
deed be wondered at that such perversity, not satisfied 
with being itself, and in its own person, perverse, should 
besides exhibit a fanatical zeal for the maintenance 
and difiusion of the same perversity beyond its own 
personaKty. Yet even this may be readily explained, 
and in this way. When these fimatics had reached 
the years of reflection and self-knowledge, and had 
thoroughly examined their inward being, and found 



POPULAR OBJECTIONS REFUTED. 31 

nothing there but the impulse towards personal sen- 
suous well-being, and had not felt the slightest wish 
either to find within themselves, or to acquire from 
without, anything but what they did find there, — 
then they have looked around them upon the other 
beings of their species, observed them, and believed 
themselves to have ascertained that neither was there 
anything to be met with in them higher than this 
same impulse towards personal, sensuous well-being. 
Hereupon they have satisfied themselves that in this 
consists the essential nature of humanity; and they 
have cultivated in themselves this nature with un- 
remitting care, and to the highest possible perfection ; 
whereby they have necessarily become, in their own 
eyes, the most preeminent and distinguished among 
men, since they were conscious of being virtuosi in 
those things wherein alone the worth of humanity 
consists. Thus have they thought and acted through- 
out life. But if it should appear that they have been 
mistaken in the major proposition of their syllogism, 
— if in others of their species there has been mani- 
fested something else, and, in this case, something 
undeniably higher and more divine than the mere 
impulse towards personal, sensuous well-being, — then 
they who had hitherto held themselves to be men of 
distinguished preeminence would be discovered to be- 
long to a lower race, and instead of esteeming them- 
selves as before, higher than all others, they would be 
compelled thenceforward to despise and reject them- 
selves. They cannot do otherwise than angrily oppose 
this conviction of a higher nature in man, which brings 
only disgrace to them, and all phenomena which con- 
firm this conviction ; they must necessarily do every- 



32 LECTURE II. 

thing in their power to keep such phenomena at a 
distance from themselves, and even to suppress them al- 
together ; they struggle for life, — ^for the most deUcate 
and innermost root of their Ufe,— for the possibihty 
of self-endurance. All fanaticism, and all its ansry 
edubitions, from the beginning of the world down to 
the present day, have proceeded from this principle :- 
" If my opponent be right, then am I a miserable man." 
Where this fanaticism can wield fire and sword, with 
fire and sword it assails its detested adversary ; where 
these instruments are beyond its reach, it has still the 
tongue left, — which, if it do not kill the foe, is yet 
frequently able to cripple his activity and influence 
with others. One of the most favourite and custom- 
ary tricks of tonffue-fence amonff these fanatics is this : 
t7giye to the tWng, which is hlteful only to them, a 
name which is hateful to all men, in order thereby to 
decry it, and render it suspected. The existing store 
of such tricks and nicknames is inexhaustible, and is 
constantly enriched by fresh additions ; and it would 
be in vain' to attempt 'here any complete enumeration 
of them. Only one of the most common of these 
odious nicknames I will here notice, — i, e. the charge 
that this doctrine which we teach is Mysticism. 

Observe, in the first place, with reference to the 
form of this accusation, that should any candid unpre- 
judiced person answer : — " Well, let us suppose that it 
is Mysticism, and that Mysticism is an erroneous and 
dangerous thing; let him for that very reason bring 
forward his doctrine, and we will hear him: it is 
erroneous and dangerous, and this wiU come to Ught 
when the opportunity is given ;" — these fanatics must 
reply, in accordance with the peremptory decision by 



POPULAR OBJECTIONS REFUTED. 33 

which they believe they have got rid of us : — " There 
is nothing more to hear ; — M]rsticism has long ago> for 
some generations back, by the unanimous voice of all 
our Uterary Councils, been decreed to be heresy, and 
placed under excommunication." 

Further — to proceed from the form of this accusation 
to its substance : — What then is this Mysticism which 
they lay to our charge ? We shall not indeed receive 
a distinct answer to this question from them : — for as 
they never possess a dear idea, but only think about 
high-sounding phrases, so in this case they have no 
conception answering to their words : — we must there- 
fore help ourselves. There is, unquestionably, a view 
of spiritual and sacred things wl^ich, although Ksorrect 
in the main, is nevertheless afflicted with a grievous 
infirmity, and thereby rendered impure and noxious. 
In my lectures of last year,* I took occasion, in pass- 
ing, to delineate this view, and I may perhaps find an 
opportunity this season to return to the subject. This 
view, which in part is certainly a much perverted one, 
is properly distinguished from the true religious view 
by the name of Mysticism; — I myself am wont to 
make this distinction, employing the names just men- 
tioned; and from this Mysticism my doctrine is far 
removed, and indeed wholly opposed to it. Thus, I 
say, do I regard the matter. But what would the 
fanatics ? The distinction I have mentioned is com- 
pletely concealed from their eyes, as well as from the 
eyes of that philosophy which they follow ; — according 
to their imanimous resolutions, their criticisms, their 
discussions, their favourite works, and all their public 

♦ " Characteristics of the Present Age," Lecture VIII. 



34 LECTURB n. 

manifestations without exception, — which he who can 
may examine for himself, and the others may believe 
me upon trust, — according to these unanimous resolu- 
tions, it is always the True Religion, the Knowledge of 
God in spirit and in truth, which they call Mysticism, 
and against which in fact, under this name, they hurl 
their anathema. Their warnings against this doctrine, 
as Mysticism, therefore mean nothing else than what 
may be thus paraphrased: — " Yonder they will tell 
you of the existence of a spiritual world, revealed to 
no outward sense, but only to be apprehended by pure 
thought : — you are lost if you allow yourselves to be 
persuaded of this, for there is absolutely no existence 
but that which we can grasp with our hand, and we 
have nothing else to care for; all else are mere ab- 
stractions from the substantial realities we can handle, 
which in themselves have no substance, and which 
these enthusiasts confound with palpable reality. They 
will tell you of the reality, the inward independence, 
the creative power of thought : — you are lost to real 
life if you believe them ; for there is nothing really 
existing but, in the first place, the stomach, and then 
that which supports it and supplies it with food ; and 
it is only the gases that have their birth in it which 
these dreamers call ideas." We admit the whole ac- 
cusation, and willingly confess, not without joyful and 
exulting feeUngs, that, in this sense of the word, our 
doctrine is indeed Mysticism. With these we have 
therefore no new controversy to begin, but find our- 
selves in the old controversy, which has never been 
solved nor reconciled ; i, e. — they say that all Religion 
— truly it may be said of the vulgar superstition we 
have alluded to above — is something in the highest 



POPULAR OBJECTIONS REFUTED. 35 

degree objectionable and pernicious, and must be ex- 
tirpated from the earth, root and branch ; and so the 
matter remains: — while we say that True Religion 
is something in the highest degree blessed, and that 
which alone gives true existence, worth, and dignity 
to man, here below and throughout eternity ; and that 
every power must be exerted in order that this Re- 
ligion may, wherever it is possible, be made known to 
all men; this we recognise with absolute certainty, 
and thus the matter remains on* our side. 

Meanwhile, that these persons should rather choose 
to say " That is Mysticism," than, as they ought to 
say, " That is ReUgion," arises, among other causes 
which do noi belong to our present subject, from the 
following : — They desire, by this language, in the first 
place, imperceptibly to induce a fear that, by means of 
this our doctrine, there may be introduced intolerance, 
desire of persecution, insubordination, and civil dis- 
turbance; or that, in one word, this doctrine is dan- 
gerous to the State : — secondly and chiefly, they wish 
to create alarm, in those who may enter upon inquiries 
like the present, as to their continuance in possession 
of a sound mind, and to give them to understand that 
in this way they may come at last to see ghosts in 
broad daylight — which would be a very great mis- 
fortune indeed. As to the first, the danger to the 
State: — they violently appropriate and pervert the 
description of that from which danger may be feared, 
and they doubtless calculate quite securely that no one 
will be found to discover the change ; for neither that 
which they call Mysticism — the True Religion — nor 
that which we call by that name, has ever been known to 
persecute, to show intolerance, or to stir up civil com- 



36 LECTURE II. 

motion; — throughout the whole history of Churches, 
heresies, and persecutions, the persecuted party have 
ever occupied a proportionally higher, and the perse- 
cutors a lower position ; the latter fighting, as we said 
above, for life. No ! intolerance, desire of persecution, 
insubordination towards the State, belong only to that 
spirit by which they themselves are animated, the £ma- 
ticism of perversity ; and, if it were otherwise advisable, 
I would willingly have the fetters struck ofiF this very 
day from the enslaved, that it might be seen what 
course they would take. As to the second object of 
soHcitude, the preservation of a sound mind : — ^this de- 
pends in the first instance on physical organization, and 
against influences of this kind, even the shallowest inan- 
ity, the lowest vulgarity of soul, is by no means a safe- 
guard; — hence there is no occasion to throw ourselves 
into the arms of these fanatics in order to escape the 
threatened danger. So &r as I know, or have known, 
those who live amid those investigations of which we 
now speak, and prosecute in them their uninterrupted 
daily labour, are by no means exposed to these dis- 
tractions, see no ghosts, and are as healthy, in mind 
and body, as others. If, sometimes in life, they do 
not what most other men in their place would have 
done, or do what most other men in the same place 
would have left undone, it is not because they are 
deficient in acuteness to perceive the possibility of the 
one course of action, or the consequences of the other, 
— as those who, in their place, would certainly have 
followed the guidance of such knowledge, cannot re- 
frain from thinking, — but for other reasons. If there 
must always be diseased spiritual natures, who as soon 
as they quit their housekeeping books, or whatever 



POPULAR OBJECTIONS REFUTED. 37 

other morsel of reaKty gives employment to their fii- 
eulties, forthwith fall into the mazes of error, let such 
remain by their housekeeping books ! — but I trust that 
the general rule may not be taken from them, who, 
it is to be hoped, are the smaller number, and are 
certainly of the lower species ; nor, because there are 
feeble and diseased creatures among men, the whole 
human race be treated as if they were feeble and dis- 
eased. That we have interested ourselves in the deaf, 
dumb, and blind, and invented a way whereby instruc 
tion may be conmiunicated to them, is deserving of all 
thanks; — from the deaf and dumb, namely,* and the 
blind. But if we were to make this method of in- 
struction the universal plan of education for persons 
without these defects, because such persons may en- 
counter deaf, dumb, and blind people, and we should 
thus be sure that we had provided for every such 
contingency; if he who can hear should, without 
regard to his hearing, be made to talk by the same 
laborious process as the deaf and dumb, and require 
to learn to detect the words upon the lips; and he 
who can see should, without regard to his seeing, be 
taught to read the letters by the touch; — this would 
deserve little thanks indeed from those who have no 
defect in sense, notwithstanding that such an arrange- 
ment would certainly be adopted as soon as the direc- 
tion of pubUc instruction should be made dependent 
on the opinion of the deaf and dumb, and the blind. 

These are the preliminary suggestions and consi- 
derations which I have thought it advisable to com- 
municate to you to-day. Eight days hence I shall 
endeavour to set forth, in a new Ught, and upon a 

E 



38 LECTURE II. 

new side, the foundation-principles of these lectures, 
which are at the same time the foimdation-principles 
of all knowledge; — and to this I respectfully invite 
you. 



(39) 



LECTURE III. 

DIFFICULTIES ARISING FROM THE COMMON MODE OF 

THOUGHT : — DEFINITION OF BEING (SETN) 

AND ^X-ISTENCE (DA8ETN,) 

In the first of these lectures we maintained that not 
everything which seems to be Uving does really and 
truly Uve ; and in the second we said that a large por- 
tion of mankind, throughout their whole Life, never 
attain to true and proper Thought, but remain within 
the circle of mere Opinion. It might well be, and in- 
deed it has already become obvious from other remarks 
which we made on that occasion, that the phrases 
Thought and Life — Thought-lessness and Death, mean 
precisely one and the same thing; we have already 
shown that Thought is the element of Life, and con- 
sequently the absence of Thought must be the source 
of Death. 

An important difficulty stands in the way of this 
assertion, to which I must now direct your attention, 
namely the following : — If Life be an organic whole, 
determined by one universally efficient law, then it 
seems at first sight impossible that any one part apper- 
taining to Life should be absent where the others are 
present ; or that any one individual part should exist 
without all the parts proper to Life, and consequently 



40 LECTURE III. 

without Life itself as a whole, in its complete organic 
unity. In solving this difficulty, we shall also be able 
to exhibit to you clearly the distinction between true 
Thought and mere Opinion, which was the first busi- 
ness we announced for to-day in our last discourse, 
before we proceed to the fulfilment of our other pur- 
pose in this lecture, namely, to begin the apphcation 
of pure Thought itself to the elements of all Know- 
ledge. 

The supposed difficulty is thus solved: — Wherever 
spiritual Life is to be foimd, everything, without ex- 
ception, that belongs to this Life, follows wholly and 
unreservedly, according to the established law of its 
being: — but all this which follows, like mechanism, 
with absolute necessity, does not necessarily enter into 
consciousness ; and it is there indeed a Life according 
to the law, but not our Life, not the Life which is pro- 
perly and peculiarly ours. Our Life is only that part 
of the Life according to the law which we embrace in 
clear consciousness, and, in this clear consciousness, 
love and enjoy. " Where Love is, there is individual 
Life," we said once; — Love, however, exists only where 
there is clear consciousness. 

The development of this our Life, — which in these 
lectures is all to which we shall give the name of Life, 
— within the whole of Life which has an existence 
according to the law, proceeds precisely like that of 
physical death. As this, in its natural progress, begins 
at first in the remoter members, those farthest removed 
from the central seat of life, and from them spreads 
itself gradually to the inward parts, until at last it 
reaches the heart; so does the spiritual Life, filled 
with consciousness, love, and enjoyment of itself, begin 



POPULAR DIFFICULTIES CONSIDERED. 41 

at first in the extremities and remoter outworks of Life, 
imtil it also, with God's good pleasure, reaches the true 
foundation and central point of all. An ancient philo- 
sopher maintained that the animals had arisen from 
the earth ; " as happens," he added, " even to the 
present day in miniature, since every spring, particu- 
larly after a warm rain, we may observe frogs, for 
example, in whom some particular part, perhaps the 
fore-feet, may be quite perfectly developed, while the 
other members still remain a rude and undeveloped 
clod of earth." The half-animals of this philosopher, 
although they scarcely afford suflScient evidence ol 
what they were designed to prove, yet present a very 
striking illustration of the spiritual Life of ordinary 
men. The outward members of this Life are in them- 
selves perfectly formed, and warm blood flows through 
the extremities ; but when we look to the heart, and 
the other nobler organs of life, — which, in themselves 
and according to the law, are indeed there, and must 
necessarily be there, since otherwise even the outward 
members themselves could not have been, — in these 
organs, I say, they are found to be still unsentient 
clods — frozen rocks. 

I shall, first of all, convince you of this by a striking 
example; to which, although I shall express myself 
with the clearest precision, I must yet require your 
particular attention, on account of the novelty of the 
observation. We see, hear, feel — outward objects ; and 
along with this seeing, &c., we also think these objects, 
and are conscious of them by means of our inward 
sense ; just as we are conscious, by the same inward 
sense, of our seeing, hearing, and feeUng of these 
objects. I hope that no one who is possessed even of 

E 2 



42 LECTURB III. 

the commonest power of reflexion wiU maintain that 
he can see, hear, or feel an object without being at 
the same time inwardly conscious both of the object 
itself, and of his seeing, hearing, or feehng of it ; — 
that he can see, hear, or feel anything definite without 
conscioujsness. This co-existence, this inseparabiUty 
of the outward, sensible perception and the inward 
thought or conception, — this co-eaistence, I say, and 
nothing more than this, lies in practical self-observa- 
tion, or the fact of Consciousness; but this fact of 
consciousness does by no means contain, — and I beg 
you to note this well, — this fact of consciousness does 
by no means contain any relation between these two 
elements, — the outward Sense and the inward Thought, 
— a relation of the one to the other, — it may be as 
Cause and Effect, or as Essential and Accidental. If 
any such relation between the two be assumed, this is 
not done in consequence of practical self-observation, 
and it does not he in the fact of consciousness : — this 
is the first thing that I beg of you to understand and 
keep in mind. 

Now, in the second place, should such a relation be 
assumed upon some other ground than that of self- 
observation, — which other possible ground we put in 
the place of consciousness, — should such a relation be- 
tween the two elements be, upon such a ground, sup- 
posed and accepted, — then it appears, at first sight, 
that the two elements, as co-existent and inseparable 
firom each other, must be held to be of equal rank ; 
and thus the inward thought may be as well regarded 
as the foundation, the essence of the outward percep- 
tion, — which in that case would be the superstructure, 
the accident, — as the reverse; and in this way an 



POPULAR DIFFICULTIES CONSIDERED. 43 

insoluble doubt would necessarily arise between the 
two suppositions, which would for ever prevent any 
final decision respecting the assumed relation. Thus, 
I say, it is at first sight; — but should any one look 
deeper into the matter, then would such an one, — 
inasmuch as the inward consciousniess embraces even 
the outward sense itself; since we are conscious of 
the seeing, hearing, or feeUng, but can by no means, 
on the other hand, see, hear, or feel our consciousness; 
and thus, even in the immediate fact, consciousness 
assumes the higher place :— such an one, I say, would 
find it much more natural to make the internal Con- 
sciousness the chief thing, and the external Sense the 
subordinate thing ; to explain the latter by the former; 
to control and try the latter by the former ; — and not 
the reverse. 

Now how does the common mode of thought pro- 
ceed in this matter? To it, the outward Sense is, 
without further inquiry, the first thing, the immediate 
touchstone of truth : — whatever is seen, heard, or felt, 
that 18, just because it is seen, heard, or felt. The 
Thought, or inward consciousness of the object, comes 
afterwards, as an empty addition which is scarcely to 
be noticed at all, and is quite willingly dispensed with 
if it do not force itself upon our observation ; and a 
thing is never seen or heard because it is thought, 
but it is thought because it is seen or heard, and that 
imder the guidance and control of this seeing and 
hearing. The last-mentioned perverse and absurd 
modem philosophy, as the pecuKar organ and voice 
of common opinion, comes forward and unblushingly 
opens its mouth and says: — " Outward sense is the 
only source of reality, and all our knowledge is founded 



44 LECTURE III. 

upon experience alone;" — as if this were an axiom 
against which no one could adduce a single objection. 
How is it that this common mode of thought, and its 
guardians, have so easily got over the causes of doubt 
which we have just noticed, and even the positive 
grounds for the adoption of the opposite relation, as 
if they had not even an existence? Why does the 
opposite view, which, even at the first glance, and as 
yet without any deeper investigation, recommends itself 
as much more natural and probable, — that the whole 
outward Sense, and all its objects, are founded upon 
universal Thought, and that a sensible perception is 
only possible in Thought, and as something thought, 
as a determination of the general consciousness, but by 
no means in itself, and separated from consciousness, — 
I mean, the view that it is not true that we see, hear, 
and feel directly, but only that we are conscious of 
seeing, hearing, feeling, — why does this view which 
we profess, and which we recognise with absolute cer- 
tainty to be the only right one, while we also clearly 
perceive its opposite to be a palpable absurdity, -why 
does this view, or even the possibiKty of it, remain 
wholly concealed from the common mode of thought ? 
It may easily be explained: — The judgment of this 
mode of thought is the necessary expression of its 
actual degree of life. To those who cannot go beyond 
this mode of thought, Life dwells, in the meantime, 
only in outward Sense, the remotest extremity of the 
nascent spiritual Life ; in outward Sense they are pre- 
sent with their whole amount of being, their most vital 
existence ; in it alone they feel, love, and enjoy ; and, 
of necessity, where their heart is, there is their faith 
also: — in Thought, on the contrary, Life does not 



POPULAR DIFFICULTIES CONSIDERED. 45 

spring forth at once before them as Hying flesh and 
blood, but seems to them an inchoate mass; and 
therefore Thought appears to be a heterogeneous mist, 
belonging neither to themselves nor to the matter in 
hand. Should they ever come so far as to attain a 
more intense existence in Thought than in seeing or 
hearing, and to feel and enjoy in it more keenly than 
in Sense, then would their judgment also be different 
from what it is. 

Thus is Thought, even in its lowest manifestation, 
degraded and made of no account by the common 
view of things, because this common view does not 
place the seat of its Life in Thought, — has not even 
extended its spiritual feelers thus far. Thought in its 
lowest manifestation, I said; — for that, and nothing 
more, is this thought of an external object, which 
has an antitype, a competitor for truth, in an out- 
ward sensible perception. Thought, in its high and 
proper form, is that which creates its own purely 
spiritual object absolutely from itself, without the aid 
of any outward sense, and without any reference what- 
ever to such a sense. In ordinary Ufe this mode of 
thought presents itself when, for example, the question 
arises with regard to the origin of the World, or of 
the Human Race; or regarding the internal laws of 
Nature ; where, in the first case, it is clear that at the 
creation of the world, and before the appearance of 
the human race, there was no observer present to 
declare his experience; and, in the second case, the 
question is not regarding any phenomenon at all, 
but regarding that in which all individual phenomena 
coincide ; and that which is to be evolved is not any 
visible event, but a mental necessity which not only is, 



46 LECTURE III. 

but is thuSy and cannot he otherwise: — that is, an ob- 
ject proceeding entirely from Thought itself: — which 
first point I beg of you thoroughly to understand and 
recognise. 

In matters pertaining to this higher Thought, the 
adherents of the common view proceed after this wise : 
— they let others invent, or, where they are possessed 
of greater power, they invent for themselves, by means 
of vagrant and lawless thought, or, as it is called, 
fancy, one out of many possible ways in which the 
actual fact in question may have arisen, — in the lan- 
guage of the schools they make an hypothesis : — they 
then consult their desire, fear, hope, or whatever may 
be their ruling passion for the time, and should it 
assent, the fiction becomes estabUshed as a firm and 
unalterable truth. One of the many possible ways, 
I said ; and this is the leading characteristic of the 
proceeding we have described: — but it is necessary 
that this expression should be correctly understood. 
In itself, namely, it is not true that anything whatever 
is possible in many different ways; but everything 
that is, is possible, actual, and necessary at the same 
time, only in one, perfectly fixed and definite way: — 
and herein, indeed, Ues the fundamental error of this 
proceeding, that it assumes many different possibilities, 
from which it then, with a partial spirit of sectarian- 
ism, embraces one only, without being able to verify 
this one by anything but its own incUnation. This 
proceeding is what we call Opinion, in opposition to 
true Thought Opinion, hke Thought itself, possesses, 
as its domain, the whole region lying beyond sensuous 
experience; this region it fills with the productions 
of fancy, either that of others or its own, to which 



DEFINITION OF BEING AND EXISTENCE. 47 

desire alone gives substance and duration; and all 
this happens simply and solely because the seat of its 
spiritual Life is as yet no higher than in the extremities 
of blind desire or aversion. 

True Thought proceeds in a different way in fillin g 
up this super-sensual region. It does not invent, but 
spontaneously perceives, — not one possibility among 
many, — but the one and only possible, actual, and 
necessary mode ; and this is confirmed not by a proof^ 
lying beyond itself, but contains immediately within 
itself its own confirmation ; and, as soon as it is con- 
ceived, becomes evident to Thought itself as the only 
possible and absolutely certain Truth, establishing itself 
in the soul with an immovable certainty and evidence 
that completely destroys even the possibiUty of doubt. 
Since this certainty, as we have said, attaches itself at 
once to the living act of Thought, in its immediate 
vitaUty, and to this only, it follows that every one 
who would become a partaker in this certainty, must 
himself, and in his own person, think the Truth, and 
cannot commit to any other the accomplishment of 
this business in his stead. Only this preliminary re* 
mark I desired to make before proceeding, as I now 
do, to our mutual realization of true Thought in the 
highest elements of Knowledge. 

The first task of such Thought is to conceive of 
Being in itself with strict exactitude. I approach 
this conception thus; I say: — Being (Seyn) proper 
and true Being, does not arise, does not proceed, does 
not come forth out of nothingness. For everything 
which thus arises, you are compelled to assume a pre- 
vious causal being, by virtue of which the other at 
first arose. If you hold that, at some earUer period, 



48 LECTUKB III. 

this second being has itself arisen in its turn, then you 
are again compeUed to assume a third being by virtue 
of which the second arose; and should you attribute 
a beginning to the third, then you are compelled to 
assume a fourth, — and so on for ever. You must in 
every case at last arrive at a Being that has not thus 
uriaen, and which, therefore, requires no other thing 
to account for its being, but which is absolutely 
through itself, by itself, and from itself. On this 
Being, to which you must at last ascend &om out the 
series of created things, you must now and hencefor- 
ward fix your attention ; and then it will become evi- 
dent to you, if you have entered fully with me into 
the preceding thoughts, that you can only conceive of 
the true Being as a Being by itseli^ from itself, and 
through itself 

In the second place I add : — that within this Being 
nothing new can arise, nothing can alter its «hape, 
nor shift nor change ; but that as it is now, so has it 
been from all eternity, and so it endures unchangeably 
in an eternity. For, since it is through itself alone, 
so is it, — completely, without division, and without 
abatement, — all that, through itself, it can be and must 
be. Were it to become something new in time, then 
must it either have been previously hindered, by some 
being foreign to itself, from becoming this something ; 
or it must become this something new through the 
power of a being foreign to itself, which now for the 
first time begins to exert an influence upon it : — both of 
which suppositions stand in direct contradiction to its 
absolute independence and self-sufficiency. And thus 
it will become evident to you, if you have thoroughly 
comprehended these thoughts, that Being can only be 



DEFINITION OF BEING AND EX-ISTENCE. 49 

conceiTed of as absolutely One, not as Many ; only as 
a self-comprehensive, self-sufficient, and absolutely un- 
changeable Unity. 

By this course of thought, — and this is my third 
point, — you arrive ordy at a Being {Seyn) shut up, 
concealed, wholly exhausted in itself; — you do not, 
by any means, arrive at an Ex-istence {Daaeyn;^) — 
I say to an Ex-istence, manifestation, or revelation of 
this Being. I am most anxious that you should com- 
prehend this at once; and you will imdoubtedly do 
so, when you have strictly considered this idea of 
Being, now for the first time set forth, and have thus 
become conscious in yourselves of what is contained in 
this thought, and what is not contained in it. The 
natural illusion which may obscure your minds against 
the desired insight, I shaU very soon examine. 

To explain this more ftdly: — You perceive that 1 
distinguish Being (%n)— essential, self-comprehended 
Being — from Ex-istence {Daseyri) ,and represent these 
two thoughts as entirely opposed to each other, — ^as 
not even indirectly connected with each other. This 
distinction is of the weightiest importance ; and only 
through it can clearness and certainty be attained in 
the highest elements of Knowledge. What Ex-istence 
{Daaeyn) really is, will best be made evident by actual 
contemplation of this Ex-istence. I say, therefore : — 



* The English language does not contain terms by which the op- 
position of the German " Seyn " and " Dctaeyn ** can be expressed 
with the distinctness of the original. " Being " and " j^ic-istence '* 
are here adopted as the nearest approach to a correct translation 
that our language admits of, although the awkwardness of tbe 
expression is obvious, and the strict philosophical meaning here at- 
tached to those terms is unknown in their common use. — Tr. 



50 LECTURE III. 

Essentially and at the root, the Ex-istence of Being is 
the consciousness or conception of Being ; as may be 
made clear at once in the use of the word " w " when 
applied to any particular object, — for example, to this 
waJl. For, what is this " z^ " in the proposition, ** The 
wall is?" It is obviously not the wall itself and iden- 
tical with it ; it does not even assume that character, 
but it distinguishes the waU, by the third person, as 
independent of itself; it thus only assumes to be an 
outward characteristic of essential Being, an image or 
picture of such Being, — or, as we have expressed it 
above, and as it is most distinctly expressed, the im- 
mediate, outward Ex-istence of the wall, — tw its Being 
out of its Being. (It is admitted that the whole of this 
experiment demands the most refined abstraction, and 
the keenest inward observation ; and it may be added, 
as the proof, that no one has thoroughly performed 
the task, to whom it has not become evident that the 
whole, and particularly the last expression, is perfectly 
exact.) 

The common mode of thought, it is true, is not 
wont to remark this distinction ; and it may well be 
that what I have now said may seem to many some- 
thing wholly new and unheard of. The reason of 
which is, that their love and affection fly at once and 
without pause to the object itself, interest themselves 
only with it, and cast themselves entirely into it, and 
have no time to tarry by the " is " to consider its 
significance, so that to them it is wholly lost. Hence 
it usually happens that, leaping over the Ex-istence 
(Daseyn), we believe that we have arrived at Being 
(Seyn) itself; while nevertheless we forever remain in 
the fore-court, in the Ex-istence: — and this common 



DEFINITION OF BEING AND EX-ISTENCE. 51 

delusion might render the proposition which we have 
submitted to you above, at first sight, dark and un- 
inteUigible. In our present inquiry, however, every- 
thing depends on our comprehending this proposition 
at once, and henceforth giving it due attention. 

We said that the Consciousness of Being, the "is" 
to the Being, is itself the Ex-istence (Dctseyn:) — 
leaving out of sight, in the mean time, the supposition 
that Consciousness may be only one among other pos- 
sible forms, modes, and kinds of Ez-istence, and that 
there may be many other, perhaps an infinite variety 
of, such forms, modes, and kinds of Ex-istence. This 
supposition, however, must be dismissed : — in the first 
place, because we here desire not to accumulate mere 
opinions, but truly to think; and secondly, with re- 
ference to its consequences, -for with such a possibiUty 
remaining, our union with the Absolute, as the only 
source of Blessedness, could never be attained; but 
there would rather be placed, between the Absolute 
and us, an immeasurable chasm, as the true source 
of all unblessedness. 

We have therefore to make it manifest to you in 
thought, — which is our fourth point, — that, the Con- 
sciousness of Being is the only possible form and mode 
of the Ex-istence {Daseyn) of Being (Seyn;) and, 
consequently, is itself immediately and absolutely this 
Ex-istence of Being. We conduct you to this insight 
in the following way: — Being {Seyn) — as such, as 
Being, as abiding, unchangeable Being, without in 
any respect laying aside its absolute character, and 
intermingUng or blending itself with Ex-istence — shall 
ex-ist. Hence it must, in itself, be distinct from Ex- 
istence, and opposed to it ; and indeed — since besides 



52 LECTURE III. 

the absolute Being {Seyn) itself there is nothing else 
whatever but its Ex-istence {Daseyn) — this distinction 
and opposition must be manifest in the Ex-istence 
{Daseyn) itself; which, more clearly expressed, is 
equivalent to the following : — Ex-istence {Daseyn) 
must apprehend, recognise, and image forth itself as 
mere Ex-istence ; and, opposed to itself, must assume 
and image forth an absolute Being {Seyn) whose mere 
Ex-istence it is; it must thus, by its own nature, 
as opposed to another and an absolute existence, an- 
nihilate itself: — which is precisely the character of 
mere representation, conception, or Consciousness of 
Being, as you have already seen in our exposition of 
the " is'' And thus it is clear, if we have succeeded 
in making these thoughts thoroughly inteUigible to 
you, that the Ex-istence of Being must necessarily be 
a Consciousness of itself — of Ex-istence — as a mere 
image or representation of Absolute, Self- existent 
Being, and can be nothing else than that. 

That such is the case, and that Knowledge* or Con- 
sciousness is the absolute Ex-istence {Daseyn), — or, 
as you may now rather wish to say, — the manifesta- 
tion and sevelation of Being {Seyn) in its only possible 
form : — this may be distinctly understood and seen by 
Knowledge itself, as we have now seen it. But — and this 
is our fifth point — this Knowledge can, by no means, 
in itself, understand or see how itself arises, and how 
from out the inward, self-comprehensive Being {Seyn) 
an Ex-istence {Daseyn), manifestation or revelation 

* The reader will observe that in this and the succeeding lectures 
the word " "Wissen," which is here rendered by " Knowledge/* is 
used in the sense of " Cognition/' to express the conadoua act of 
knowing, and not either the olject or the result of that act. — Tr, 



DEFINITION OF BEING AND EX-ISTENCE. 53 

can proceed; — as indeed we may distinctly perceive, 
by reference to our third point, that such a necessary 
evolution is wholly beyond our conception. The reason 
of this is, that Ex-istence, as we have already shown, 
cannot be without apprehending, recognising, and as- 
suming itself, because such self-conception is insepar- 
able from its nature; and thus Knowledge, by the 
very absoluteness of its Ex-istence and its dependence 
on that Ex-istence, is cut off from all possibiKty of 
passing beyond it, or of conceiving and tracing itself 
previous to that Ex-istence. It is, for itself and in 
itself, and so far well ; but wherever it is, it finds itself 
already there, and that in a certain and definite mode, 
which it must assume just as it is presented to it, but 
which it can by no means explain, nor declare how 
and whereby it has become so. This unchangeably 
determined mode of the Ex-istence of Knowledge, 
which can be only apprehended by immediate com- 
prehension and perception, is the inward and truly real 
Life of Knowledge, 

But notwithstanding that this true and real Life 
of Knowledge cannot explain itself to Knowledge, as 
regards the definite mode in which it has ^arisen, yet 
it is susceptible of a general interpretation to Know- 
ledge; and we may understand and perceive with abso- 
lute certainty what it is according to its true inward 
nature ; — which is our sixth point. I lead you to this 
insight thus : — What we set forth above, as our fourth 
point, — that Ex-istence is necessarily Consciousness, 
and all that is connected with this principle, follows 
from mere Ex-istence as such, and the conception of 
such Ex-istence. Now, this Ex-istence (Daseyn) itsetf 
is, resting and reposing on itself alone; previous to any 

F2 



54 LECTURE III. 

conception of itself, and inseparable from every such 
conception, — as we have just proved; and this its 
being, its reality, which can only be immediately per- 
ceived, — we have called its Life. Whence has it then 
this being, so completely independent of its concep- 
tion of itself, and of the bemg which arises from that 
conception, — nay, rather preceding these, and first 
rendering them even possible? We have said: — It 
is the Uving and efficient Ex-istence of the Absolute 
itself which alone has power to he and to eccist, and 
beside which nothing is, nor truly eaists. Now as the 
Absolute can only be through itself, so also can it only 
exist through itself; and as it, in its very self, and 
nothing else in its stead, must be, — since indeed no- 
thing else out of it has power either to be or to exist, 
— so does it easist even as it is in itself, complete, un- 
divided, without diminution, without variableness or 
change, as Absolute Unity, as it is in its own inward 
and essential nature. Thus the actual Life of Know- 
ledge is, at bottom, the inward Being and Nature of 
the Absolute itself, and nothing else ; and between the 
Absolute or God, and Knowledge in its deepest roots, 
there is nb division, but both merge completely into 
one. 

And thus we have already attained a point fi^m 
which our previous propositions become clearer, and 
light spreads over our future way. That any living Ex- 
istence should be wholly cut off from God, — all Kving 
Ex-istence, as we have seen, being necessarily Life and 
Consciousness, and the dead and unconscious having no 
place in Ex-istence, — ^that any living Ex-istence should 
be wholly cut off from God, is guarded against, and 
is absolutely impossible; for only through the Ex-istence 



DEFINITION OF BEING AND EX-ISTBNCE. 55 

of God in it, is that Ex-istence of God maintained; 
and were it possible that God should disappear from 
within it, then God himself would thereby disappear 
from Ex-istence. In the lower grades of spiritual life, 
this Divine Ex-istence is seen only through obscure 
coverings, and amid confused phantasmagoria, which 
have their origin in the spiritual organs with which 
man looks upon himself and upon* Being ; but to gaze 
upon it bright and unveiled, as indeed the Divine Life 
and Ex-istence, and to bathe our whole being in this 
Life with full enjoyment and love— this is ttie True, 
the unspeakably Blessed Life. 

It is ever, we said, the Ex-istence (Daaeyn) of the 
Absolute and Divine Being (Seyn) that " w " in all 
life ; by which expression ** all Life," we here mean 
the universal Life according to the law spoken of at 
the beginning of this lecture, which in this respect 
cannot be otherwise than as it is. La the lower grades 
of the spiritual life of man, however, that Divine 
Being (Seyn) as such, does not reveal itself to Con- 
sciousness ; but in the peculiar central-point of spirituaT 
life, that Divine Being, in its own express nature, 
does reveal itself to Consciousness ; as, for example, I 
assume that it has revealed itself to us. But, that 
it reveals itself as such to Consciousness, can mean 
nothing else than that it assumes the form which we 
have already seen to be the necessary form of Ex-ist- 
ence and Consciousness, — that, namely, of an image, 
representation or conception which gives itself out only 
as a conception, and not by any means as the thing 
itself. Immediately, in its true essential nature, and 
without any image or representation, it is at all times 
present in the actual life of man, only unperoeiv^ ; 



56 LECTURE III. 

and it continues there present as before, after it has 
been perceiyed ; only it is then, besides, recognised in 
an image or representation. This representative form 
is the essential nature of Thought ; and in particular 
the Thought we are here considering bears, in its 
sufficiency for its own support and confirmation, the 
character of Absoluteness ; and thereby approves itself 
as pure, true, and absolute Thought. — And thus it is 
made evident on all sides, that only in pure Thought 
can our union with God be recognised. 

We have abeady said, but must yet again expressly 
inculcate it upon you, and commend it to your earnest 
attention, that as Being (Seyn) is One and not Mani- 
fold, and as it is at once complete in itself, without 
variation or change, and thus an essential and absolute 
Unity, — so also is Ex-istence {Daseyn) or Conscious- 
ness — since it only exists through Being, and is only 
the Ex-istence of Being — likewise an absolute, eternal, 
invariable, and unchanging Unity. So it is, with ab- 
solute necessity, in itself; — and so it remains in pure 
Thought, There is nothing whatever in Ex-istence but 
immediate and Hving Thought : — Thought, I say, but 
by no means a thinking svhstcmce, a dead body in 
which thought inheres, — ^with which no-thought indeed 
a wo-thinker is full surely at hand: — Thought, I say, 
and also the real Life of this Thought, which at bot- 
tom is the Divine Life ; both of which — Thought and 
this its real Life — are molten together into one inward 
organic Unity ; like as, outwardly, they are one simple, 
identical, eternal, and unchangeable Unity. Neverthe- 
less there arises, opposed to this latter outward Unity, 
the appearance of a Manifold in Thought, partly be- 
cause there are many thinking subjects, and partly on 



DEFINITION OF BEINO AND EX-ISTENCE. 57 

account of the infinite series of objects upon which 
the thought of these subjects must eternally proceed. 
This appearance even arises before pure Thought and 
the Blessed Life in it, and Thought itself cannot forbid 
the presence of this appearance ; but in no way does 
Thought believe in this appearance, nor love it, nor' 
attempt to find enjoyment in it. On the other hand, 
the lower life, in all its inferior grades, believes in 
every appearance of this Manifold and in the Manifold 
itself, runs forth in vagrant dissipation upon this Mani- 
fold, and seeks in it for peace and enjoyment of itself, 
which nevertheless it will never find in that way. This 
remark may, in the first place, explain the picture 
which we drew in our first lecture of the True Life 
and the Apparent Life. To the outward eye, these 
two opposite modes of Life are very similar to each 
other ; both proceed upon the same common objects, 
which are perceived by both in the same way; — in- 
wardly, however, they are very different. The True 
Life does not even believe in the reality of this Mani- 
fold arid Changeable, but it believes only in its Un- 
changeable and Eternal Original, in the Divine Essence; 
— with all its thought, its love, its obedience, its self- 
enjoyment, for ever lost in, and blended with that 
Original : — the Apparent Life, on the contrary, neither 
knows nor comprehends any Unity whatsoever, but 
even regards the Manifold and Perishable as the True 
Being, and satisfies itself with it as such. In the 
second place, this remark imposes upon us the task of 
setting forth the true ground why that which, accord- 
ing to our doctrine, is in itself absolutely One, and 
remains One in True Life and Thought, does never- 
theless in an appearance, which we must yet admit to 



58 LECTURE III. 

be permanent and indestructible, become transmuted 
into a Manifold and Changeable ; — the true ground of 
this transmutation, I say, we must at least set forth, 
and distinctly announce to you, although the clear 
demonstration of it may be inaccessible to popular 
communication. The exposition of this ground of the 
Manifold and Changeable, with the &rther appKcation 
of what we have said to-day, shall form the subject 
of our next discourse, to which I now respectfully 
invite you. 



(59) 



LECTURE IV. 

CONDITIONS OF THE BLESSED LIFE : — DOCTRINE OF 

BEING: — MANIFESTATION OF THE ONE DIVINE 

BEING IN CONSCIOUSNESS AS A MANIFOLD 

EXISTENCE, OB WORLD. 

Let us begin the business of to-day with a survey of 
our purpose in these discourses, as well as of what has 
now been accomplished for that purpose. 

My conviction is, that man is not destined to misery, 
but that he may become a partaker in peace, tranquil- 
Hty and Blessedness here below, everywhere, and for 
ever, if he but will to be so ; this Blessedness, how- 
ever, cannot be superadded to him by any outward 
power, nor by any miracle of an outward power, but 
he must lay hold of it for himself, and v^ith his own 
hands. The source of all misery among men is their 
vagrancy in the Manifold and Changeable; the sole 
and absolute condition of the Blessed Life is the ap- 
prehension of the One and Eternal v^ith inward love 
and enjojnnent; although this Unity is indeed only 
apprehended by us in a picture or representation, and 
we can, by no means, in reality ourselves attain this 
Unity, nor transform ourselves into it. 

The proposition which we have thus laid down, I 
would now, for the first time, bring home to your 



60 LECTURE IV. 

minds in clear insight, and thoroughly convince you 
of its truth. We here aim at instruction and enlight- 
enment, which alone have enduring value; not at a 
mere fiigitive emotion, or awakening of the fancy, which 
for the most part passes away vdthout leaving a trace 
behind it. For the attainment of this clear insight, 
which we here strive to reach, the following steps are 
indispensably requisite: — FivBt, that we should con- 
ceive of Being {Seyn) as absolutely by and through 
itself alone, as one, and as invariable and unchanging. 
This conception of Being is by no means an exclusive 
possession of the schools, but every Christian who in 
his childhood has received a sound religious instruc- 
tion has even then, in the Christian Doctrine of the 
Divine Nature, become acquainted with our conception 
of Being. Secondly, another requisite for this insight 
is the conception that we, the inteUigent beings, with 
respect to what we are in ourselves, are by no means 
this Absolute Being ; but that we are nevertheless, in 
the innermost root of our existence, essentially con- 
nected with it, since otherwise we should have no 
power to exist at all. This latter conception may be 
more or less clear, particularly in regard to the mode 
of this our relation to the Godhead, We have set 
forth this relation in the greatest clearness with which, 
in our opinion, it can be invested in a popular dis- 
course, thus : — Besides God himself, there is truly, and 
in the proper sense of the word, no other Ex-istence 
whatever but — Bjiowledge ; and this Bjiowledge is the 
Divine Ex-istence {Daseyn) itself, absolutely and im- 
mediately; and, in so far as we are Bjiowledge, we 
are ourselves, in the deepest root of our being, the 
Divine Ex-istence. All other things that appear to us 



CONDITIONS OJF THE BLESSED LIFE. 61 

as Ex-istences — outward objects, bodies, souls, we our- 
selves in so far as we ascribe to ourselves a separate 
and independent being — do not truly and in them- 
selves exist ; but they exist only in Consciousness and 
Thought, as that of which we are conscious or of 
which we think, and in no other way whatever. This, 
I say, is the clearest expression by which, in my opi- 
nion, this Knowledge can be popularly communicated 
to men. But should any one be unable to understand 
even this expression, — yea, should he even be unable 
to apprehend or conceive anything whatever regarding 
the mode of this relation, yet would he not thereby 
be excluded from the Blessed Life, nor even hindered 
in any way from entering upon it. But on the other 
hand, according to my absolute conviction, the follow-^ 
ing are indispensable requisites to the attainment of 
the Blessed Life: — (1.) That we should have fixed 
principles and convictions respecting God and our re- 
lation to him, which do not merely float in our memory, 
without our partaking of them, as something we have 
learned from others ; but which are really true to us, 
living and active in ourselves. For even in this does 
Religion consist: — and he who does not possess such 
principles in such a way, has no Rehgion, and there- 
fore no Being, nor Ex-istence, nor true Self at all ; but 
he passes away, like a shadow, amid the Manifold and 
Perishable. (2.) Another requisite to the Blessed Life 
is that this living Religion within us should at least 
go so far as to convince us entirely of our own No- 
thingness in ourselves, and of our Being only in God 
and through God ; that we should at least fed this 
relationship continually and without interruption ; and 
that, even although it should not be distinctly ex- 

G 



62 LECTURE IV. 

pressed either in thought or language, it should yet 
be the secret spring, the hidden principle, of all our 
thoughts, feelings, emotions, and desires. That these 
things are indispensable requisites to a Blessed life, 
is, I say, my absolute conyiction ; and this conviction 
is here declared for the benefit of those who already 
assume the possibility of a Blessed Life, who stand in 
need of it or of confirmation in it, and who, on that 
account, desire to receive guidance thereto. But not- 
withstanding this, we can not only frankly admit that 
some may make shift without Behgion, without True 
Ex-istence, without inward peace and Blessedness, and 
make sure of coming off excellently weU without these, 
as indeed may be true ; but we are also ready freely 
to concede and pay to such a man all possible honour 
and merit which, without BeUgion, he may be able to 
acquire. We embrace this opportunity frankly to con- 
fess that, neither in the speculative nor in the popular 
form of our doctrine, can we compel any man, or force 
our knowledge upon him ; nor would we wish to do 
so even if we could. 

The most decisive result of our former lecture, 
which we intend to follow out to-day, was this : — God 
not only is, concealed within himself, but he also ex* 
ists, and manifests himself; and this his immediate 
Ex-istence {Daaeyn) is necessarily Knowledge ; — which 
latter necessity may be seen and understood in Know- 
ledge itsel£ In this his Ex-istence (Daaeyn) he ex-ists 
— as is also necessary, and may in like manner be seen 
to be necessary — he ex-ists, I say, as he is absolutely 
in himself, in his own Being {Seyn), vdthout changing 
in aught by this passage from Being {Seyn) to Ex- 
istence (Daseyn), without any internal division or other 



DOGTRINE OF BEING. dS 

separaticHi between these two states. Qod is in him- 
self One and not Manj ; he if in himself identical, 
the same, without change or variation; he eshkts pre- 
dsely as he t$ in himself and therefore he necesswrily 
ecJt, as One, without change or variation j-and 
as Knowledge, or we ourselyes, are this Divine Ex- 
istence, so also in us, in so far as we are this Divine 
Ex-istence, can there be no room for variation or 
chan^, no maltiphcity nor variety, neither division, 
d^erence, nor op^sition._So Jst it be, and oOierw 
wise it cannot be : — theref(»re it is so. 

But in Reality we nevertheless find this multipHeily 
and variety, these divisions, differences, and oppositions 
of Being, and in Being, — ^which in Thought are cleadj 
seen to be absohitely impossible ; and hence arisee the 
task of reconciling this contradiction betweoi our per- 
ceptions of BeaHtT, and pure Thought; of showing 

oth^, and so both prove true ; and, in particular, of 
80 solving this problem timt it may become obvious 
whence, and firom what principle, this Multiplicity arises 
in the simple Unity of Being. 

In the first place, and before everything else, let us 
ask: — Who is it that raises the question as to the 
source of the Manifold, and seeks such an insight into 
this source as may enable him to see the Manifold in 
its first outgoings, and thus obtain a knowledge of th« 
mode of the transition ? It is not firm and unwavering 
Faith. Faith briefly disposes of the matter thua: — 
'* There is absolutely but the One, Unchangeable and 
Eternal, and nothing besidea Him ; hence all that is 
fleeting and changeable full surely i» not, and its ap- 
pearance is but an empty show ; — ^this I know, whether 



64 LECTURE IV. 

I can explain this appearance or not; my assurance 
IS as little strengthened in the former case, as it is 
weakened in the latter." This Faith reposes immov- 
ably in the fact of its insight, without feeling the 
want of thewioc?^; — it is content with the "That" 
without asking for the " How." Thus, for example, 
in the Gospel of John, Christianity does not indeed 
answer this question ; it does not even once touch it, 
or only wonders at the presence of the Perishable, 
having this firm Faith and assurance that only the 
One 15, and that the Perishable is not. And thus any 
one amongst us who is a partaker in this Faith does 
not raise the question ; hence he does not need our 
answer to it, and it may even be a matter of in- 
difference to him, as regards the Blessed Life, whether 
he comprehend our answer to it or not. 

But this question is raised by those who have hither- 
to either believed only in the Manifold, and have not 
raised themselves even to a presentiment of the One, 
or else have wandered to and fro between both views, 
and the uncertainty in which of the two they should 
establish themselves, and which reject altogether ; and 
these can only by means of an answer to this ques- 
tion attain the insight which is necessary to the 
development of the Blessed Life. For such I must 
answer the question, and for them it is necessary that 
they should comprehend my answer. 

Thus then stands the matter: — In so far as the 
Divine Ex-istence {Daseyn) is itself its own immediate, 
living, and Qf^Q\eniEx-i8ting{d(iS€yen)y — ex-isting, Isay, 
indicating thereby an act of Ex-istence, — it is wholly 
lil^e to the inward Being (Seyn), and is therefore an 
invariable, unchanging Unity, altogether incapable of 



DOGTRINB OF BBINO. 65 

Multiplicity. Hence the principle of opposition cannot 

^I have here, be it remembered, a double purpoae : 

partly, to present to some of you, for the firat time 
and in a popular way, the Knowledge in questioii; 
partly, for others among you who have already ac- 
quired this Ejiowledge in the scientific way, to combine 
into one single beam and centre of light that; which 
they have formerly se^i in 6q)arate individual rays ; 
and I therefore now express myself with the strictest 

precision, the principle of opposition, I say, cannot 

fell immediately within this act of the Divine Ex- 
istence, but must lie beyond U; but this, however, in 
such wise that the outward opposition shall be evident 
as immediately connected with the living act, and 
necessarily flowing from it; but by no means as es- 
tablishing an interval between God and us, and so 
effectuating our irreversible exclusion from him* I 
conduct you to an insight into this principle of Mul- 
plicity thus : — 

1. Whatever the Absolute Being {Seyn) or God is, 
that he is wholly and immediately by and through 
himself; — among other things, he ex-^sts, manifests 
and reveals himself; — this Ex-istence (JDo^eyn), and 
here is the important point, this Ex-istence is thus 
also by and through himself, and only in his imme- 
diate and self-subsistent Being, — that is, ^i immediate 
Life and YitaUty. In this his act of Ex-istence he is 
present with his whole power of existing ; and only in 
tills, his efficient and Hving act, does his immediate 
Ex-istence consist: — and in this respect it ia com- 
plete, one and imchangeable. 

2. Being {Seyn) and Ex-istence {DctBeyn) are here 
wholly blended together and iost in each other ; for 

02 



66 LECTURE IV. 

to his Being, by and through himself, belongs his 
Ex-istence, and this Ex-istence can have no other 
ground or source; while, on the other hand, to his 
Ex-istence belongs everything that appertains to his 
inward and essential Being or Nature. The whole dis- 
tinction, set forth in our former lecture, between Being 
{Seyri) and Ex-istence {Daseyn), and their separation 
from each other, is thus shown to be only for us, and 
only a result of our limited nature ; and by no means 
to have any place, immediately and of itself, in the 
Divine Ex-istence. 

3. I said ftirther, in the preceding lecture, that, 
in mere Ex-istence itself, Being (Seyn) cannot be 
blended with Ex-istence {Daseyn), but that they must 
be distinguished from each other ; so that Being may 
appear as Being, and the Absolute as Absolute. 
This distinction, — this " as," — this characterization of 
the elements distinguished, is in itself an absolute 
division, and the principle of all subsequent division 
and multipHcity, as may be shortly made evident to 
you in the following way : — 

(a.) In the first place, the " as," the character- 
ization of the two elements, does not immediately 
give their Being (Seyn); — it gives only what they 
are, i. e, their description and character ; — it give§ 
them in representation, and indeed gives a mixed 
picture or representation of both, reciprocally in- 
terpenetrating and determining each other, since 
the one can only be apprehended and character- 
ized by means of the other, as not being that 
which the other is; — the other again being dis- 
tinguished as not being that which the former 
' is. In this distinction we have the genesis of 



DOCTRINE OF BEING. 67 

Knowledge and Consciousness ; or, what is the 
same thing, representation, description, and cha- 
racterization, mediate perception and recognition 
by means of character and sign ; and in this dis- 
tinction Hes the peculiar and fundamental prin- 
ciple of Bjiowledge. It is purely a relation: — a 
a relation of two things, however, does not lie 
wholly either in the one or the other, but between 
the two ; it is a third element, as is shown in the 
peculiar nature of Knowledge as something wholly 
distinct from Being. 

(6.) This distinction occurs in Ex-istence (X)a- 
seyn) itself, and proceeds from it ; and as the dis- 
tinction does not embrace its object immediately, 
but only the form and character of the object, so 
Ex-istence does not apprehend itself immediately 
in this distinction, — that is, in Consciousness, — 
but only a picture or representation of itself. It 
does not conceive of itself immediately as it is ; 
but it conceives of itself only within the limits 
which are set to Conception by the absolute nature 
of Conception itself. Popularly expressed, this is 
the following : — We conceive of ourselves only in 
part, and that not as we really are in ourselves ; 
and the cause that we do not conceive of the 
Absolute does not He in the Absolute itself, but 
in the Conception which cannot even conceive of 
itself. Were it able to conceive of itself, then 
would it be able to conceive of the Absolute, for 
in its own Being, beyond the limits of Conception, 
it is itself the Absolute. 

(c.) Thus it is in Consciousness, as a distinction, 
that the primitive essence of the Divine Being 



68 LECTURE IT. 

and £z-istence, suffers a change. What then is 
the one absolute and inyariable character of this 
change? 

Consider the following: — Ejiowledge, as a dis- 
tinction, is a diaracterization of the thing distin- 
guished; everj characteristic mark, however, is 
itself an assumptiosi of the fixed, abiding, and 
unmoying Being and Presence of that which it 
characterizes. Thus, hj the act of Conception, 
that which, in itself, is the immediate Divine life 
in life, and which we have previously so described, 
becomes a fixed and abiding substance: — the 
schools would add an objective substance, but this 
arises firom the other and not the reverse. Thus, 
it is the living Divine life that is changed ; and 
a fixed and unmoving substance is the j^rm which 
it assumes in that change ; or in other words, the 
change of immediate life into a fixed and dead 
substance is the fundamental character of that 
change which Conception puts upon Ex-istence. 
This abiding Presence is the characteristic of that 
which we call the World; hence Conception is 
the true World-creator by means of the change, 
arising firom its essential character, of the Divine 
Life into a fixed substance ; and only to Concep- 
tion and in Conception there is a World, as the 
necessary form of Life in Conception; — but be- 
ycmd Conception, — that is, truly and in itself, — 
there is nothing, and in all Eternity there can be 
nothing, but the Living God in his own fulness 
of Life. 

(d.) The World is thus manifest, in its funda- 
mental character, as proceeding firom Conception ; 



DOCTRINE OF BEING. 69 

and this Conception again is nothing but the " as^ 
— the characterization of the Divine Being and Ex- 
istence. But does not this World in Conception, 
and the Conception of it, assume again a new 
fonn?-I mean necessarily so, and with a necessity 
that may be made manifest ? 

In order to answer this question, consider with 
me the following: — Ex-istence (Daseyn) appre- 
hends itself, as I said above, only in representation, 
and with a character distinguishing it from Being 
{Seyn). This it does solely of and through itself, 
and by its own power; and this power is manifest 
to ordinary self-observation, in all concentration, 
attention, and direction of thought to a particular 
object; — in the language of science this inde- 
pendent self-apprehension of Conception is named 
Reflexion, and thus we shall in fixture name it. 
This appUcation of the power of Ex-istence and 
Consciousness arises from the necessity for ^ 
" as" — a characterization of Ex-istence ; and this 
necessity rests immediately on God's Uving act of 
Ex-istence. The foundation of the independence 
and freedom of Consciousness is indeed in God ; 
but even on that account, because it is in God, 
does that independence and freedom truly exist, 
and is not an empty show. Through his own 
Ex-istence, and by its essential nature, God throws 
out from him a part of his Ex-istence, — that is, 
such part of it as becomes self-consciousness, — 
and establishes it in true independence and free- 
dom: — which point, as that which solves the last 
and deepest mistake of speculation, I would not 
here pass over. 



70 LBOTURB IV. 

Ex-istence apprehends iteelf by its own inde- 
pendent power : — ^tihis was the first thing to which 
I wished to draw jour attention here. What 
then arises in this apprehension? This is the 
second thing to which I now desire to direct your 
thoughts. As soon aa it distinctly looks upon 
itself, in its own present existence, there arises 
immediately, in thns turning its attention forcibly 
upon itself, the perception that it is tMs or that, — 
that it bears this or tJiat character ; — and thus — 
here is the general expression of the result which 
I entreat you to weigh weU — thus, in Keflexion 
upon itself does Knowledge, by itself and in virtue 
' of its own nature, give birth to a division in itself; 
since in this act there is apparent not (xolf Enow- 
ledge itself, which would be one, but, at the same 
time, Knowledge as this or that, with this or that 
character or attribute, which adds a second ele- 
ment to the first, and that one arising from the 
first ; — so that the very foundation of Reflexion is 
thus divided into two separate parts. This is the 
essential and fundamental law of Reflexion. 

(«.) Now tiie first and immediate object of ab- 
solute* Reflexion is Ex-istence itself; which, ac- 
cording to the necessary form of Knowledge, as 
before expkined, has been changed from a Uving 
Life into a fixed substance, or a World: — thus 
the first object of absolute Reflexion is the World. 
By reason of the essential form of Reflexion which 
we have just set forth, this World must se- 
parate and divide itself in Reflexion ; so that the 
World, (Mr the abstract abiding Ex-istence, may 
assmne a definite character, and the abstract World 



DOCTRINB OF BBING. 71 

reproduce itseli^ in Reflexion^ under a particular 
shape. This, as we said, lies in Reflezkm itself 
as such; — Reflexion, however, as we have also 
said, is in itself absolutelj free and independent. 
Hence, were this Reflexion inactive, were there 
nothing reflected, — as in consequence of this free- 
dom might be the case, — then there would be 
nothing apparent; but were Reflexion infinitely 
active, were there an endless series of its acts — 
Reflexion upon Reflexion, — as through this free- 
dom might as well be the case, — then to every 
new Reflexion the World would appear in a new 
shape, and thus proceed throughout an Infinite 
Time, which is likewise created only by the ab- 
solute freedom of Reflexion, in an endless course 
of change and transmutation, as an Infinite Ma- 
nifold. As Conception, in the abstract, was seen 
to be the World-creator ; so here, the free act of 
Reflexion is seen to be the creator of Multiplicity, 
and of an infinite Multiplicity, in the World; while 
the World nevertheless, notwithstanding this Mul- 
tipUcity, remains the same, because the abstract 
Conception, in its frmdamental character, remains 
One and the same. 

(/.) And now to combine what we have said 
into one view : — Consciousness, — that is we our- 
selves, — is the Divine Ex-istence (Daseyn) itiself, 
and absolutely one with it. This Divine Ex-istence 
apprehends itself, and thereby becomes Conscious- 
ness ; and its own Being (Seyn) — the true Divine 
Being — becomes a World to it. In this position 
what does this Consciousness contain? I think each 
of you will answer: — " The World and nothing 



72 LECTURE IV. 

but the World." Or does this Consciousness also 
. contain the immediate Divine Life ? I think 
each of you will answer : — " No ; for Conscious- 
ness must necessarily change this immediate Divine 
Life into a World ; and thus, Consciousness being 
supposed, this change is also supposed as accom- 
plished; and Consciousness itself is, by its very 
nature, and therefore without being again conscious 
of itself, the completion of this change. But now, 
where is that immediate Divine Life which, in its 
imimediateness, ought to dwell in Consciousness ; — 
where has it vanished, since, according to our own 
admissions, rendered clearly necessary by our pre- 
vious conclusions, it is irretrievably excluded from 
imimediate Consciousness? We reply: — It has 
not vanished, but it is and abides there, where 
alone it can be, in the hidden and inaccessible 
Being of Consciousness, which no Conception can 
reach; — in that which alone supports Conscious- 
ness, maintains it in Ex-istence, and even makes its 
Ex-istence possible. Li Consciousness, the Divine 
Life is inevitably changed into a fixed and per- 
manent World : — further, every actual Conscious- 
ness is an act of Eeflexion ; the act of Eeflexion, 
however, inevitably divides the One World into 
an infinite variety of shapes, the comprehension 
of which can never be completed, and of which 
therefore only a finite series enters into Conscious- 
ness. I ask : — Where then abides the One World, 
in itself perfect and complete, as the ascertained 
antitype of the likewise perfect and complete 
Divine Life ? — I answer : — It abides there, where 
alone it is, — not in one individual act of Reflexion, 



DOCTRINE OF BEING. 73 

but in the one, absolute, fundamental form of 
Conception; which thou canst never reproduce 
in actual, immediate Consciousness, but only in 
Thought raising itself above Consciousness, — just 
as thou canst likewise reproduce in the same 
Thought the stiU farther removed, and more 
deeply hidden, Divine Life. Where then, — in this 
stream of actual Reflexion, and its world-creation, 
flowing on for ever through ceaseless changes, — 
where then abides the One, Eternal and Un- 
changeable Being {Seyn) of Consciousness mani- 
fested in the Divine Ex-istence {Daseyn)!, It does 
not enter into this stream of change, but only its 
type, image, or representation, enters therein. 

As thy physical eye is a prism in which the 
Ught of the sensuous world, which in itself is pure, 
simple and colourless, breaks itself upon the sur- 
faces of things into many hues, — while neverthe- 
less thou wilt not maintain on that account that 
the light is in itself coloured, but only that, to 
thy eye, and while standing with thy eye in this 
state of reciprocal influence, it separates itself into 
colours, — although thou still canst not see the 
light colourless, but canst only think it colourless, 
to which thought thou givest credence only when 
the nature of thy seeing eye becomes known to 
thee ; — so also proceed in the things of the spi- 
ritual world, and with the vision of thy spiritual 
eye. What thou seest, that thou art ; but thou 
art it not as thou seest it, nor dost thou see it as 
thou art it. Thou art it, unchangeable and pure, 
without colour and without shape. Only Reflex- 
ion, — which likewise thou thyself art, and which 

H 



74 LECTURE IV. 

therefore thou canst never put away from thee, — 
only this causes it to separate before thee into 
innumerable rays and shapes. Biiow therefore that 
it is not in itself thus broken up, and formed, 
and invested with a multiplicity of shapes, but 
that it only seems so in this thy Reflexion, thy 
spiritual eye, by which alone thou canst see, — and 
in reciprocal influence with this Reflexion. — Raise 
thyself above this Appearance, which in Reahty 
can as little be obliterated as the colours from 
before thy physical eye, — raise thyself above this 
Appearance to Thought, let thyself be penetrated 
by it, and thou wilt henceforward have faith in 
it alone. 
So much as has now been said may, in my opinion, 
be contributed through the medium of a popular dis- 
course to the solution of the question : — Whence, — 
since Being in itself must be absolutely One, without 
change or variation, and is evident to Thought as 
such, — whence arises the mutability and change which 
is nevertheless encountered by actual Consciousness? 
Being in itself is indeed One, the one Divine Being ; 
and this alone is the true Reality in all Ex-istence, and 
80 remains in aU Eternity. By Reflexion, which in 
actual Consciousness is indissoluhly united to Being, 
this One Being is broken up into an infinite variety 
of forms. This separation, as we said, is absolutely 
original, and in a^ Consciousness can never be " 
abolished, nor superseded by anything else ; and there- 
fore the visible forms which by this separation are 
imposed upon absolute Reahty, are only discernible in 
actual Consciousness, and so that in the act of observing 
them we assign to them life and endurance; — and 



DOCTRINE OF BEING. 75 

they are by no means discoverable a priori to pure 
Thought. They are simple and absolute Experience, 
which is nothing but Experience ; which no Speculation 
that understands itself will ever attempt or desire to 
lay hold off; and indeed the substance of this Expe- 
rience, with respect to each particular thing, is that 
which absolutely belongs to it alone, and is its indi- 
vidual characteristic, — that which in the whole infi- 
nite course of Time can never be repeated, and which 
can never before have occurred. But the general pro- 
perties or attributes of these forms which are thus 
imposed upon the One Reality by its separation in 
Consciousness, — with reference to their agreement with 
which attributes, classes and species arise, — these may 
be discovered by a priori investigation of the different 
laws of Reflexion, as we have already set forth its one, 
fundamental law ; — and a systematic philosophy ought 
and must do this in a complete and absolutely ex- 
haustive manner. Thus may Matter in Space, — Time, 
— a fixed system of Worlds, — how the substance of 
Consciousness, which in itself can be but One, divides 
itself into a system of separate and apparently inde- 
pendent Individuals, — thus, I say, may these, and all 
things of this kind, be deduced with perfect clearness 
from the laws of Reflexion. ' But these investigations 
are more needful to the attainment of a fundamental 
insight into particular Sciences, than to the develop- 
ment of a Blessed Life. They belong to the scientific 
teaching of Philosophy, as its exclusive property ; and 
they are neither susceptible of popular exposition, nor 
do they stand in need of it. Here, therefore, at this 
indicated point, lies the boundary line which divides 
strict Science from popular Teaching. We have, as 



76 LECTURE IV. 

you see, arrived at that limit ; ^and it may therefore 
be anticipated that our inquiry shall now gradually 
descend to those regions which, at least with respect 
to their objects, are already familiar to us, and which 
we have sometimes even touched upon in thought. 

Besides the division, which we have set forth in to- 
day's lecture, of the World which arises in Conscious- 
ness from out the Divine Life, into a World of infinite 
variety and change, with reference to its form, by 
means of the fundamental law of Reflexion ; there is 
yet another division, inseparably bound up with the 
first, of the same World, not into an Infinite but into 
a Five-fold form, with reference to the possible modes 
of viewing it. We must set forth this second division, 
at least historically, and make yoii acquainted with it, 
which shall be done in our next lecture. It is only 
after these preparatory investigations that we shall be 
capable of comprehending, for the first time, the essen- 
tial nature, as well as the outward manifestations of 
the truly Blessed Life ; and, after we have so compre- 
hended it, of seeing clearly that there is indeed true 
Blessedness within it, and what that Blessedness is. 



(77) 



LECTURE V. 

FIVE-FOLD DIVISION IN THE POSSIBLE VIEW OF THE 

WORLD: — THE STANDING POINTS OF SENSE, — 

OF LEGALITY, — OF THE HIGHER MORALITY, 

— OF RELIGION, — OF SCIENCE. 

According to all that we have now said, Blessedness 
consists in union with God, as the One and Absolute. 
We, however, in our essential and unalterable nature, 
are but Knowledge, Representation, Conception ; and 
even in our union with the Infinite One, this, the es- 
sential form of our Being, cannot be obliterated. Even 
in our union with him he does not become our own 
Being; but he floats before us as something foreign to 
ourselves, something present there beyond us, to which 
we can only devote ourselves, clinging to him with 
earnest love ; He floats before us, as in himself with- 
out form or substance, without definite conception or 
Knowledge on our part of his inward essential nature, 
but only as that through which alone we can think 
or comprehend either ourselves or our World. Neither 
after our union with God is the World lost to us ; it 
only assumes a new significance, and becomes, instead 
of an independent Being such as we formerly considered 
it, only the Appearance and Manifestation, in Know- 
ledge, of the Divine Being that lies hidden in itself. 

H 2 



78 LECTURB V. 

Comprehend this once more as a whole : — The Divine 
Ex-istence {DcLseyn), — his Ex-istence, I say, which, 
according to the distinction already laid down, is his 
Manifestation and Revelation of himself, — is absolute- 
ly through itself, and of necessity. Light: — namely, 
the inward and spiritual Light. This Light, left to 
itself, separates and divides itself into an infinite mul- 
tipHcity of individual rays ; and in this way, in these 
individual rays, becomes estranged from itself and its 
original source. But this same Light may also again 
concentrate itself from out this separation, and con-' 
ceive and comprehend itself as One, as that which it is 
in itself, — the Ex-istence and Revelation of God; re- 
maining indeed, even in this conception, that which it 
is in its form, — Light ; but yet in this condition, and 
even by means of this very condition, announcing it- 
self as having no real Being in itself, but as only the 
Ex-istence and Self-Manifestation of God. 

In our last two lectures, and more especially in the 
last of all, we made it our especial business to investi- 
gate the change of the One, only possible, and unchange- 
able Being into another, and that other a manifold 
and changeable Being; so that we might be enabled to 
penetrate to the very transition-point of this change, 
and see its outgoing with our own eyes. We found 
the following: — In the first place, by the essential cha- 
racter of Knowledge in the abstract, as a mere picture 
or representation, Being, which subsists altogether 
independently of that Biiowledge, and which in itself 
and in God is pure activity and Life, is changed into 
a fixed and inert being, or into a World. In the 
second place, besides this distinction, the World which, 
to mere abstract Knowledge, is simple and indivisible. 



FIVE-FOLD VIEW OF THE WORLD. 79 . 

is, by the fundamental law of Reflexion, farther charac- 
terized, formed, and moulded into a particular World, 
and indeed into an infinitely varied World, flowing 
onward in a never-ending stream of new and changing 
forms. The insight thus to be attained was, in our 
opinion, indispensably necessary not only to Philosophy 
but also to Blessedness ;. since the latter dwells in man 
not as a mere instinct, or obscure faith, but desires to 
be able to render an account to itself of its own origin 
and foundation. 

Thus far we had proceeded in our last lecture ; and 
we intimated at its conclusion, that with this division 
of the World into an infinite multipUcity of forms, 
founded on a fundamental law of all Reflexion, there 
was inseparably connected another division which we 
should, at this time, if not critically educe, at least 
historically set forth and describe. I do not here ap- 
proach this new and second division, in its general 
character, more deeply than thus. In the first place, 
in its essential nature, it is different from the division 
which we set forth in our last lecture, and have now 
again described, in so far as the latter, by means of 
the mere abstract form of Knowledge, immediately 
separates and divides the fixed and abiding World that 
arises from out the Divine Life; while, on the con- 
trary, that which we have now to consider does not 
immediately separate and divide the object itself, but 
only separates and divides Reflexion on the object. 
The one is a separation and division in the object 
itself; the other is but a separation and division in the 
view taken of the object, — not as in the former case, 
revealing to us objects different in themselves, but only 
different modes of viewing, apprehending, and under- 



80 LECTURE V. 

standing the One abiding World. In the second place, 
it is not to be forgotten that neither of these two 
divisions can assume the place of the other, and that 
therefore they cannot supplant or supersede each other; 
but that they are inseparable, and are therefore to be 
found together wherever Reflexion, whose unchange- 
able forms they are, is to be found; — and that there- 
fore the results of both inseparably accompany each 
other, and always proceed hand in hand. The result 
of the first division is, as we have shown in our pre- 
vious lecture, — Infinitude; — the result of the second 
is, as we also stated, — a Quintitude; — and therefore 
the result of the inseparabihty of these two divisions 
is this, — that this Infinity, which in itself remains en- 
tire and cannot be superseded, may yet be regarded in 
a Five-fold manner ; and, on the other hand, that each 
of the five possible views so taken of the World again 
divides the One World into an infinite multipHcity of 
forms. And thus you may comprehend what we have 
now said in a single glance : — To the spiritual vision, 
that which in itself is the Divine Life becomes a thing 
seen, — that is, a complete and present Ex-istence, or a 
World: — which was the first point. This vision is 
always an act, named Reflexion ; and by means of this 
act, partly as relating to its object the World, and 
partly as relating to itself, that World is divided into 
an infinite Quintentity, or, what is the same thing, into 
a five-fold Infinity : — which was the second point. In 
order that we may, in the next place, proceed to the 
consideration of the second of these divisions, which is 
the proper object of to-day's lecture, let us now make, 
with regard to it, the following general remarks : — 
This division, as we have said, presents no distinc- 



FIVE-FOLD VIEW OF THE WORLD. 81 

tion in the object itself, but only a distinction, differ- 
ence, and variety, in the view taken of the object. It 
seems to force itself upon the mind that this difference, 
not in the object itself, but only in the view taken of 
the object — the object itself meanwhile remaining the 
same — can only arise from the obscurity or deamess, 
the depth or shallowness, the completeness or incom- 
pleteness, of the view thus taken of the One un- 
changing World. And this is certainly the case : or, 
— to connect this with something that I said before, 
illustrating the one expression by the other, and thus 
rendering both more intelhgible, — the five modes of 
viewing the World, now spoken of, are the same as 
those progressions which, in the third lecture, I named 
the various possible stages, and grades of development, 
of the inward Spiritual Life, — when I said that the 
progress of this free and conscious Spiritual Life which, 
in a peculiar sense, belongs to us, follows the same 
course as the progress of Physical Death, and that 
the former, as well as the latter, begins in the re- 
motest members, and thence only gradually advances 
to the central-point of the system. What I named the 
outworks of the Spiritual Life, in the figure which I 
then employed, are, in our present representation of 
the matter, the lowest, darkest, and shallowest of the 
five possible modes of viewing the World ; what I then 
named the nobler parts, and the heart, are here the 
the higher and clearer, and the highest and clearest, 
of these modes. 

But notwithstanding that, according to our former 
simile as well as our present representation, Man, after 
he has rested for a time in a low view of the World 
and its significance, does, even in the ordinary course 



82 LECTURE V. 

of life, and according to established law, raise himself 
to a higher ; yet, in the first place, it is not on that 
account to be denied, but on the contrary expressly 
to be held and maintained, that this manifold view of 
the World is a true and original distinction, at least in 
the capacities possessed by men of comprehending the 
World. Understand me thus : — those higher views of 
the World have not their origin in Time, and so that 
they are first engendered and made possible by such 
as are wholly opposed to them; but they are from 
aU Eternity in the unity of the Divine Existence as 
the necessary determinations of the One Consciousness, 
even although no man should comprehend them ; and 
no one who does comprehend them can invent them, 
or produce them by mere thought, but he can only 
perceive them and appropriate them to himself. In 
the second place, this gradual progress is only the 
ordinary course of things, and only the established 
law, which however is by no means without exception. 
Some favoured and inspired men find themselves, as it 
were by miracle, without their own knowledge, and 
through mere birth and instinct, placed at once on a 
higher standing-point from which to survey the World; 
and these are as httle understood by those around 
them, as they, on their part, are able to understand 
their contemporaries. Thus it has been, since the 
beginning of the world, with aU Rehgious Teachers, 
Sages, Heroes, and Poets ; and through these every- 
thing great and good in the world has arisen. On the 
other hand, there are individuals, and, where the 
contagion has become very dangerous, whole ages, 
with few exceptions, that, by the same inexpUcable 
instinct of nature, are so imprisoned and rooted in the 



STANDING-POINT OF SENSE. 83 

lowest view of things, that even the clearest and most 
evident instruction cannot induce them to raise their 
eyes, even for a moment, from the earth, and to ap- 
prehend anything whatever but that which they can 
directly lay hold of with their hands. 

So much in general as to the distinction which we 
are now to point out in the modes of viewing the 
World ; and now to set forth the individual sections of 
this distinction. 

The First, lowest, shallowest, and most confused 
mode of viewing the World, is that wherein that only 
which is perceptible to outward Sense is regarded as 
the World and the actual Existence therein, — as the 
highest, true, and self-sufl5cient Existence. This view 
has already been sufficiently depicted in these lectures, 
particularly in the third, and, as it seems to me, 
clearly enough characterized ; and on that occasion its 
worthlessness and superficiality were made abundantly 
evident, although only by a glance at its surface. We 
admitted that this view was nevertheless that of our 
philosophers, and of the age that is formed in their 
schools; but we showed at the same time that this 
view by no means proceeds from their Logic — since the 
very nature fend possibility of logic directly gives the 
lie to such a view — but from their Love. We cannot 
pause any longer at this point, for in these lectures 
we must proceed far beyond this, and therefore we 
must leave some things behind us as for ever aboKshed. 
Should any one, persisting in the testimony of his 
senses, continue to say: — "But these things are ob- 
viously there, really and truly, for I see them there, 
and hear them," — then let such an one know that 
we are not even disturbed by his confident assurance 



84 LBOTUBB V. 

and inflexible faith; but that we abide bj our cate- 
gorical^ invincible, and absolutely literal : — ** No, these 
things ojre not, precisely htoav^t they may be seen 
and heard," — and that we can have nothing more to 
say to such a person, as one wholly incapable of un- 
derstanding or instruction. 

The Second view, proceeding from the original divi- 
sion in the modes of viewing the World, is that wherein 
the world is regarded as a Law of order and of equal 
rights in a system of reasonable beings. Let this be 
understood exactly as I have said it. A Law, and in- 
deed an ordering and equalizing Law, addressed to the 
freedom of many, is, to this view, the peculiar, self- 
subsistent Reality; — that by which the World arose, 
and in which it has its root. Should any one here 
wonder how a Law, which indeed, as such an one 
would say, is only a relation — a mere abstract concep- 
tion, — can be regarded as an independent Existence, 
the wonder of such an one can only proceed from his 
inability to comprehend anything as real except visible 
and palpable matter ; and he belongs to that class to 
whom we have nothing to say. A Law, I say, is, to 
this view of the World, the first thing; — that which 
alone truly w, and through which everything else that 
exists first comes into Existence. Freedom, and a 
Human Race, is to it the second thing ; which exists 
only because a Law, that is addressed to freedom, 
necessarily assumes the existence of freedom and of free 
beings ; and, in this system, the only foundation and 
proof of the independence of man is the Moral Law 
that reveals itself within him. A sensible World, finally, 
is to it the third thing ; and this is only the sphere of 
the free action of man, and only exists because free 



STANDING-POINT OF LEGALITY. 85 

action necessarily assumes the existence of objects of 
such action. As to the sciences that arise out of this 
^new,-it may ky claim not only to Jurisprudence, as 
setting forth the legal relations of men, but also to the 
common doctrine of Morals, which merely goes the 
length of forbidding injustice between man and man, 
and merely abstains from that which is opposed to 
Duty, whether this is forbidden by an express law of 
the State or not. Examples of this view of the World 
cannot be adduced from common life, which, rooted in 
matter, does not even raise itself so far ; but, in philo- 
sophical literature, Kant is the most striking and con- 
sequential example of this view, if we do not follow his 
philosophical career farther than the Critique of Prac- 
tical Reason; — the peculiar character of this mode of 
thought, as we have expressed it above, — namely, that 
the reahty and independence of man is only evidenced 
by the Moral Law that rules within him, and that only 
thereby does he become anything in himself, — being 
expressed by K^nt in the same words. We ourselves, 
too, have pointed out and investigated this view of the 
World, never indeed as the highest, but as the founda- 
tion of a Doctrine of Jurisprudence and a Doctrine of 
Morals, in our treatment of these subjects ; and have 
there, as we are conscious, set it forth not without 
energy : — and there can therefore be no lack of examples, 
in our own age, of this second vieW of the World, for 
those who take a closer interest in what has now been 
said. For the rest, the purely-moral inward sentiment — 
that man ought to act only in obedience to, and for the 
sake of, the Law — which also enters into the sphere of 
this lower Morality, and the inculcation of which has 
not been forgotten either by Kant or by us, does not 



86 LECTURE V. 

belong to our present subject, where we have to do 
only with the objects of human behef. 

One general remark, which is of importance for all 
our subsequent points of view, I will adduce here as 
the place where it may be made with the greatest dis- 
tinctness. This, namely: — In order to have a firm 
standing-point for any view of the World, it is neces- 
sary that we should place the real, independent being 
and root of the World in one definite and unchangeable 
principle, from which we may be able to educe the 
others, as only partaking in the reality of the first, and 
only assumed by reason of it ; just as we have already, 
when speaking of the second view of the World, educed 
the Human Race as a second element, and the Sensible 
World as a third, from the law of Moral Order as the 
first. But it is by no means allowable to mix and 
intermingle reaUties ; and, it may be, to ascribe to the 
Sensible World what is thought to belong to it, at the 
same time not denying to the Moral World any of its 
rights; — as is sometimes attempted by those who 
would get rid of these questions altogether. Such 
persons have no settled view whatever, and no fixed 
direction of their spiritual eye, but they continually 
turn aside amid the Manifold. Far better than they, 
is he who holds firmly by the World of Sense, and 
denies the reaUty of everything else but it; for al- 
though he may be as short-sighted as the others, yet 
he is not at the same time so timid and spiritless. In a 
word: — a higher view of the World does not tolerate 
the lower beside it ; but each higher step abolishes the 
lower as an absolute and highest standing-point, and 
subordinates it to itself. 

The Third view of the World is that from the stand- 



STANDING-POINT OF THE HIGHER MORALITY. 87 

ing-point of the True and Higher Morality. It is 
necessary that we should render a very distinct account 
of this standing-point, which is almost wholly con- 
cealed from the present age. To it also, as well as to 
the second of the views we have now described, h. Law 
of the Spiritual World is the first, highest, and absolute 
reality ; and herein these two views coincide. But the 
Law of the third view is not, hke that of the second, 
merely a Law of order, regulating present existence ; 
but rather a creative Law, producing the new and 
hitherto not-existing, even within the circle of that 
which already exists. The former is merely negative, — 
abolishing the opposition between various free powers, 
and establishing equiUbrium and peace in its stead; the 
latter desires to inform the powers, thus lulled to rest, 
with a new life. We may say that it strives not hke 
the former after the mere form of the Idea, but after 
the qualitative and real Idea itself. Its object may be 
briefly stated thus: — it seeks, in those whom it in- 
spires, and through them in others, to make Humanity 
in deed, what it is in its original intention — the express 
image, copy, and revelation of the inward and essential 
Divine Nature. The scale of deduction, by which this 
third view of the World arrives at reality, is therefore 
the following: — To it, the only truly real and inde- 
pendent being is the Holy, the Good, the Beautiful ; 
the second is Humanity, as the destined manifestation 
of the first ; the ordering Law in Humanity, as the 
third, is but the means of bringing it into internal and 
external peace, for the fulfilment of its true vocation ; 
and finally, the World of Sense, as the fourth, is only 
the sphere both of the outward and inward, the lower 
and higher, Freedom and Morahty : — only the sphere 



88 LECTURE V. 

of Freedom^ I saj, — that which it is to all the higher 
points of view, and thus remains^ and can nerer assume 
to itself any other reality. 

Examples of this view in human history can be seen 
only by him who has an eye to discover them. Through 
the Higher Morality alone, and those who have been 
inspired by it» has ReUgion — and in particular the 
Christian Rehgion— Wisdom and Science, Legislation 
and Culture, Art, and all else that we possess of Qood 
and Venerable, been introduced into the world. In 
Literature there are to be found, except in the Poets, 
but few scattered traces of this view: — among the 
ancient Philosophers, Plato may have had some pre- 
sentiment of it ; among the modems, Jacobi sometimes 
touches upon this region. 

The Fourth view of the World is that from the 
standing-point of Religion ; which, since it arises out 
of the third view which we have just described, and is 
conjoined with it, must be characterized as the dear 
knowledge and conviction that this Holy, Good, and 
Beautiful, is by no means a product of our own, or of 
any other spirit, Ught, or thought, which in itself is 
nothing, but that it is immediately the manifestation 
in us of the inward Divine Nature, as Light; — his 
expression, his image, wholly, absolutely, and without 
abatement, in so far as his essential Nature can come 
forth in an image or representation. This, the Religious 
view, is that same insight to the production of which 
we have prepared the way in our previous lectures, and 
which now, in the connexion of its principles, may be 
thus more precisely and definitely expressed: — (1.) 
God alone is, and nothing besides him : — a principle 
which, it seems to me, may be easily comprehended. 



STANDING-POINT OF RELIGION. 89 

and which is the indispensable condition of all Religious 
insight. (2.) While we thus say " God is," we have 
an altogether empty conception, furnishing absolutely 
no explanation of God's essential Nature. What could 
we answer, from this conception, to the question: — 
What then is God ? The only possible addition we 
could make to the aidom, — this, namely, that he is ab- 
solutely, of himself, through himself, and in himself, 
— this is but the fundamental form of our own under- 
standing applied to him, and expresses no more than 
our mode of conceiving him ; and even that negatively, 
and as we can 7iot think of him, — that is, we mean only 
that we cannot educe his being from another, as we 
are compelled by the nature of our understanding to 
do with aU other objects of our thought. This con- 
ception of God is thus an unsubstantial and imaginary 
conception ; and when we say " God is," — he is to us 
essentially nothing ; and, by this very expression itself, 
is made nothing. (3.) But beyond this mere empty 
and imaginary conception, and as we have carefully set 
forth this matter above, God enters into us in his 
actual, true, and immediate Life; — or, to express it 
more strictly, we ourselves are this his immediate Life. 
But we are not conscious of this immediate Divine 
Life ; and since, as we have also already seen, our own 
Ex-istence — that which properly belongs to us — is 
that only which we can embrace in consciousness, so 
our Being in God, notwithstanding that at bottom it 
is indeed ours, remains nevertheless for ever foreign to 
us, and thus, in deed and truth, to ourselves is not 
our Being ; — we are in no respect the better of this 
insight, and remain as far removed as ever from God. 
We know nothing of this immediate Divine Life, I 

I 2 



90 LECTURE v. 

•aid ; — ^for even at the first touch of conscioiisness it is 
changed into a dead World, which again divides itself 
into a five-fold form according to the point of view 
from which we regard it. Altliough it may be that it 
is God himself who ever lives behind all these varied 
forms, yet we see him not, but only his garment ; we 
see him as stone, plant, animal, &c., or, if we soar 
higher, as Natural Law, or as Moral Law : — ^but all this 
is yet not He. The form for ever veils the substance 
from us ; our vision itself conceals its object ; our eye 
stands in its own Ught. I say unto thee who thus 
complainest :-« Kaise thyself to the standing-point of 
ReUgion, and all these veils are drawn aside; the World, 
with its dead principle, disappears from before thee, 
and the Godhead once more resumes its place within 
thee, in its first and original form, as Life, — as thine 
own Life, which thou oughtest to live, and shalt live. 
Still the one, irreversible form of Reflexion remains, — 
the Infinitude, in thee, of this Divine Life, which, in 
God himself, is but One ; but this form troubles thee 
not, for thou desirest it and lovest it ; it does not em- 
barrass thee, for thou art able to explain it. In that 
which the Holy Man does, Uves, and loves, God appears, 
no longer surrounded by shadows nor hidden by a 
garment, but in his own, immediate, and efficient Life; 
and the question that is unanswerable from the mere 
empty and imaginary conception of God, — " What is 
God ?" — is here answered : — " He is that which he who 
is devoted to him and inspired by him does." Wouldst 
thou behold God face to face, as he is in himself? Seek 
him not beyond the skies ; thou canst find hini where- 
ever thou art. Behold the life of his devoted ones, 
and thou beholdest him ; resign thyself to him, and 
thou wilt find him within thine own breast." 



STANDING-POINT OF SCIENCE. 91 

This, my firiends, is the view of the World, and of 
Being, from the standing-point of Religion. 

The Fifth and last view of the World is that from the 
standing-point of Science. Of Science, I say, — the 
One, Absolute, and Self-complete. Science thoroughly 
comprehends all these points of the transition of the 
One into a Manifold, and of the Absolute into a Re- 
lative, in their order and in their relations to each 
other; being able, in every case, and from each in- 
dividual point of view, to carry back that Multiplicity 
to its primitive Unity, or to deduce from the original 
Unity that Multiplicity of form: — as we have laid 
before you the general characteristics of such Science 
in this and our two preceding lectures. Science goes 
beyond the insight given us by ReUgion,— that the 
Manifold is assuredly founded on the One, and is to 
be referred to it,— to the insight into the manner of 
this fact ; and to it, that becomes a genetic principle 
which to Religion is but an absolute fact. ReUgion 
without Science is a mere Faith, although an immov- 
able Faith ; — Science supersedes aU Faith, and changes 
it into Sight. We do not, however, adduce here this 
Scientific standmg-point as properly belonging to our 
present inquiry, but only for the sake of completeness; 
and therefore it is sufiicient at present to add the 
following respecting it : — Science is not indeed a con- 
dition of the Divine and Blessed Life ; but nevertheless 
this Life demands of us that we should realize this 
Science, in ourselves and in others, within the region 
of the Higher Morality. The true and complete Man 
ought to be thoroughly clear in himself; for universal 
and complete clearness belongs to the image and re- 
presentative of God. But, on the other hand, no one 



92 LECTURE V. 

can make this demand upon himself in whom it has 
not akeady been fulfilled without his aid, and has 
thereby itself become already dear and intelligible 
to him. 

We have yet to make the following remarks on the 
five points of view which we have now indicated, and 
thus to complete our picture of the Rehgious Man. 

Both of the two last-mentioned points of view, the 
Scientific as well as the Rehgious, are only percipient 
and contemplative, not in themselves active and prac- 
tical. They are merely inert and passive moods, which 
abide within the mind itself; not impulses moving 
towards action, and so bursting forth into life. On the 
contrary, the third point of view, that of the Higher 
MoraUty, is practical, impeUing towards action. And 
now I add: — True Rehgion, notwithstanding that it 
raises the view of those who are inspired by it to its 
own region, nevertheless retains their Life firmly in 
the domain of action, and of right moral action. The 
true and real Rehgious Life is not alone percipient 
and contemplative, does not merely brood over devout 
thoughts, but is essentially active. It consists, as we 
have seen, in the intimate consciousness that God 
actually hves, moves, and perfects his work in us. If 
therefore there is in us no real Life, if no activity and 
no visible work proceed forth from us, then is God 
not active in us. Our consciousness of union with 
God is then deceptive and vain, and the empty shadow 
of a condition that is not ours ; perhaps the general, 
but lifeless, insight that such a condition is possible, 
and in others may be actual, but that we ourselves 
have, nevertheless, not the least portion in it. We 
are expelled from the domain of Reahty, and again 



THE TRUE RELIGIOUS LIFE. 93 

banished to that of empty, imaginary conception. The 
latter is Fanaticism and idle dreaming, because it 
answers to no ReaUty ; and this fanaticism is one of 
the faults of that system of Mysticism which we have 
elsewhere described, and contrasted with the True 
Religion: — it is by Uving activity that the True Re- 
hgious Life is distinguished from this Fanaticism. 
ReUgion does not consist in mere devout dreams, I 
said: — Religion is not a business by and for itself, 
which a man may practise apart from his other occu* 
pations, perhaps on certain fixed days and hours ; but 
it is the inmost spirit, that penetrates, inspires, and 
pervades all our Thought and Action, which in other 
respects pursue their appointed course without change 
or interruption. That the Divine Life and Energy 
actually lives in us, is inseparable from ReUgion, I said. 
But this does not depend upon the sphere in which we 
act, as may have become evident from what we said 
when speaking of the third point of view. He whose 
knowledge extends to the objects of the Higher Mo- 
rality, if he be animated by ReUgion, will Uve and 
act in this sphere, because this is his peculiar calling. 
But to him who has only a lower vocation, even it 
may be sanctified by ReUgion, and wiU receive thereby, 
if not the material, yet the form of the Higher Mo- 
raUty ; — to which nothing more is essential than that 
we should recognise and love our vocation as the Will 
of God with us and in us. If a man till his field in 
this Faith, or practise the most unpretending handi- 
craft with this truthftdness, he is higher and more 
blessed than if, without this Faith, if that were pos- 
sible, he should confer happiness and prosperity upon 
mankind for centuries to come. 



94 LECTURE V. 

This then is the picture — the inward spirit of the 
true Religious man:— He does not conceive of his 
World, the object of his love and his endeavour, as 
something for him to enjoy: — not as if melancholy 
and superstitious fear caused him to look upon enjoy- 
ment and pleasure as something sinful, but because he 
knows that no such pleasure can yield him true joy. 
He conceives of his World as Action, which, because 
it is his World, he alone creates, in which alone he can 
live, and find all enjoyment of himself. This Action 
again he does not will for the sake of a result in the 
World of Sense; — he is in no respect anxious about the 
result or no-result that may ensue, for he Uves only 
in Action, as Action; — but he wills it, because it is 
the Will of God in him, and his own peculiar portion 
in Being. And so does his Life flow onwards, simple 
and pure, knowing, willing, and desiring nothing else 
than this, — never wandering from this centre, neither 
moved nor troubled by aught external to itself. 

Such is his Life. Whether this be not of necessity 
the most pure and perfect Blessedness, we shall inquire 
at another time. 



(95) 



LECTURE VI. 

EXPOSITION OF THE DOCTRINE OF THE JOHANNEAN 

GOSPEL: — ITS ACCORDANCE WITH 

OUR OWN DOCTRINE. 

Our whole Doctrine, as the foundation of all that we 
have yet to say at this time, and generally of aU that 
we can say at any time, is now clearly and distinctly 
set forth, and may he surveyed at a single glance. 
There is ahsolutely no Being and no Life beyond the 
immediate Divine Life. According to the essential and 
irreversible laws of Consciousness, which are founded 
in the very nature of Consciousness itself, this Being 
is veiled and darkened in Consciousness by manifold 
concealments; — but, freed from these disguises, and 
only modified by the form of Infinitude, it reappears 
in the life and actions of the God-inspired man. In 
his actions it is not man who acts ; — but God himself, 
in his primitive and inward Being and Nature, acts 
in him, and fulfils his work in Man. 

I said, in one of the first and introductory lectures, 
that this doctrine, however new and unheard-of it may 
seem to this age, is nevertheless as old as the world ; 
and that, in particular, it is the doctrine of Christi- 
anity, as this, even to the present day, Ues before our 
view in its purest and most excellent record, the Gos- 



96 LECTURE VI. 

pel of John ; and that this doctrine is there set forth 
with the very same images and expressions which we 
here employ. It may be well, in many respects, to 
make good that statement, and to this purpose we 
shall devote the present lecture. It will be understood, 
even without a special declaration on our part, that 
we by no means intend to prove our doctrine, or even 
to add to it an outward support, by demonstrating 
this harmony between it and Christianity. It must 
already, by what we have previously adduced, have 
proved itself, and that with absolute evidence, — and 
it needs no farther support. And in the same way 
must Christianity, as in harmony with Eeason, and as 
the pure and perfect expression of this Reason, beyond 
which there is no truth, — so, I say, must Christianity 
prove itself, if it is to lay claim to vaUdity and ac- 
ceptance. It is not by philosophers that you need 
fear to be led back again into the chains of blind 
Authority. 

In my lectures of last winter,* I have distinctly an- 
noimced the grounds upon which I regard the Apostle 
John as the only teacher of true Christianity: — namely, 
that the Apostle Paul and his party, as the authors of 
the opposite system of Christianity, remained half Jews, 
and left unaltered the Amdamental error of Judaism 
as well as of Heathenism, which we must afterwards 
notice. For the present the following may be enough: 
— It is only with John that the philosopher can deal, 
for he alone has respect for Reason, and appeals to 
that evidence which alone has weight with the philo- 
sopher — the internal. " If any man wiU do the will 



" Characteristics of the Pxesent Age,** Lecture Y II. 



DOCTRINE OF THE JOHANNEAN GOSPEL. 97 

of him that sent me, he shall know of the doctrine, 
whether it be of God." But this Will of God, accord- 
ing to John, is, that we should truly beUeve in God, 
and in Jesus Christ whom he hath sent. The other 
promulgators of Christianity, however, rely upon the 
external evidence of Miracle, which, to us at least, 
proves nothing. Further, of the four Gospels, only 
that of John contains what we seek and desire, — a 
Doctrine of Religion ; while, on the contrary, the best 
that the others offer to us, without completion and 
explanation by John, amounts to nothing more than 
MoraUty; — which to us has but a very subordinate 
value. As to the assertion that John had the other 
Evangelists before him, and only designed to supply 
what they had omitted, we shall not here inquire 
into it; — should that be the case, then, in our opi- 
nion, the supplement is the best part of the whole, 
and John's predecessors had passed over that precisely 
which was of essential importance. 

As to the principle of interpretation which I apply 
to this as well as to all the other authors of the Chris- 
tian Scriptures, it is the following : — So to understand 
them as if they had really desired to say something, 
and, so far as their words permit, as if they had said 
what is right and true : — a principle that seems to be 
in accordance with justice and fairness. But we are 
wholly opposed to the hermeneutical principle of a 
certain party, according to which the most earnest and 
simple expressions of these writers are regarded as 
mere images and metaphors, and thus explained and 
re-explained away, until the result is a flat and in- 
sipid triviaUty such as these interpreters might them- 
selves have discovered and brought forward. Other 



98 LECTURE VI. 

means of interpretation than those contained in. them- 
selves seem to me inadmissible in the case of these 
writers, and particularly in the case of John. Where, 
as in the case of the profane authors of classical an- 
tiquity, we can compare several contemporary writers 
with each other, and aU of them with a preceding 
and succeeding republic of letters, there is room for 
the employment of external aids. But Christianity, 
and particularly John, stands alone and isolated, as a 
wonderful and inexplicable phenomenon of Time, with- 
out precedent and without succedent. 

In what we shall set forth as the substance of the 
Johannean doctrine, we must carefully distinguish be- 
tween that in it which is true in itself, true absolutely 
and for all time, and that which only has been true 
for the standing-point of John and the Jesus whom he 
announces, and for their time and circumstances. This 
latter, too, we shall faithfully set forth ; for any other 
mode of interpretation than this is not only dishonest, 
but leads to perplexity and confusion. 

The portion of the Gospel of John which must 
necessarily attract our attention at the very outset is 
the dogmatic introduction which occupies a part of the 
first chapter ; — as it were the preface. Do not regard 
this preface as a special and arbitrary philosopheme of 
the author himself, — a speculative prelude to his his- 
torical narrative, of which, holding only to the fiurts 
themselves, we may, according to the proper intention 
of the author, adopt whatever opinion we please ; — as 
some appear to regard this proem. It is much rather 
to be considered in relation to the whole Gospel, and 
to be imderstood only in that connexion. Through- 
out the whole Gospel, the author represents Jesus as 



DOCTRINE OF THE JOHANNEAN GOSPEL. 99 

speaking of himself in a certain manner, which we 
shall afterwards advert to ; and it is without doubt the 
conviction of John that Jesus did speak precisely in 
this way and in no other, and that he had heard him 
thus speak; — and it seems to be his earnest desire 
that we should believe him in this. Now the prei&ce 
explains how it was possible that Jesus ocyuld think 
and speak of himself as he did; and it is therefore 
necessarily assumed by John that not only he himself, 
and according to his own mere personal opinion, so 
regarded Jesus and would so interpret him, but that 
Jesus had likewise regarded himself in the same way in 
which he is here depicted. The preface is to be taken 
as the essence, the general standing-point, of all the 
discourses of Jesus ; — it has, therefore, in the view of 
the author, tiie same authority as these discourses 
themselves. In the sight of John, this preface is not 
his own doctrine but that of Jesus, and indeed is 
the spirit, the innermost root of the whole doctrine 
of Jesus. 

Having thus clearly set forth this not-unimportant 
point, let us proceed, by the following preliminary re- 
mark, to the subject itself. 

The notion of a creation, as the essentially funda- 
mental error of all false Metaphysics and Rehgion, 
and, in particular, as the radical principle of Judaism 
and Heathenism, arises &om ignorance of the doctrine 
which we have previously laid down. Compelled to 
recognise the absolute unity and unchangeableness of 
the Divine Nature in itself and being imwilling to 
give up the independent and real existence of finite 
things, they made the latter proceed from the former 
by an act of absolute and arbitrary power; whereby. 



100 LECTURE VI. 

in the j&rst place, the fundamental conception of God- 
head was utterly destroyed, and an arbitrary power 
established in its room, — an error that ran through 
the whole of their rehgious system ; and, in the second 
place. Reason was for ever perverted, and Thought 
changed into a dream of fancy, for of such a creation 
it is impossible even to conceive rightly in Thought — 
what can properly be called Thought — and no man 
ever did so conceive of it. In relation to the doctrine 
of ReUgion, in particular, the supposition of a creation 
is the first criterion of the fiJsehood, — and the denial 
of such a creation, should it have been set up by any 
previous system, is the first criterion of the'truk-l 
of such a Doctrine of Rehgion. Christianity, and es- 
pecially the profound teacher of it of whom we now 
speak, John, stood in the latter position ; — the existing 
Jewish ReUgion had set up such a creation. " In the 
beginning God created*^ — thus do the Sacred Books 
of this ReUgion commence: — "No," — in direct con- 
tradiction to this, and setting out with the very same 
words, but instead of the second and false expression 
giving the truth in its place, in order the more dis- 
tinctly to mark the contradiction, — "No," said John 
— "In the beginning," — in the same beginning that 
is there spoken of, — that is, originally and before aU 
time, God did not create, for no creation was needed, 
but there was already; — " In the beginning was the 
Word, .... and aU things were made by it." 

In the beginning was the Word, — in the original 
text, the Logos ; which might also be translated Rea- 
son, or, — as nearly the same idea is expressed in the 
book caUed the Wisdom of Solomon, — Wisdom; but 
which, in our opinion, is most exactly rendered by 



DOCTRINE OF THE JOHANNEAN GOSPEL. 101 

the expression " the Word," which also oeeors in the 
oldest Latin version, doubtless in consequence of a 
tradition of the disciples of John. What then, ac* 
cording to the view of our author, is this Logos, or 
Word ? Let us not cavil too nicely about the expres- 
sion, but rather candidly note what John says of this 
Word: — the predicates applied to a subject usually 
determine the nature of the subject itself, especially 
when they are applied to that subject exclusively. He 
says, — that the Word was in the beginning; that the 
Word was with God; that God himself was the Word; 
that the Word was in the beginning with God. Was 
it possible for him to express more clearly the doctrine 
which we have previously taught in such words as the 
following: -^Besides God's inward and hidden Being 
in himself (Seyh), which we are able to conceive of in 
Thought, he has besides an Ex-istence {Daseyn), which 
we can only practically apprehend ; but yet this Ex- 
istence necessarily arises through his inward and ab- 
solute Being itself: — and his Ex-istence, which is only 
hy U8 distinguished from his Being, is, in itself and 
in Mm, not distinguished from his Being; but this 
Ex-istence is originally, before all time, and inde- 
pendently of all time, with his Being, inseparable from 
his Being, and itself his Being: — the Word in the 
beginning, — the Word with God, — the Word in the 
beginning with God,-*- God himself the Word, — and 
the Word itself God ? Was it possible for him to set 
forth more distinctly and forcibly the ground of this 
proposition: — that in God, and from God, there is 
nothing that arises or becomes ; but that in him there 
is but an " Is," — an Eternal Present ; and that what- 
ever has Existence must be originally with him, and 

K2 



102 LECTURE VI. 

must be himself? " Away with that perplexing phan- 
tasm!" — might the Evangelist have added, had he 
wished to multiply words ; " away with that phantasm 
of a creation from God of something that is not in 
himself, and has not been eternally and necessarily in 
himself! — an emanation in which he is not himself 
present but forsakes his work; an expulsion and 
separation from him that casts us out into desolate 
nothingness, and makes him our arbitrary and hostile 
lord!" 

This " Being unth God," or, according to our ex- 
pression, this his Ex-istence, is farther characterized 
as the Logos or Word. How was it possible more 
clearly to declare that it was his spiritual expression, 
his self-evident and inteUigible Revelation and Mani- 
festation ? — or, as we have given utterance to the same 
idea, that the immediate Ex-istence {Daseyn) of God 
is necessarily Consciousness, partly of itself, partly of 
God? — for which proposition we have adduced the 
clearest proof. 

If this be now evident in' the first place, then there 
is no longer the sUghtest obscurity in the assertion 
contained in verse 3, that " all things are made by 
him ; and without him is not anything made that is 
made, &c.;" and this proposition is wholly equivalent 
to that which we propounded: — that the World and 
all things exist only in conception, — according to John, 
in the Word, — and only as objects of conception and 
consciousness, as God's spontaneous expression of him- 
self; — and that conception, or the Word, is the only 
creator of the World, and, by means of the principle 
of separation contained in its very nature, the creator 
of the manifold and infinite variety of things in the 
World. 



DOCTRINE OF THE JOHANNEAN GOSPEL. 103 

In fine : I would express these three verses in my 
own language, thus : — The Ex-istence (Daseyn) of God 
is original and underived like his Being (Seyn); the 
latter is inseparable from the former, and is indeed 
in aU respects the same as the former ; and this Di- 
vine Ex-istence, in its substance, is necessarily Know- 
ledge ; and in this Knowledge alone has a worid, and 
all things present in the worid, arisen. 

In Uke manner the two succeeding verses are now 
clear to us. In him, in this immediate Divine Ex- 
istence, was Life, — the deepest root of all living, sub- 
stantial Existence, which nevertheless remains for ever 
concealed from view ; and in actual men this Life is 
Light, or conscious Reflexion; and this one, eternal, 
primitive Light shines for ever in the Darkness of the 
lower and obscure grades of Spiritual Life, supports 
and maintains these in existence, itself unnoticed, and 
the Darkness comprehends it not. 

So far as we have now proceeded in our interpreta- 
tion of the proem to the Johannean Gospel, we have 
met only with what is absolutely and eternally true. 
At this point begins that which only possesses vaUdity 
for the time, for Jesus and the establishment of Chris- 
tianity, for the necessary standing-point of Christ and 
his Apostles; — namely the historical, not in any way 
metaphysical proposition, that this absolute and im- 
mediate Existence of God, the Eternal Knowledge or 
Word, pure and undefiled as it is in itself, and without 
any admixture of impurity or darkness, or any merely 
individual limitation, manifested itself in a personal, 
sensible, and Human Existence, — namely in that Jesus 
of Nazareth, who at a certain particular time appeared 
teaching and preaching in the land of Judea, and 



104 LECTURB VI. 

whose most remarkable expressions are here recorded, 
— and in him, as the Evangelist has well expressed it, 
became flesh. As to the difference, as well as the 
agreement, of these two standing-points, — that of the 
absolutely and eternally true, and that which is true 
only jfrom the temporary point of view of Jesus and his 
Apostles, — it stands thus. From the first standing- 
point, the Eternal Word becomes flesh, assumes a 
personal, sensible, and human existence, without ob- 
struction or reserve, in all times, and in every individual 
man who has a living insight into his Unity with God, 
and who actually and in truth gives up his personal life 
to the Divine Life within him, — precisely in the same 
way as it became incarnate in Jesus Christ. This truth, 
which, be it observed, speaks only of the possibUUy of 
being, without reference to the means of its actual 
attainment, is neither denied by John nor by the Jesus 
to whose teachings he introduces us ; but, on the con- 
trary, they insist upon it everywhere in the most ex- 
press terms, as we shall afterwards see. The peculiar 
and exclusive standing-point of Christianity, which 
has only vaUdity for the disciples of that system, looks 
to the means of attaining this True Being, and teaches 
us thus regarding them: — Jesus of Nazareth, abso- 
lutely by and through himself, by yirtue of his mere 
existence, nature or instinct, without deliberate act, 
and without guidance or direction, is the perfect sen- 
sible manifestation of the Eternal Word, as no one 
whatever has been before him; while those who become 
his disciples are, as yet, not so, since they still stand in 
need of its manifestation in him, but they must first 
become so through him. This is 1;he characteristic 
dogma of Christianity, as a phenomenon of Time, as 



DOCTRINB OF THE JOHANNEAN GOSPEL. 105 

a temporary form of the religious culture of man, — in 
which dogma, without doubt, Jesus and his Apostles 
believed: — purely, brightly, and in the highest sense, 
in the Gospel of John, to whom Jesus of Nazareth is 
indeed the Christ, the called Saviour of Mankind, but 
only in virtue of this Christ being to him the Word 
made flesh; — in Paul and the others, mixed up with 
Jewish dreams of a Son of David, an abolisher of an 
Old Covenant, and a mediator of a New. Everywhere, 
but particularly in John, Jesus is the first-born, and 
only-begotten Son of the Father, not as an emanation 
or anything else of that kind, — these irrational dreams 
arose only at a later period, — but in the sense above 
explained, in eternal unity and equahty of nature; 
and all other men can become children of God only 
mediately through Jesus, and by means of a trans- 
formation into his nature. Let us, in the first place, 
distinctly recognise this ; for otherwise we shall partly 
interpret Christianity dishonestly, and partly not un- 
derstand it at all, but only be led into perplexity and 
confusion. Let us, therefore, at least endeavour rightly 
to apprehend and judge of this point of view, which 
must remain open to every one, it being of course 
distinctly understood that we ourselves have no in- 
tention of adopting it here. With reference to this 
matter, then, I remark (1.) An insight into the abso- 
lute unity of the Human Existence with the Divine 
is certainly the profoundest Knowledge that man can 
attain. Before Jesus, this Knowledge had nowhere 
existed ; and since his time, we may say down even to 
the present day, it has been again as good as rooted 
out and lost, at least in profane literature. Jesus, 
however, was evidently in possession of this insight ; 



106 LSCTDRE Vl. 

as we shall incontestibly find, were it only in the 
Gospel of John, as soon as we ourselves attain it. How 
then came Jesus by this insight ? That any one coming 
after him, when the truth had aheady been revealed, 
should again discover it, is not so great a wonder ; but 
how the first discoverer, separated from centuries before 
him and centuries after him by the exclusive posses- 
sion of this insight, did attain to it, — this is an ex- 
ceeding great wonder. And so it is in fact true, what 
is maintained in the first part of the Christian Dogma, 
that Jesus of Nazareth is, in a wholly peculiar manner, 
attributable to no one but him, the only-begotten and 
first-bom Son of God ; and that all ages, which are 
capable of understanding him at all, must recognise 
him in this character. (2.) Although it be true, that, 
in the present day, a man may re-discover this doctrine 
in the writings of Christ's Apostles, and for himself, 
and by means of his own conviction, recognise it as the 
Truth; — although it be true, as we likewise maintain, 
that the philosopher, so far as he knows, discovers the 
same truths altogether independently of Christianity, 
and surveys them in a consequentiality and universal 
clearness in which they are not deUvered, to us at 
least, by means of Christianity; — yet it neverthe- 
less remains certain, that we, with our whole age, and 
with all our philosophical inquiries, are established on 
Christianity, and have proceeded on that foundation ; 
that this Christianity has entered into our whole cul- 
ture in the most varied forms; and that, on the 
whole, we might have been nothing of all that we 
al^e, had not this mighty principle gone before ns in 
Time. We can cast off no portion of the being that 
we have inherited from earher ages ; and no intelligent 



DOCTRINE OF THE JOHANNEAN GOSPEL. 107 

man will meddle with inquiries as to what would be, 
if that which is, had not been. And thus also the 
second part of the Christian Dogma, — that all those 
who, since Jesus, have come into union with God, 
have done so only through him, and by means of his 
imion with God, — is likewise unquestionably true* 
And thus it is confirmed in every way, that, even to 
the end of Time, all wise and intelligent men must 
bow themselves low before this Jesus of Nazareth ; and 
that the more wise and intelhgent they are, the more 
humbly will they recognise the exceeding nobleness of 
this great and glorious manifestation of the Divine. 

So much to guard the view of Christianity which 
possesses but a local and temporary validity 8c:ainst 

such ; — but by no means to force this view upon any 
one who either has not directed his attention to the 
historical side of the matter, or who, even if he have 
investigated that side of it, has not been able to dis- 
cover there what we think we have found. Therefore, 
by what we have now said, we by no means wish to 
be imderstood as joining ourselves to the party of those 
Christians to whom things have only a value on ac- 
count of the name they bear. The Metaphysical only, 
and not the Historical, can give us Blessedness ; the 
latter can only give us understanding. If any man be 
truly united with God, and dwell in him, it is alto- 
gether an indifferent thing how he may have reached 
this state; and it would be a most useless and per- 
verse employment, instead of Uving in the thing, to be 
continually repeating over our recollections of the way. 
Could Jesus return into the world, we might expect 
him to be thoroughly satisfied if he found Christianity 



1X)8 LECTURE VI. 

actuaHy reigning in the minds of men, whether his 
merit in the work were recognised or overlooked; 
and this is, in fact, the very least that might be ex- 
pected from a man who, while he lived on earth, 
sought not his own glory, but the glory of him who 
sent him. 

Now that, by means of distinguishing these two 
standing-points, we possess the key to all the expres- 
sions of the Johannean Jesus, and the certain means 
of referring back whatever is clothed in a merely 
temporary form to its original source in pure and 
absolute Truth, let us comprise the substance of these 
expressions in the answer to these two questions: — 
(1.) What does Jesus say of himself, regarding his 
relation to the Godhead? — and (2.) What does he 
say of his disciples and followers, regarding their rela- 
tion, in the first place to himself, and then, through 
him, to the Godhead ? 

Chap. I. verse 18 — " No man hath seen God at 
any time ; the only begotten Son, who is in the 
bosom of the Father, he hath declared him :" 
— or, as we have said: The essential Divine 
Nature, in itself, is hidden from us; only in 
the form of Knowledge does it come forth into 
manifestation, and that altogether as it is in 
itself. 
Chap. y. verse 19 — " The Son can do nothing of 
himself, but what he seeth the Father do ; for 
what things soever he doeth, these also doeth 
the Son Ukewise:" — or, as we have expressed 
it, his separate independent life is swallowed up 
in the life of God. 
Chap. X. verses 27, 28 — " My sheep hear my voice. 



DOCTRINE OF THE JOHANNEAN GOSPEL. 109 

and I know them, and they follow me : and I 
give unto them eternal life; and they shall 
never perish, neither shall any pluck them out 
of my hand." — Ver. 29. " My Father, who gave 
them me, is greater than all ; and none is able 
to pluck them out of my Father's hand." Who 
is it then, it may be asked, who holds and keeps 
them, — Jesus or the Father? — The answer is 
given in verse 30 : "I and my Father are one :" 
that is to say, the same; identical principles 
in both. His life is my life, and mine is his ; 
my work is his work, and the reverse; — pre- 
cisely as we have expressed ourselves in our 
preceding lecture. 
So much for the clearest and most convincing pas- 
sages. The whole Gospel speaks in the same terms 
on this point, imiformly and with one voice. Jesus 
speaks of himself in no other way than this. 

But further, how does Jesus speak of his followers, 
and of their relation to him ? He constantly assumes 
that, in their actual condition, they have not the true 
life in them, but, as he expresses it in Chap. HI. with 
reference to Nicodemus, must receive a wholly different 
life, as opposed to their present existence as if an 
entirely new man should be bom in their stead : — or, 
—where he expresses himself with the strictest preci- 
sion, — that they have not, properly speaking, either 
existence or life, but are sunk in death and the grave, 
and that it is he who must first give them life. 

On this point, consider the following decisive pas- 
sages: — 

Chap. VI. verse 53 — " Except ye eat my flesh and 
drink my blood," (this expression will be after- 

L 



110 LECTURE VI. 

wards explained), " ye have no life in you :"— 
Only by means of thus eating my flesh and 
drinking my blood is there aught in you, and 
without this there is nothing. 

Chap. V. verse 24—" He that heareth my word, 
&c. hath everlasting life, and is passed from 
death unto life." — Verse 25 — " The hour is 
coming, and now is, when the dead shall hear 
the voice of the Son of God ; and they that 
hear shall live." The dead! Who are these 
dead? Those who are to lie in their graves 
till the last day ? A coarse, crude interpreta- 
tion;— in Scriptural language, an interpreta- 
tion according to the flesh, and not according 
to the spirit. The hour was even then : they 
were the dead who had not yet heard his voice, 
and even on that account were dead. 
And what is this life, that Jesus promises to give 
his followers ? 

Chap. VIII. verse 51 — " Verily, verily, I say unto 
you. If a man keep my word, he shall never 
see death," — not as dull expositors take it; — 
" he shall indeed once die, only not for ever, 
but he shall again be awakened at the last 
day," — but " he shall never die :" — as the Jews 
actually imderstood it, and attempted to refrite 
Jesus by an appeal to the death of Abraham, 
while he justified their interpretation by declaring 
that Abraham, who had seen his day,-*^who had, 
doubtless through Melchisedek, been initiated 
into his doctrine, — was actually not dead. 
Or yet more distinctly, — 

Chap. XL ver. 23 — " Thy brother sbaU rise again. 



DOCTRINE OF THE JOHANNEAN GOSPEL. Ill 

Martiift (whoM head was filled with Jewish 
notions) saith unto him, I know that he AaH 
rise again in the resurrection at th« last daj^/' 
No, said Jesus -^^' I am the Resurreetion and 
the Lifb. He that believeth in me, tiiiough 
he were dead^ yet shall he lire. And whos6- 
erer lireth, and beliereth in me, shall nerer 
die/' XJnion with me is union with the Eter- 
nal God and his Life> and the certain assurance 
thereof; so that in every moment of time, he 
who is so united with me, is in complete pos- 
session of Eternity, and places no faith what- 
ever in the fleeting and illusive phenomena of a 
birth and a death in Time, and therefore needs 
no re-aWakening as a deUverance from a death 
in which he does not beheve. 
And whence has JeSus this power of giving Eternal 
Life to his followers ? From his absolute identity with 
God. Chap. V. verse 26—" As the Father hath life in 
himselfj so hath he given to the Son to have life in 
himself." 

Further,*— in what way do the followers of Jesus 
become partakers of this identity of their Life with the 
JDivine Life ? Jesus declares this in the most manifold 
and varied ways, of which I shall here only adduce the 
most clear and forcible, — those which, precisely on 
account of their absolute clearness, have been the most 
completely unintelligible and offensive, both to his con* 
temporaries and to their descendants even to the present 
day. Chap. VI. rer. 53-66 — " Except ye eat the flesh 
of the Son of Man, and drink his blood, ye hate no 
life in you« Whoso eateth my flesh, and drinketh my 
Uood, hath eternal life. My flesh is the true food^ 



112 LECTURE VI. 

and my blood is the true drink." What does this 
mean ? He explains himself at v. 56 — " He that eateth 
my flesh, and drinketh my blood, dweUedi in me, and 
I in him," or, reversing the expression, He that dwell- 
eth in me and I in him, he hath eaten my flesh, &c. 
To eat his flesh, and drink his blood, means — to be- 
come wholly and entirely he himself; — to become 
altogeflier changed into his person without reserve or 
limitation; — to be a faithfiil repetition of him in 
another personality ; — to be transubstantiated with 
him, — i.€. as he is the Eternal Word made flesh and 
blood, to become his flesh and blood, and what follows 
from that, and indeed is the same thing, to become 
the very Eternal Word made flesh and blood itself; — 
to think wholly and entirely like him, and so as if he 
himself thought, and not we; — to live wholly and 
entirely like him, and so as if he himself lived in our 
life. As surely as you do not now attempt to drag 
down my own words, and reduce them to the narrow 
meaning that Jesus is only to be imitated, as an un- 
attainable pattern, partially and at a distance, as far 
as human weakness will allow, but accept them in the 
sense in which I have spoken them, — that we must be 
transformed into Christ himself, — so surely will it be- 
come evident to you that Jesus could not well have 
expressed himself otherwise, and that he actually did 
express himself excellently well. Jesus was very far 
from representing himself as that unattainable ideal 
into which he was first transformed by the spiritual 
poverty of after-ages ; nor did his Apostles so regard 
him : — among the rest Paul, who says : — "I live not, 
but Christ liveth in me." Jesus desired that he should 
be repeated in the persons of his followers, in his com^ 



DOCTRINB OF THE JOHAKNEAN GOSPEL. 113 

plete and undivided character, as he Wen in himself; 
and indeed he demanded this absolutely, as an indis^ 
pensable condition of discipleship :— Except je eat my 
fleshy &c., ye have no life whatever in you, but ye 
abide in the graves wherein I found you. 

Only ihia one thing he demanded : not more, and 
not less. He did not, by any means, propose to rest 
satisfied with the mere historical belief that he was the 
Eternal Word made flesh,— the Christ, — for which he 
gave himself out. He certainly did demand, even 
according to John, as a preliminary condition, — only 
to secure attention and consideration to his teachings — 
he did demand Faith, that is^ the previous admission 
of the possibility that he might be indeed this Christ ; 
and he even did not disdain to faciHtate and strengthen 
this admission by means of striking and wonderful 
works which he performed. But the final and decisive 
proof, which was first to be made possible through the 
preliminary admission, or Faith, was this: — that a 
man should actually do the will of him who had sent 
Jesus,— that is, in the sense we have explained, should 
eat his flesh and drink his blood, whereby he should 
then know of the doctrine, that it was from God, and 
that he spake not of himself. As Uttle is his discourse 
of faith in his expiatory merits. According to John, 
Jesus is indeed a Lamb of God that taketh away the 
sins of the world, but by no means one who with 
his blood appeases an angry God. He takes them 
away :— According to his doctrine, man does not exist 
at all out of God and him, but is dead and buried ; 
he does not even enter into the Spiritual Kingdom of 
God: — how then can this poor, non-eidstent shadow 
intiroduce dissension into this Kingdom, and disturb 

L 2 



114 LECTURE VI. 

the Divine Plan? But he who is transformed into 
the Ukeness of Jesus, and thereby into that of God, — 
he no longer Hves himself, but God lives in him; — 
but how can God sin against himself? Thus has he 
borne away and destroyed the whole delusion of sin, 
and the dread of a Godhead that could feel itself 
offended by men. Finally, if any man in this way 
should repeat the character of Jesus in his own person, 
what then, according to the doctrine of Jesus, is the 
result ? Thus does Jesus, in the presence of his dis- 
ciples, call upon his Father : — Chap. XVII. verse 20 — 
" Neither pray I for these alone, but for them also 
which shall believe on me through their word ; that 
they all may be one ; as thou. Father, art in me, and I 
in thee, that they also may be one in us." — One — in 
us. Now, according to this consimmiation, all dis- 
tinctions are laid aside; the whole community, the 
first-born of all, with his more immediate followers, 
and with all those who are bom in later days, here fall 
back together into the one common source of all their 
Ufe — the Godhead. And thus, as we have maintained 
above, does Christianity, assuming its purpose to be 
attained, again fall into harmony with the Absolute 
Truth, and itself maintain that every man may and 
ought to come into unity with God; and himself, in his 
own personahty, become the Divine Ex-istence, or the 
Eternal Word. 

And thus it is proved that the doctrine of Christianity, 
even in the system of images under which it represents 
Life and Death and all that flows therefrom, is in strict 
harmony with that doctrine which we have set forth 
to you in our previous lectures, and have combined into 
one single view at the beginning of to-day's discourse. 



DOCTRINE OF THE JOHANNEAN GOSPEL. 115 

In conclusion, listen once more to that with which I 
closed my last lecture, but now in the words of the 
same Apostle John. 

Thus he combines, doubtless with reference to his 
Gospel, the practical results of the whole : Epistle I. 
Chap. I. — " That which was from the beginning, which 
we have heard, which we have seen with our eyes, 
which we have looked upon, and our hands have 
handled, of the Word of Life." Do you observe how 
anxious he is to appear, not as giving forth his own 
thoughts in his Gospel, but as the mere witness of 
what he had observed ? " That which we have seen 
and heard declare we unto you, that ye also" — in 
spirit, and on the foundation of the last words we have 
quoted from Jesus — " may have fellowship with us; 
and truly our fellowship" — ours, the Apostles, as well 
as yours, the newly converted — " is with the Father, 

and with his Son Jesus Christ If we 

say that we have fellowship with him, and walk in 
darkness" — if we think that we are imited with God 
while yet the Divine Energy does not burst forth in 
our lives — " we lie, and do not the truth" — we are 
but fanatics and visionaries. — " But if we walk in the 
light, as he is in the Light, we have fellowship one 
with another, and the blood of Jesus Christ the Son of 
God" — not, in the metaphysical sense, his blood shed 
for the remission of our sins, but his blood and mind 
entered into us, — his Life in us — " cleanseth us from 
aU sin" and raiseth us far above the possibility of 
sinning. 



(116) 



APPENDIX TO LECTURE VI. 

THE HISTORICAL AND THE METAPHYSICAL IN 

CHRISTLAlNITY. 

That the fundametital doctrine of Christianity^ as a 
special institution for the development of Religion in 
the Human Race: — Le* that in Jesus Christy for the 
first time, and in a way predicable of no other man^ 
the Eternal Ex-istence (Daseyn) of God has assumed a 
human personality ; and that all other men can attain 
to union with God only through him, and by means 
of the repetition of his whole character in themselves ; 
-that this is a merely historical, and not in any way 
a metaphysical proposition, we have already said in the 
text— (page 103.) It is perhaps not superfluous to 
point out here, still more clearly, the distinction upon 
which this declaration is founded; since I am not 
entitled to make the same assumption in the case of 
the general public, to whom it is now presented, as in 
the case of the majority of my immediate hearers, — 
that they are already familiar with this distinction from 
my other teachings. 

If we take these expressions in their strict significa- 
tion, the Historical and the Metaphysical are directly 
opposed to each other ; and that which is really his- 
torical is, on that very account, not metaphysical — 
and the reverse. The Historical, and what is purely 



APPENDIX TO LECTURE VI. 117 

historical in every possible phenomenon, is that which 
may be apprehended as simple and absolute Fact, 
existing for itself alone and isolated ifrom everything 
else, not as receiving its explanation and derivation 
from a higher source : — the Metaphysical, on the con- 
trary, and the metaphysical element in every particular 
phenomenon, is that which necessarily proceeds from a 
higher and more comprehensive law, and which may 
be again referred to that law ; and therefore cannot be 
comprehended as a simple fact ; and, strictly speaking, 
can only by means of a delusion be so regarded, since 
in truth it is not apprehended as a fact, but only in 
consequence of the Law of Reason that rules within us. 
The latter element of the phenomenon never extends 
to its actuaUty, and the actual phenomenon never 
altogether disappears in it ; and therefore in all actual 
phenomena these two elements are inseparably com- 
bined. 

It is the ftmdamental error of all pretended science 
that does not recognise its own boundaries, or, in other 
words, 6f the transcendental use of the understanding, 
— that it is not satisfied to accept the fact, simply as a 
fact, but must indulge in metaphysical speculation 
concerning it. Since, on the supposition that what 
such a Metaphysic labours to refer to a higher law is 
in truth simply actual and historic, there can be no 
such law, at least none accessible to us in the present 
life, it follows, that the Metaphysic we have described, 
arbitrarily assuming that such an explanation is to be 
found here, — which is its first error, — must then 
have recourse to its own invention for such an explana- 
tion, and fill up the chasm by an arbitrary hypothesis, 
— which is its second error. 



118 THS HISTORICAL AND THB 

With regard to the case now before us,-'««- the primi- 
tivo fact of Christianity is accepted aS historical, and 
simply as feet, when we say, what is evident to every 
man, that Jesus knew what he did know before any 
one else knew it, and taught and lived as hd did;-'^ 
without desiring to know further Aou; all this was 
possible for him, which> according to well established 
principles, not however to be communicated here, can 
never be ascertained in this life* But the same fact is 
metaphysisized by the transcendental use of the under^ 
standing, soaring beyond the fact itself, when we 
attempt to comprehend it in its primitive source, and 
to this end set up an hypotheiSis as to how the indivi- 
dual Jesus, as an individual, has emanated from the 
essential Divine Nature. As an individual, I have 
said ;-^for how Humanity as a whole has come forth 
from the Divine Nature may be comprehended, and 
must have been made intelligible by our preceding 
lectures; and isi according to us, the theme of the 
introduction to the Johannean GospeL 

Now, to us in particular who only regard the matter 
historically, it is of no importance in which of these 
two ways the above-mentioned principle is received 
by any one else, but only in what way it has been 
accepted by Jesus himself, and his Apostle John, and 
how they authorized others to accept it; and it is 
certainly the most important element in our view of 
the matter^ that Christianity itself, as represented by 
Jesus, has by no means accepted that principle meta^ 
physically. 

We retrace our argument to the following pro- 
positions \* — 

(1.) Jesus of Nazareth undoubtedly possessed the 



METAPHYSI0AI4 IN CHRISTIANITY. 119 

highest perception, contidning the foundation pf rU 
other Truth, of the absolute identity of Humanity yrith 
the Godhead, aa regards what is essentially real in 
the former. Upon this merely historical proposition, 
every one to whom the following evidence is to prove 
anything whatever, must first of all come to an under, 
standing with me ; and I entreat my readers not to hurry 
over this point. In my opinion, no one who has not 
previously attained, by another way, to the knowledge 
of the One Reality, and has not possessed this know- 
ledge in living activity within him, will easily discover 
it where I, being first penetrated by this condition, 
have found it. But if any one have already fulfilled 
this condition, and thereby created for himself the 
organ by which alone Christianity may be compre- 
hended, then he will not only distinctly re-discover 
this fundamental truth in Christianity, but he will also 
discern a higher and holier significance spread over 
the other, often apparently extraordinary, expressions 
of these writings, 

(2.) The mode and manner of this knowledge in 
Jesus Christ, which is the second point of importance, 
may be best characterized by contrast with the mode 
and manner in which the speculative philosopher ar« 
rives at the same knowledge. The latter proceeds upon 
the problem, which in itself is foreign to Religion, 
and even profane in its sight, and which is imposed 
upon him merely by his desire of knowledge,— to 
explain Existence. Wherever there is a learned public, 
he finds this problem already proposed by others before 
him, and he finds fellow-labourers in its solution both 
among his predecessors and his contemporaries. It 
can never occur to him to regard himself aa in any 



120 THE HISTORICAL AND THE 

respect singular or distinguished on account of the 
problem becoming clear to him. Further, the problem, 
as a problem, appeals to his own industry, and to the 
personal freedom of which he is clearly conscious; 
and being thus clearly conscious of his own personal 
actiyity, he cannot, on that very account, regard him- 
self as inspired. 

Suppose, finally, that he succeed in the solution, 
and that in the only true way, — by means of the Re- 
ligious Principle ; his discovery stiU proceeds upon a 
series of preparatory investigations, and in this way it 
is to him a natural occurrence. ReUgion is but a 
secondary matter to him, and is not there purely and 
solely as ReUgion, but only as the solution of the 
riddle, which had constituted the problem of his life. 

It was not so with Jesus. In the first place, he 
did not set out from any speculative question which 
could be solved only by a ReHgious Knowledge, to 
which he attained only at a later period and only 
in the course of the investigation of that question; 
for he explained absolutely nothing by his Religious 
Principle, and deduced nothing from it ; but he pre- 
sented it altogether alone and by itself, as the only 
thing worthy of knowledge, passing by everything 
else as undeserving of notice. His Faith, and his 
conviction, never allowed the question to arise as to 
the existence of finite things. In short, they had 
no existence for him, and only in union with God was 
there ReaUty. How this Non-Entity could assume the 
semblance of Being, from which doubt all profane 
speculation proceeds, he cared not to inquire. 

As Uttle had he his knowledge by outward teaching 
and tradition; for with that truly sublime sincerity 



METAPHYSICAL IN CHRISTIANITY. 121 

and openness which are evident in all his e^ressions^ 
—and here I venture to assume on the part of my 
reader that he has created for himself an intuitive 
perception of this sincerity by means of his ovni per- 
sonal relation to this virtue and by a profoimd study 
of the life of Jesus, — he would in that case have said 
so, and directed his disciples to the sources of his 
own knowledge. It does not follow, because he him- 
self indicated the existence of a knowledge of the 
true religion before Abraham, and one of his apostles 
distinctly refers to Melchisedek, that Jesus had any 
connexion with that system by direct tradition; but 
it might readily happen that he should re-discover, in 
his study of Moses, that which was already present 
in his own mind ; since it is evident from numerous 
other instances that he had an infinitely more profound 
comprehension of the writings of the Old Testament 
than the Scriptural students of his own day, and the 
majority of those of our own ; while he likewise pro- 
ceeded, as it appears, upon the hermeneutical principle, 
that Moses and the Prophets really desired to say 
something and not nothing. 

To say that Jesus did not i-eceive his knowledge 
either by means of his own speculation, or by com- 
munication from without, is equivalent to saying that 
he had it solely through his own Existence, — that it 
was to him primary and absolute, without any other 
element whatever vdth which it was connected, — purely 
through Inspiration, as we coming after him, and in 
contrast with our own knowledge, may express it, but 
as he himself never could express it. And what know- 
ledge had he in this way ? That all Being is founded 
in God alone; and consequently, what immediately 

M 



122 THE HISTORICAL AND THE 

follows from this, that his own Being, with this 
knowledge, and in this knowledge, had its foundation 
in God, and proceeded directly from him. What im- 
mediately follows, I said: — for to us certainly the 
latter is an inference from the universal to the parti- 
cular, since we must first of all annihilate our existing 
personal Ego, as the particular in question, in the 
universal: but it was by no means the same, — which 
I entreat you to remark as the chief point, — it was 
by no means the same with Jesus. In him there 
was no intellectual, questioning, or learning Self to an- 
nihilate, for in this knowledge his whole spiritual self 
was already swallowed up. His Self-consciousness was 
at once the pure and absolute Truth of Reason it- 
self; self-existent and iudependent, — the simple fact of 
consciousness ; but by no means, as with us, genetic, 
arising from another preceding state, and hence no 
simple fact of consciousness, but an inference. In that 
which I have thus endeavoured to express with the 
utmost precision and distinctness, must have consisted 
the peculiar personal character of Jesus Christ, who, 
like every other true Individuality, can have appeared 
but once in Time, and can never be repeated therein. 
He was the Absolute Reason, clothed in immediate 
Self-consciousness; or, what is the same thing, — Re- 
ligion. 

(3.) In this absolute Fact, Jesus reposed with his 
whole being, and was entirely lost therein ; he could 
never think, know, or say anything else but that he 
knew it was so in very deed ; that he knew it imme- 
diately in God; and that he also knew this in very 
deed — that he knew it immediately in God. As little 
could he point out to his disciples any other way to 



METAPHYSICAL IN CHRISTIANITY. 123 

Blessedness than that they should become like as he 
was ; for that his way of Existence was the source of 
Blessedness, he knew in himself; but he knew not 
this Blessed Life in any other shape than in himself 
and as his own way of Existence, and therefore he 
could not otherwise describe it. He knew it not in 
the abstract and universal conception in which the 
speculative philosopher knows it and can describe it ; 
for he did not proceed upon such conceptions, but 
only on his own Self-consciousness. He received it 
only historically ; and he who receives it as we have 
explained ourselves above, receives it in Uke manner, 
and, as it seems to us, after his example, only his- 
torically. There was such a man, at such and such 
a time, in the land of Judea ; — and so far well. But 
he who desires to know further, through what arbitrary 
arrangement of God, or inward necessity in God, such 
an individual was possible and actual, steps beyond 
the fact, and desires to metaphysisize that which is 
merely historical. 

For Jesus such a transcendentalism was absolutely 
impossible; for to this end it would have been re- 
quisite for him to distinguish himself, in his own per- 
sonality, from God, represent himself as thus separate, 
wonder over himself as a remarkable phenomenon, 
and propose to himself the task of solving the problem 
of the possibUity of such an individual. But it is 
precisely the most prominent and striking trait in 
the character of the Johannean Jesus, ever recurring 
in the same shape, that he will know nothing of 
such a separation of his personaHty from his Father, 
and that he earnestly rebukes others who attempt 
to make such a distinction; while he constantly as- 



124 APPENDIX TO LECTUKB VI. 

sumes that he who sees him sees the Father, that 
he who hears him hears the Father, and that he and 
the Father are wholly one; and he unconditionally 
denies and rejects the notion of an independent being 
in himself, such an unbecoming elevation of himself 
having been made an objection against him by mis- 
understanding. To him Jesus was not God, for to him 
there was no independent Jesus whatever; but God 
was Jesus, and manifested himself as Jesus. Such self-* 
contemplation, and admiration of one's self, was very 
fiir removed, — I will not say from a man like Jesus, 
with reference to whom the very acquittal from such 
a charge would be something Hke blasphemy, — but 
from the whole Realism of the ancient world; and 
the faculty of constantly looking back upon ourselves, 
to see how it stands with us and our feelings, and 
thu3 again to feel the feeling of our feelings, and so 
to explain ourselves and our remarkable personaUty 
psychologically, even to tediousness, was reserved for 
the Modems; — with whom, on that very account, it 
can never be well until they are satisfied to live simply 
and plainly, without desiring to live their life over 
again in its various possible forms ; leaving it to others, 
who have nothing better to do, if they find it worth 
their while, to marvel over this life of theirs, and 
to render it intelligible. 



(125) 



LECTURE VII. 

FIVE MODES OF MAN'S ENJOYMENT OF THE WORLD 
AND HIMSELF: — SENSUOUS ENJOYMENT, 
LEGALITY, STOICISM. 

Our theory of Being and Life is now completely laid 
before you. It has been shown, not by any means as 
a proof of this theory, but merely as a collateral illus- 
tration, that the doctrine of Christianity on these sub- 
jects is the same as our own. With reference to this 
latter view, I have only here to ask permission to make 
such farther use of the evidence that has been brought 
forward, as sometimes to employ an expression or an 
image from the Christian Scriptures, in which are to 
be found most admirable and significant unages. I 
shall not abuse this Hberty. I am not ignorant that 
in this age we can enter no circle at aU numerous 
among the cultivated classes, in which there shall 
not be found some one in whom the mention of the 
name of Jesus, or the use of Scriptural expressions, 
excites impleasant feelings, and the suspicion that the 
speaker must be either a hjrpocrite or a fool, or both. 
It is wholly opposed to my principles to find fault 
with any one on this account: — who can know how 
much he may have been tormented with these matters 
by meddling zealots, and what irrational things may 

M 2 



126 LECTURE VII. 

have been forced upon him as Scripture doctrine? 
But on the other hand, I know that in every cultivated 
society, and consequently in that which assembles here, 
there are to be found other individuals who love to 
&]1 back upon these associations, and, with them, upon 
the feelings of early youth. Let both these classes here 
reciprocally accommodate themselves to each other. 
I shall say all that I have to say, in the first place 
in ordinax; language :-let those'to whom ScriiJural 
images are offensive, confine themselves to the first 
expression, and pass over the second altogether. 

The Hving possession of the theory we have now 
set forth, — not the dry, dead, and merely historical 
knowledge of it, — is, according to our doctrine, the 
highest, and indeed the only possible, Blessedness. To 
demonstrate this is our business henceforward; and 
this marks out the second leading division of these 
lectures, which has also been separated &om the first 
by the episodical inquiry to which the immediately 
preceding lecture was devoted. 

Clearness is always increased by contrast. Since we 
are minded to comprehend thoroughly the True and 
Bliss-giving mode of Thought, and to depict it to the 
life, it will be well to characterize, more profoundly and 
distinctly than we were able to do in our first lecture, in 
which however we did certainly describe it, that super- 
ficial and imblessed mode of Existence which is direct- 
ly opposed to the former, and which we, in common 
with Christianity, name a Non-Existence, Death and 
Burial of a living body. We have formerly character- 
ized this false mode of Though j;, in opposition to the 
true, as vagrancy in the Manifold, contrasted with 
retirement and concentration in the One ; and this is. 



I 
FIVE MODES OF ENJOYMENT. 127 

and remains, its essential characteristic. Biit instead' 
of directing our attention, as we did formerly, more to 
the manifold outward objects among which it is dis- 
sipated, let us now consider, without any reference 
whatever to the object, how this mode of Thought is 
in itself an open, shallow superficiality, — a brok^i 
fountain whose waters run waste on all sides. 

AU inward spiritual energy appears, in immediate 
Consciousness, as a concentration, comprehension, and 
contraction of the otherwise distracted spirit into one 
point, and as a persistence in this one point, in opposi- 
tion to the constant natural effort to throw off this con- 
centration, and to become once more diffused abroad. 
Thus. I say, does aU inward energy appear; and it is 
only in thiB concentration that man is independent, 
and feels himself to be independent. Beyond this 
condition of self-contraction, he is dispersed and melted 
away as before; and that not according to his own 
wiU and purpose, for any such effort is the opposite of 
di^ersion^ToncentraJn, but just a. he is moulded 
and formed by lawless and incomprehensible chance. 
In this latter condition, therefore, he has no indepen- 
dence whatever ; he exists, not as a substantial reality, 
but as a fugitive phenomenon of Nature. In shorty 
{he original image of spiritual independence, in Con- 
sdousness, is an ever self-forming and vitaUy persistent 
geometric point ; just a^ the original image of de- 
pendence and of spiritual nonenity is an indefinitely 
outspreading surface. Independence draws the world 
into an apex; dependence spreads it out into a fiat 
extended plain. 

In the former condition only is there power, and 
the consciousness of power ; and hence in it only is a 



128 LECTURE VII. 

powerfiil and energetic comprehension and penetration, 
of the world possible. In the second condition there 
is no power : the Spirit of Man is not even present and 
at home in the comprehension of the World, but, like 
Baal in the ancient narrative, he has gone upon a 
journey, or is asleep : how can he feel himself in the 
object, and distinguish himself from it? He passes 
away, even from himself, in the current of phenomena ; 
and thus his world pales before him, and instead of the 
living Nature by which he must estimate his own Ufe, 
and to which he must oppose it, he beholds but a gray 
spectre, a misty and uncertain shape. To such may 
be applied what an ancient Prophet said of the idols 
of the heathen : — " They have eyes, and see not ; and 
have ears, and they hear not." They, in fact, see not 
with seeing eyes ; for it is a wholly different thing to 
comprehend, in the eye and in the mind, the visible 
object in its definite limitations, so that from hence- 
forward we may be able at any moment voluntarily to 
recall it before the spiritual eye precisely as it had been 
seen at first, — imder which condition alone any one 
can truly say he has seen it ; — and to have a shadowy 
and formless appearance floating before us in vague 
imcertainty, imtil it disappears altogether, leaving be- 
hind it no trace of its existence. He who has not yet 
attained to this vivid comprehension of the objects of 
Outward Sense, may rest assured that he is yet a far 
way off from the infinitely higher Spiritual Life. 

In this tedious, diffuse, and manifold condition, a 
multitude of oppositions and contradictions lie quietly 
and tolerantly beside each other. In it there is nothing 
discriminated and separated, but all things stand upon 
an equahty, and have grown up along with each other. 



SPIRITUAL NON-EXISTENCE. 129 

They who live in it hold nothing to be true, and 
nothing false; they love nothing, and hate nothing. 
For, in the first place, to such recognition as they might 
hold by for ever, to love, to hate, or to any other 
affection, there belongs that very energetic self-concen" 
tration of which they are incapable ; and, secondly, it 
is likevrise requisite, to such recognition or affection, 
that they should separate and discriminate the Mani- 
fold, in order to choose therefrom the particular object 
of their recognition and affection. But how can ihej 
accept anything whatever as established truth, since 
they would thereby be constrained to cast aside and 
reject, as false, all other possible things that are opr 
posed to it; — to which their tender attachment, even 
to its opposite, will by no means consent ? How can 
they love anything whatever with their whole souU 
since they would then be under the necessity of hating 
its opposite, which their universal love and toleration 
wiU not permit. They love nothing. I said ; and in- 
terest themselves for nothing, — not even for themselves. 
If they ever propose the questions to themselves.: — 
" Have I then right on my side, or have I not ? am I 
right, or am I wrong ? what is to become of me, and 
am I on the way to happiness or to misery?" — they 
must answer : " What matters it to me ; I shall see 
what becomes of me, and must accommodate myself to 
whatever happens ; — time will show the result." Thus 
are they despised, cast aside, and rejected of th^n* 
selves ; and thus even their most immediate possessors, 
they themselves, need not trouble themselves about 
them. Who else shall ascribe to them greater value 
than they themselves do ? They have resigned them- 
selves to blind and lawless chance, to make of them 
whatever chance may bring forth. 



130 LECTURE VII. 

As the right mode of thought is in itself right and 
good, and needs no good works to exalt its value, — 
although such good works will never indeed be awant- 
ing, — so is the mode of thought, which we have now 
described, in itself worthless and despicable, and there 
is no need of any particular mahgnancy being super- 
added to it, to make it worthless and despicable ; and 
thus no one need here console himself with the idea 
that he nevertheless does nothing evil, but perhaps, 
according to his notions, even does what he calls good. 
This is indeed the very sinful pride of this mode of 
thought, that these men think they could sin if they 
would ; and that we must accord them great thanks if 
they refrain from doing so. They mistake : — they can do 
nothing whatever, for they do not even exist, and there 
are no such realities as they imagine themselves to be ; 
but, in their stead, there lives and works mere blind 
and lawless chance ; and this manifests itself, just as it 
happens, here as an evil, and there as an outwardly 
blameless phenomenon, — without the phenomenon, the 
mere impress and shadow of a blindly operative power, 
being, on that account, deserving, in the first case of 
blame, or in the second case of praise. Whether they 
shall prove to be noxious or beneficent phenomena, we 
can only know from the result, and it is of no import- 
ance. We know assuredly that, in any case, they shall 
be without inward Spiritual Life, in a state of vague 
incoherence and uncertainty; for that which rules 
within them, the blind power of Nature, can express 
itself in no other way, and this tree can bear no other 
fruit. 

That which renders this state of mind incurable, 
which deprives it of all incitement towards a better, 



SPIRITUAL NON-EXISTENCE. 131 

and closes it against instruction from without, is the 
almost total incapacity which is associated with it, 
to apprehend in its true sense, even historically, any- 
thing that lies beyond its own mode of thought. They 
would think that they had cast off all love of humanity, 
and had done the most grievous injustice to an honour- 
able man, were they to admit that, however singularly 
he might express himself, he could mean, or wish to 
mean, anything else than that which they mean and 
say; or were they to ascribe to any communication 
from other men any other purpose than to repeat 
before them some old and well-known lesson, so that 
they might be satisfied that the speaker had thoroughly 
learned it by rote. Let a man guard himself as he may 
by means of the most distinctly marked antagonisms, — 
let him exhaust aU the resources of language to choose 
the strongest, most striking, and most convincing ex- 
pression, — as soon as it reaches their ear, it loses its 
nature, and becomes changed into the old triviahty; 
and their art, of dragging down everything to their 
own level, is triumphant over all other art. Therefore 
are they in the highest degree averse to aU powerful 
and energetic expressions, and particularly to such as 
strive to enforce comprehension by means of images ; 
and, according to their law, those expressions must 
everywhere ]je selected that are most general, inde- 
finite, and far-fetched, and on that very account most 
powerless and inexpressive, under pain of appearing to 
be unpolished and obtrusive. Thus, when Jesus spoke 
of eating his flesh and drinking his blood, his disciples 
found it a hard saying ; and when he mentioned the 
possibiUty of a union with God, the Jews took up 
stones and cast at him. They are always in the right ; 



132 LECTURE VII. 

and since there can nothing whatever be said at any 
time but that which they ah^eady express in their Ian- 
guage in this way or that, wh^we then the surprising 
effort to express this same thing in another fashion, 
whereby there is only imposed upon them the super- 
fluous labour of translating it back again into their 
own speech? 

This delineation of spiritual Non-Existence, or, to 
use the image of Christianity, of the Death and Burial 
of a living body, has been here introduced, partly in 
order to set forth the Spiritual Life more clearly by 
contrast, and partly because it is itself a necessary 
element in that description of man, in his relation to 
Well-Being, which it is our next duty to undertake. 
As a guide to this description, we possess, and shall 
employ, those five standing-points in man's view of 
the World which we set forth in our fifth lecture ; — 
or, since the standing-point of Science is excluded 
from popular discourses, the other four, — as so many 
standing-points in man's enjoyment of the World and of 
himself. To them the state of spiritual Non-Existence 
which we have just described does not at all belong ; 
— it is no possible or positive something, but a pure 
nothing; and so it is likewise altogether negative in 
relation to enjoyment and Well-Being. In it there is 
no such thing as Love, whilst all enjoymQpit is founded 
on Love. Hence, to this condition enjoyment is alto- 
gether impossible; and therefore a description of it 
was requisite at the outset, as the description of ab- 
solute joylessness or unblessedness, in opposition to 
the several modes, now to be set forth, in which man 
may actually enjoy the World, or himself. 

AU enjoyment, I have said, is founded on Love. 



LOVE THE BASIS OF ENJOYMENT. 133 

What then is Love? I say: Love is the aflfection 
{Affekt) of Being (Seyn). Argue it thus with me : — 
Being (Seyn) is self-reliant, self-sufficient, self-complete, 
and needs no Being beyond itself. Now let this be 
felt in absolute Self-consciousness; and what arises? 
Obviously nothing else than a feeUng of this independ- 
ence and self-sufficiency; — hence, a Love of this self; 
— or, as I said, an affection or attachment of Being, 
by means of itself alone ; that is, the feeling of Being 
as Being. Add further, that in the Finite Being, such 
as we have described above, who always conceives of 
himself as in a state of change and transition, there 
Ukewise dwells an original image of his True and 
Proper Being, — ^then does he love this original image; 
and when his actual and palpable being is in harmony 
with this primitive image, then is his Love satisfied, 
and it is well with him ; but when, on the contrary, 
his actual being is not in harmony with this primitive 
image, which nevertheless continues Hving, inextin- 
guishable, and eternally beloved within him, then it is 
not well with him, for then he wants that which never- 
theless he cannot hinder himself from loving before 
aU things, longing and sorrowing after it continually. 
Well-being is union with the object of our Love; 
sorrow is separation from it. Only through Love does 
man subject .himself to the influence of well-being or 
of sorrow ; he who does not love, is secure from both 
of these. But let no one believe that the wan and 
death-like condition that we have described above, 
which as it is without love is also assuredly without 
sorrow, is on that account to be preferred to the life 
in Love, that is accessible to sorrow, and may be 
wounded by it. For, in the first place, we at least 

N 



134 LECTURE VII. 

feel, recognise, and possess ourselves, even in the feel- 
ing of sorrow, and this of itself is unspeakably more 
blessed than that absolute want of any self-conscious- 
ness; and, in the second place, this sorrow is the 
wholesome spur that should impel us, and that sooner 
or later will impel us, to union with the object of our 
Love, and to Blessedness therein. Happy, therefore, 
is the man who is able to sorrow and to feel desire. 

To the Fu-st standing-point from which mm may 
view the World, in which reahty is attributed only to 
the objects of Outward Sense, sensual pleasure is of 
course the predominant motive in his enjoyment of 
himself and of the World. Even this, — as we have 
already said with a more scientific purpose, and in il- 
lustration of the first principle we laid down of this 
whole matter, — even this is founded on an affection of 
Being, — in this case, as an organized sensuous life ; on 
the love for this Being and for the means and condi- 
tions of this Being, immediately felt, demanded and 
developed, — not, as some have supposed, perceived 
only by an unconscious inference of the understanding. 
An article of food has a pleasant taste to us, and a 
flower a pleasant smell, because they exalt and enliven 
our organic existence ; and the pleasant taste, as well 
as the pleasant smell, is nothing else than the imme- 
diate feeling of this exaltation and enlivenment. But 
let us not longer pause at this mode of enjoyment, 
which although it certainly is a constituent element in 
the system of Universal Life, and on that account is 
perhaps not properly to be despised, is nevertheless 
undeserving of deliberate thought or earnest attention! 
— although I must candidly confess that, in a compa- 
rative point of view, he who can throw himself wholly 



SENSUOUS ENJOYMENT. 135 

and with ondiTidcd feeling into a sensual enjoyment, 
U. in », opmioo. rf &r ^ worth, inZ^rf 

the consequential philosopher, than he who from mere 
superficiaHty, yagrancy, and vague diffusiveness, is in- 
capable of even rightly enjoying taste or smell, where 
only taste or smell can be enjoyed. 

In the social state there intervenes between this 
merely sensual appetite and the higher forms of enjoy- 
ment, another class of affections, interposed by means 
of fancy, which however always relate at last to a 
sensual enjoyment, and proceed from such. Thus, for 
example, the miser indeed voluntarily subjects himself 
to present want for which he has no immediate desire, 
but only from fear of future want for which he has 
still less desire ; and because he has so strans^ely trained 
his fancy, that he suffers more from thS Lgined 
ftiture hunger, than from the real hunger that he 
actually feels at the present moment. Neither let us 
pause any longer at these unsubstantial, shallow, and 
capricious affections, even although opposed to imme- 
diate sensual enjoyment : — all that belongs to this re- 
gion is alike shallow and capricious. 

The Second standing-point from which the World 
may be viewed is that of LegaHty, in which reality is 
attributed only to a Spiritual Law ordering all actual 
Existence. What is the affection of this standing- 
point, and what is its consequent relation to well-- 
being? For those among you who possess philosophical 
knowledge, I shall here, in passing, in a few short 
remarks and with strict consequentiaUty, throw a new 
light on this matter which has already been so well 
treated of by Kant. 

Man, on this standing-point, is, in the deepest root 



136 LECTURE VII. 

of his being, himself the Law, This Law is the self- 
reliant, self-supporting Being of such a man, which 
neither needs nor can admit any other Being whatever 
besides itself : — a Law absolutely for the sake of Law, 
and wholly disdaining any purpose beyond itself. 

In the first place: — thus rooted in Law, man can 
still be, think, and act. The philosopher who is not 
wholly superficial proves this a priori; the man who 
is not wholly rude, or senseless, feels it constantly in 
himself, and proves it by his whole life and thoughts 
The celebrated axiom which, since this principle has 
been reproduced in our own time by Kiint and others, 
has been brought forward and repeated usque ad nau- 
seam by a decisive majority of the theologians, philoso- 
phers, and beaux-esprits of the age, — the axiom that 
it is absolutely impossible for man to wiU without 
having an external object of his vohtion, or to act 
without having an external object of his action — this 
axiom we need not meddle with, but have only to 
meet it with cold and contemptuous rejection. Whence 
do they know what they so categorically maintain, and 
how do they propose to prove their axiom ? They 
know it only from their knowledge of themselves ; 
and hence they desire nothing from an opponent but 
that he should look into his own bosom, and find him- 
self such as they are. They cannot do it, and there- 
fore they maintain that no man can do it. But again : 
— what is it they cannot do ? Will and act without an 
object beyond the action. And what is there that lies 
beyond will and action, and mental independence? 
Nothing whatever but sensual well-being ; for this is 
the only opposite of these : — sensual well-being, I say, 
however strangely it may be described, and even al- 



LEGALITY. 137 

though the time and place of its fruition should be 
placed on the other side of the grave. And thus, what 
is it which they have discovered in this knowledge of 
themselves? Answer: — that they cannot even think, 
move, nor in any way bestir themselves, unless with a 
view to some outward well-being which is thereby to 
be attained; that they cannot regard themselves as 
anything but the means and instruments of some sen- 
sual enjoyment, and that, according to their firm con- 
viction, the Spiritual in them only exists for the pur- 
pose of nursing and tending on the Animal. Who 
shall dispute their self-knowledge, or attempt to gain- 
say them in that which they themselves must know 
best of all, and which, in fact, only they themselves 
can know. 

Man, on the second standing-point from which the 
World may be viewed, is himself the Law, we said ; — 
a living, self-conscious, self-attached Law, we say, or 
an affection of Law. But the affection of Law, as 
Law, and in this form, is, as I call upon you to per- 
ceive, an absolute command, an unconditional obUga- 
tion, a Categorical Imperative ; which, on account of 
this very categorical nature of its form, wholly rejects 
all love or inclination towards the thing commanded. 
It shall be, that is all: — simply it shall. If thou 
wovldst do it, there would be no need of the shall; it 
would come too late, and would be rejected ; while, on 
the contrary, as surely as thou, on thy part, obeyest 
the shallf and canst so obey, so surely dost thou not 
wiU; volition is beyond thy reach, inclination and love 
are expressly laid aside. 

Now, could man wholly resign himself with his 
entire Life to this affection of Law^ then would he 



138 LECTURE VII. 

abide solely by this cold and rigid commandment; and, 
with regard to his view of himself and of the World, 
by the absolutely miinterested judgment of a thing 
being in accordance with the Law, or not; — wholly 
excluding all personal inclination, and every thought 
of it being agreeable or disagreeable; as indeed is 
actually the case where men give themselves up to 
this affection. Such an one, notwithstanding a strict 
knowledge of the Law, might yet declare that he did 
not, and would not, act in accordance vdth it, without 
anything like remorse or displeasure with himself, and 
indeed with the same coolness vnth which he might 
acknowledge that some thousand years before his birth, 
and in a remote quarter of the world, some other 
person had not performed the obhgation imposed upon 
him. But, in actual life, this affection is usually con- 
joined with an interest for ourselves, and our own 
personaUty; which latter interest then assumes the 
nature of the first affection, and becomes modified 
thereby ; so that the view we take of ourselves, while 
it remains indeed a mere judgment, which it must be 
in virtue of the first affectioVis yet not whoUy an 
miinterested judgment;-we are constrained to despise 
ourselTes if we do not walk according to the Law, and 
we are free from this self-contempt if we act in har- 
mony with it ; and we would consequently rather find 
ourselves in the latter position than in the former. 

The interest which man feels in himself, we said, is 
swallowed up in this affection of Law. He desires 
only not to be constrained to despise himself before the 
tribunal of the Law. Not to despise himself, I say, — 
negatively ; by no means to be able to respect himself, 
— positively. Wherever positive self-respect is spoken 



LEGALITY. 139 

of, it is only, and can only be, the absence of self- 
contempt that is meant. For the judgment of which 
we here speak is founded solely on the Law, which is 
completely determined, and assumes jurisdiction over 
the whole of humanity. There is no third course : — 
either man is not in harmony with the Law, and then 
he must despise himself; or he is in harmony with it, 
and then he has nothing to allege against himself; — 
but he can by no means, in his Mfilment of the Law, 
transcend its requirements in aught, and do something 
beyond what he is bound to do, which would thus be 
done without commandment, and hence be a &ee and 
voluntary act; — and therefore he can never positively 
respect himself, nor honour himself as something ex- 
cellent. 

. The interest which man feels in himself is swallowed 
up in the affection of Law ; this affection destroys all 
inclination, all love, and all desire. Man has but one 
thing needful to him — not to despise himself; beyond 
this he wills nothing, needs nothing, and can use 
nothing. In that one want of his nature, however, he 
is dependent on himself alone; for an Absolute Law, by 
which man is wholly encompassed, must necessarily 
represent him as entirely free. By means of this con- 
ception he is now elevated above all love, desire, and 
want, and thus above all that is external to him, and 
that does not depend on himself; needing nothing but 
himself; and thus, by the extinction of everything in 
him that was dependent, himself truly independent, 
exalted above all things, and like the blessed Gods. 
It is only unsatisfied wants that produce imhappiness : 
require then nothing but that which thou thyself canst 
secure, — thou canst, however, only make sure that thou 



140 LECTURE VII. 

shalt have no feult to find with thyself, — and thou art 
for ever inaccessible to unhappiness. Thou hast no 
need of anything beyond thyself; — not even of a God, 
— for thou art thine own God, thine own Salvation, 
and thine own Redeemer. 

No one who can justly lay claim to the amount of 
historical knowledge which every educated man is 
presumed to possess, can have failed to perceive that 
I have now set forth the mode of thought peculiar 
to that celebrated system of antiquity — Stoicism. A 
venerable picture of this mode of thought is the repre- 
sentation, made by an ancient poet, of the mythical 
Prometheus; who, in the consciousness of his own just 
and good deed, laughs at the Thunderer seated above 
the clouds, and at all the torments heaped upon his 
head by the relentless God ; and who, with undaunted 
courage, sees a world crashing around him into ruins, 
and, in the language of one of our own poets, thus 
addresses Zeus : — 

*' Here I sit, — forming men 
After my image ; 
A race that, like me, 
Shall suffer, weep. 
Enjoy and rejoice, — 
And despise thee, Zeus ! 
As I do." * 

You have sufficiently understood that to us this 
mode of thought stands only upon the second grade in 
the possible views of the World, and is only the first 
and lowest form of the higher Spiritual Life. You have 
already, in our former lecture, received indications of a 

• Goethe's " Prometheus.*' 



STOICISM. 141 

far more sincere and perfect Life, which shall be fnrther 
developed in the succeeding lectures. Yet it is not our 
intention to surrender this mode of thought, which is 
indeed worthy of aU honour, to the especial contempt 
of spiritual corruption, nor even to leave a single 
lurking-place open to such corruption. With this view, 
I add the following. 

It is unquestionably true that this mode of thought 
can arrive at the admission of a God only through 
inconsequentiaKty; and that, wherever it is consistent, 
although it may at times make use of the conception 
of a God, — perhaps for the theoretical explanation of 
Nature, but assuredly never for its own practical want 
of such a conception, — yet it needs no God for its own 
heart, reverences none, and is indeed its own God. 
But what sort of God is that which it rejects ? It is 
no other, and can be no other — because on this stand- 
ing-point no other is possible— than the arbitrary dis- 
tributor of sensual well-being whom we have already 
described, whose favour must be acquired by means of 
some expedient, even if that expedient be a behaviour 
in accordance with the Law. This God, so constituted, 
is rightly rejected ; he ought to be rejected, for he is 
not God; and the higher view of the World never 
again accepts God in this shape, as we, in the proper 
place, shall clearly see. Stoicism does not reject the 
truth, but only the lie ; it does not attain to the truth, 
but remains, with relation to it, only in a negative 
position; — this is its defect. 

Thus also, the delusion of a certain system that calls 
itself Christian, — that sensual desire is sanctified by 
means of Christianity, and the satisfaction of this desire 
entrusted to a God, and that it has discovered the 



142 LECTURE VII. 

secret whereby it may serve God even by means of 
its servitude to this desire; — this delusion too, I say, 
remains an error. The happiness which the sensuous 
man seeks is irrevocably separated from the Blessed- 
ness which ReUgion — does not indeed promise, but 
— ^immediately presents, by the gulf of subjection to 
a Sacred Law before which all desire grows dumb ; — 
separated, not in degree, but in its very nature. And 
thus do those who, as philosophers, teach this same 
doctrine, and who in the most animated appeals seek 
to convince us that, by our demands, we would des- 
troy the essential character of human nature, and tear 
its very heart from its body, besides their fitting des- 
picableness, make themselves also ridiculous. So also 
those beaux-spirits, who raise a cry about the extirpa- 
tion of love by means of Stoicism — meaning by this 
love, not the flame of Divine Love, of which we shall 
afterwards speak, but only mere earthly love and de- 
sire — and who believe that, as a child who inno- 
cently extends its little hands towards an offered 
dainty is a touching and therefore a pleasing spectacle, 
so may the grown man, who behaves in like manner, 
demand the moral approval of the earnest censor; 
and that whatever is capable of affording the beholder 
a pleasing sesthetical spectacle is, on that account, in 

itself noble and good, these, I say, are lost in 

the most singular confusion of ideas. 

Thus much had I to say, with reference to Well- 
Being, regarding the second standing-point from which 
the World may be viewed by man; which, in this 
respect, is only negative, — mere Apathy: and I desired 
to set forth this strictly and clearly, in order, by means 
of this Apathy, as the middle state, to distinguish the 



STOICISM. 143 

Vulgar from the Holy, and to set up an insurmount- 
able waU of separation between them. Wherein this 
Apathy is limited, and how it thereby becomes an 
impulse towards the development of a Higher Life 
in the Divine Love; — of this we shall speak in our 
next lecture. 



(144) 



LECTURE VIII. 

EXPOSITION OF FORM AS THE UNIVERSAL CONDITION 

OF EXISTENCE; — FREEDOM AND INDEPENDENCE 

OF THE EGO ; — CATEGORICAL IMPERATIVE ; — 

PASSAGE TO THE HIGHER MORALITY. 

The entire purjpose and import of these Lectures may 
be thus briefly stated: — to give a description of the 
One, True, and therefore Blessed Life. Every good 
description, however, ought to be genetic, and gra- 
dually unfold the matter described before the eyes of 
the beholders. The true Spiritual Life is pecuharly 
susceptible of such a genetic description; for it de- 
velopes itself, as we said before, — figuratively^ as it 
then seemed, but, as it now appears, with very literal 
earnestness, — this Life developes itself gradually, and 
step by step, having its several determinate stations. 
As these stations of the Spiritual Life, we have re- 
cognised five chief standing-points in man's possible 
view of the Worid; and through these we have as- 
cended throughout the scale of Life, at first in a mere 
cold and uninterested survey; — but in the previous 
lecture we have, in place of this merely intellectual 
view, taken cognizance of its affections, its love, and 
its self-enjoyment ; and thereby we have, for the first 
time, completed the form of Life. This Life, thus 



FORM AS THB CONDITION OF EXISTENCE. 145 

defined, we have conducted, in our last lecture, through 
the conditions of Nullity, of mere Sensual Enjoyment, 
and of strict LegaHty, or harmony with an assumed 
Law. 

How such a description of the Spiritual Life is now 
to ascend to its higher forms, is, for ohvious reasons, 
more ohscure and unintelligible to the majority of a de- 
generate age, because it now enters upon regions which 
are foreign to such an age, — not known to it, either 
by its own spiritual experience, or even by hearsay. 
Thus it becomes the duty of those who undertake to 
speak of such subjects, if they must resign the hope 
of being positively understood by all men, at least 
to guard carefully against themselves giving occasion 
for any misconception; and, if they cannot bring 
home the truth to all, yet to take care that no one, 
through their fault, is led to receive anything false ; 
and at least so to equip and prepare those who possess 
the power of fully comprehending their instructions, 
that these shall be able, each in his own circle, 
to give an account of the truth, and to correct the 
misapprehensions of others. This consideration has 
determined me to devote a portion of this lecture to a 
profound and exhaustive exposition of the matter which, 
in our last lecture, we brought to its culminating 
point, and have still to treat of in this. 

Those among you who are already initiated into 
Speculative Science shall, on this occasion, be intro- 
duced into the organic central-point of all Speculation, 
in such a manner as, to my knowledge, has never and 
nowhere been attempted before. The others, who either 
cannot or will not philosophize with us, may at least 
avail themselves of the opportunity thus presented to 

o 



146 LECTURE VIII. 

them of personally listening to a strictly philosophical 
demonstration, in order to acquire a general conception 
of the matter, and to be convinced that, when rightly 
treated, it is by no means so strange and artificial 
a thing as is commonly supposed, but proceeds in a 
quite simple and natural manner, and requires in the 
student nothing more than the power of sustained 
attention. Nevertheless it will be necessary that even 
they who belong to this latter class shoidd apprehend 
what is now to be said, historically at least, because 
before the conclusion of the lecture we shall come 
to something which all will wish to understand, but 
which can not be understood unless the first part has 
been at least historically apprehended, and assumed 
as a possible hypothesis. 

We have seen and understood : — that Being {Se^) 
is — absolutely; — that it has never arisen nor become, 
nor has anything in it ever arisen or become. But 
further, this Being is also outwardly present, ea?-ists, — 
as may be discovered and perceived, but not genetically 
understood ; and after it has been thus discovered and 
perceived as existing there present, then it may also 
be understood that this Ex-istence {Daseyn) has like- 
wise not arisen nor become, but is founded in the 
inward necessity of Being (Seyn) itself, and is, through 
it, absolutely determined. By means of its thus ex- 
isting, and in this Ex-istence, Being now becomes Con- 
sciousness ; and a Consciousness separated and broken 
up into a manifold variety of forms : — and this may, 
in like manner, be seen and understood as the necessary 
result of Ex-istence. 

In order that we may not have constantly to repeat 
the same series of words, we shall now comprehend 



FORM AS THE CONDITION OF EXISTENCE. 147 

under the terra Form, everything that attaches to 
Being in consequence of Ex-istence; — which word, 
Form, shall henceforward signify all that we have 
already seen to be the necessary result of Ex-istence. 
(I may here mention, for the benefit of those who do 
not enter with us into the strictly philosophical view 
of our subject, that this is the case with all philoso- 
phical terminology ; — its expressions are only abbre- 
viations of speech, employed to recall to mind briefly 
something which has been previously apprehended in 
immediate contemplation; and to him who has not 
been a partaker in this immediate contemplation, but 
to him alone, they are empty, unmeaning formulas). , 
Thus we have these two elements : — Being, as it is 
essentially and in itself; and Form, which is assumed 
by the former in consequence of Ex-istence. But how 
have we expressed ourselves ? What is it that assumes 
a Form? Answer : — Being, as it is in itself, wdthout 
any change whatever of its inward Essential Nature. 
But what then is there in Ex-istence? Answer: — 
Nothing eke than the One, Eternal and Unchangeable 
Being, besides which there can be nothing. Again, 
may this Eternal Being exist otherwise than in this 
precise Form? How were that possible, since this 
Form is nothing else than the Ex-istence itself; and 
consequently the assertion, that Being could also exist 
in another Form, would be equivalent to saying, that 
Being could exist, and yet not exist. Let us call Being 
A, and Form, — I mean universal Form, apprehended 
in its unity, — B ; — then Actual Existence is ^ x ^ and 
By' A, — or ^ as determined by B, and the reverse. 
Determined, I say, emphatically, so that your thoughts 
may now proceed, not from one of the extremes, but 



148 



LECTURE VIII. 



from the central-point ; and you may thus understand, 
that both these elements have mutually entered to- 
gether into Reality, and are reciprocally interpenetrated 
by each other, so that in Reality, and indeed without 
the annihilation of Reahty, they can never again be 
separated. This is the point upon which everything 
depends ; this is the organic central-point of all Specu- 
lation ; and he who thoroughly penetrates to this, has 
reached the ultimate perfection of Ught. 

To make this yet stronger :— God himself, that is, 
the Essential Nature of the Absolute, which is separated 
from his outward Ex-istence only by means of our 
limited comprehension, cannot throw off this absolute 
blending of Essence with Form; for even his Ex- 
istence which, only to the first merely phenomenal 
glance, seems contingent and phenomenal, is yet, to 
true Thought, which is the only decisive criterion, not 
contingent, — but since it is, and could not be other- 
wise, it must be a necessary result of the inward Essen- 
tial Nature. By reason therefore of God's Essential 
Nature itself, is this Essential Nature inseparably bound 
up with Form, and has itself entered into Form; 
which, to those who are able to comprehend it, 
thoroughly solves the highest difficulty of Speculation, 
which has existed from the beginning of the world down 
to the present day, and confirms our previous commen- 
tary on the words of John: — " In the beginning, — 
absolutely independent of all possibility of opposition, 
of all caprice, of all contingency, and therefore of all 
Time, — founded on the inward necessity of the Divine 
Nature itself, — was Form; and this Form was vnth 
God, — contained in, and established on, the inward 
determinate character of the Divine Nature, and its 



FORM AS THE CONDITION OF EXISTENCE. 149 

very Ex-istence proceeding therefrom : — and Form was 
itself God ; God manifested himself in it even as he is 
in himself." 

For example: — One portion of this Form was the 
infinitely progressive and continuous manifestation and 
characterization of Being, which in itself eternally re- 
mains the same, =z A. I ask you, that you may hereby 
test your knowledge of the subject: — In this Infinite 
Manifestation and characterization, what is the real 
and active principle that is manifested and character- 
ized? Is it Form? This, in itself, is nothing. No: 
it is the Absolute ReaUty = A, that manifests itself 
as it essentially is ; — manifests itself, I say, according 
to the laws which govern an Infinity. Nothing does 
not manifest itself, but the essential Divine Nature 
manifests itself. 

Out of this Infinity, take, wherever you will, the 
substance of any one particular moment. This sub- 
stance, let it be understood, is wholly determined ; it 
is that which it is, and nothing else. I ask : — Where- 
fore is it that which it is, and by what has it been 
thus determined ? Tou can give no answer but this : 
— By two factors; — in the first place, because the 
Absolute, in its Essential Nature, is as it is ; and, in 
the second place, because this same Absolute flows 
forth in an Infinite Manifestation. After deduction of 
that element of the substance of the moment which 
proceeds from the Essential Nature of the Absolute, 
what remains in this moment — i. e, that in it which 
is purely and simply Manifestation — is that which 
especially belongs to this moment out of the infinite 
multipUcity of Form. 

We have ^aid that this infinite divisibility is the one 

o 2 



150 LECTURE VIII. 

portion of Form ; and we made use of this portion 
as an example, in order, thereby, to make our fun- 
damental principle more distinct. For our present 
purpose, however, we require the second portion of 
Form, to which we must also apply the fundamental 
principle we have laid down, and which is now, we 
hope, understood;— to which end I must again lay 
claim to your attention. 

This second portion of Form is a division into five 
collateral, but, as dominant points, reciprocally ex- 
clusive, standing-points in the view of Reality. Col- 
lateral, but, as dominant points, reciprocally exclusive : 
— it is of importance that this shoidd here be borne 
in mind. We have already proved this above; and 
indeed it is immediately evident at the first glance. 
Once more then: — What is it that is divided in this 
new division? Obviously, the Absolute, as it is in 
itself; the same Absolute which, in the same unity 
and completeness of Form, divides itself likewise to 
Infinity. Of this there can be no doubt. But, how 
are these points presented to us : — are they presented 
as actual, like the entire Infinity that flows through 
Time ? No, for they reciprocally exclude each other, 
as dominant, in one and the same moment of Time ; 
and hence, in relation to the fulfilment of all moments 
of Time by any one of them, they are all assumed as 
equally possible; and Being appears, in relation to 
each of them individually, not as necessarily to be so 
understood, nor as actually so understood, but only as 
possibly to be so understood. Specially : — Does then 
the One Being, which is indeed irrevocably broken 
up in an Infinite Time, itself assume this first mode, 
or this second mode, and so on f Certainly not ; but 



FREEDOM AND INDEPENDENCE OF THE EGO. 151 

this Being is, in and through itself, perfectly unde- 
termined, and wholly indifferent with regard to these 
modes of its acceptation. In this relation, ReaUty 
proceeds only the length of Possibihty, not further. 
It thus assimies, by means of its Existence, the exist- 
ence of a Freedom and Independence in the mode of 
its acceptation, or in the way in which it is reflected, 
wholly independent of itself in its inward Essential Na- 
ture. And now to express the same thing more strictly: 
— The Absolute Being, in this its Ex-istence, regards 
itself as this Absolute Freedom and Independence in the 
mode of its own acceptation, and as this independence 
of its own inward Being ; it does not create a Freedom 
external to itself, but it is itself, in this portion of 
Form, its own Freedom external to itself; and, in this 
respect, the self in its Ex-istence is separated from the 
self in its Being, and is projected, as it were, out of 
itself, in order to return again to itself as a living 
Ex-istence. Now the universal form of Reflexion is 
Ego; — hence we have here a free and independent 
Ego; — or, what is the same thing, an Ego, and that 
which alone is an Ego, a free and independent Ego, 
belongs to Absolute Form = J5, and is the peculiar 
organic central-point of the Absolute Form of Absolute 
Being ; since even that division into an Infinite Mani- 
fold which we placed by the side of this second portion 
of Form, is, according to our own deduction, founded 
upon the Independence of the Form of Reflexion; and, 
according to the above remarks, is inseparable from 
the inward necessity of the Divine Nature, so that 
it cannot be cast off even by God himself. 

It is convenient, in passing, to note the following 
principles: — (1.) Freedom does certainly and truly 



152 LECTURE VIII. 

exist, and is itself the very root of Ex-istence : but 
yet it is not immediately real, for in it Reality pro- 
ceeds only the length of Possibility. The paradox 
apparently contained in this latter principle will be 
solved of itself as we proceed in our inquiry. (2.) Free- 
dom, in Time, and as an independent, self-determining 
fulfilment of Time, exists only in relation to the five 
standing-points of Spiritual Life which we have set 
forth, and only in so far as it arises out of these: — 
it does not exist beyond that five-fold division, — for 
beyond that there is nothing but the inwardly deter- 
mined Absolute Being in the likewise unchangeably 
determined Form of Infinity, and Time immediately 
filled by Reality itself; — nor does it exist on this side 
of that division, and thus place the Ego in one of these 
points, — for, on the other hand, on this side there 
is nothing but strict necessity, and sequence from 
principle. 

This in passing, on account of its importance in 
another connexion, and also because it does not seem 
to be very well understood. Not however in passing, 
but as belonging immediately to our present subject, 
we add the following, to which I must anew demand 
your attention: — (1.) Since this Independence and 
Freedom of the Ego belongs to Being itself, and all 
Being has its Affection {Affekt) in immediate Con- 
sciousness, there must necessarily exist, in so far as 
there is such an immediate Consciousness of personal 
individual Freedom, an Affection for such Independ- 
ence, the Love of it, and the consequent Faith in it. 
In so far as there is such an immediate Consciousness 
of personal, individual Freedom, I say: for (2.) — and 
this is the chief object of our whole inquiry, and the 



FREEDOM AND INDEPENDENCE OF THE EGO. 153 

true end of all that has gone before, — and therefore 
I beg of you to note it well, — this Freedom and 
Independence is nothing more than the mere Possi- 
bility of the standing-point of Life; this Possibility, 
however, is limited to the five modes already pointed 
out, and hence, if any one has completed the compre- 
hension of Life according to this scheme, he has at 
the same time completed the round of Possibihty and 
elevated it into Reality; he has exhausted his estate 
of Freedom, — there is, in the root of his Ex-istence 
no more Freedom remaining ; but with the Being of 
Freedom there also necessarily disappears the Affec- 
tion, the Love, and the Faith in this Freedom, doubt- 
less to give place to a far holier Love, and a fer more 
bliss-giving Faith. So long as the Ego has yet to 
labour, by its own original self-activity, in moulding 
itself to the perfect Form of Reality, there indeed re- 
mains in it the impulse towards such self-activity, — 
the unsatisfied impulse, as a salutary impelling spur, 
— and the intimate self-consciousness of a Freedom, 
which, in this position of the matter, is absolutely 
true and without delusion; — but when this self-dis- 
cipline has been completed, then that Consciousness, 
which would now certainly become deceptive, dis- 
appears ; and henceforward Reahty flows forth before 
it in the sole remaining and indestructible Form of 
Lifinity. 

Thus, — and I now announce this result as what 
may be understood by all, and not by the speculative 
portion of my audience only, — thus the presence of an 
Affection, a Love, and a Faith in personal, individual 
Freedom, on the one hand, or the absence of such 
Affection, on the other, are the fundamental points 



154 LECTURE VIII. 

of two entirely opposite modes of viewing and enjoy- 
ing the World, into which I shall now combine more 
strictly our previous five-fold division. 

In the first place, with regard to the condition of 
the presence of the Affection for personal, individual 
Freedom : — this again has two different forms,— 
(you will observe that this is a subordinate division in 
the first section of the principal division) — the first 
and lower of which I thus explain to you. The Ego, 
as the subject of this Freedom, is, as you know, 
Reflexion. This, as you also know, in its first func- 
tion, forms, determines, and characterizes the World. 
Within these forms, and in the exercise of this for- 
mative function, the particular Ego here described by 
us is a proper and independent Being ; this, its de- 
terminate Being, it on that very account embraces 
with Love, and thus acquires an impulse towards this 
determinate Being, and a need of it. Again : — What 
kind of Being is this? — Being in a determinate Form 
of its Life. Whence the need of this Form ? From its 
self-love in this standing-point of its Freedom. If the 
need were satisfied, what would be the result? En- 
joyment. Whence would this Enjoyment arise ? From 
a certain modification of its Life by means of the 
World which it has itself formed, — that is, of the 
objective, divided, and manifold World. Herein lies 
the foundation of the sensual desire of man, and 
this is the true creator of the World of Sense. Thus 
there arises the desire and need of a certain and de- 
terminate Form of our Life — this is the important 
point, the characteristic feature, to which I entreat 
your attention: — the impulse towards Happiness in 
determinate, and by means of determinate objects. 



FREEDOM AND IKDEFENDENCE OF THE EGO. 155 

That the objective detenninatioii of this impulse to- 
wards Happiness is not without foundation, but rests 
upon the Reality still remaining in this Form of Inde- 
pendence, is understood ; — as also this, that since, in 
this Form of the progressive development of the World, 
there is an uninterrupted course of change, the Ego 
itself likewise unceasingly becomes changed ; and, on 
that account, that also in which it is compelled to 
place its Happiness gradually changes; and in the 
course of this change the first objects of desire become 
despised, and others take their place. From this ab- 
solute uncertainty respecting the particular object in 
which the source of Happiness is to be found, we arrive, 
at last, at a conception, in this respect completely 
empty and indefinite, — which yet retains this funda- 
mental characteristic, that Happiness does not arise 
firom any determinate object: — the conception of a Life 
in which all our wants, whatever they may be, are 
to be satisfied upon the spot, an absence of all grief, 
all weariness, and all toil, — the Islands of the Blessed 
and the Elysian Fields of the Greeks, the Abraham's 
bosom of the Jews, the Heaven of the Christians 
of the present day. The Freedom and Independence 
at this stage are material. — The second mode of the 
presence of the Affection for personal, individual Free- 
dom and Independence is that in which the feeHng 
and love of this Freedom is only general, and therefore 
bare, empty, and formal, without any definite object 
being thereby either proposed or striven after. This 
gives the standing-point of Legality described at the 
end of the last lecture, and which we also called that 
of Stoicism. Here man regards himself as free, for he 
assumes that he has the power to refuse obedience to 



156 LECTURE Tin. 

the Law ; he consequently separates himself from, and 
places himself, as a self-existent power, in opposition to 
tJie Law, or to whatever may appear to him as Law. 
He cannot otherwise comprehend and regard himself 
than as one who has it in his power to refuse obedience 
to the Law, I said. Nevertheless, according to his ne- 
cessary view of things, he must obey the Law and not 
follow his own inclination; he therefore completely 
loses all title to Happiness, and, if his avowed opinion 
be actually living within him, he loses also the need 
of Happiness, and of a God who is the author and 
giver of Happiness. But through this first supposition 
of his abiUty to refuse obedience, there arises to him, 
for the first time, a Law ; for his Freedom, bereft of 
inclination, is now empty and without aim. He must 
once more control it; — and constraint upon Freedom, 
or Law, is one and the same thing. Hence it is only 
through that Faith in Freedom, which still remains 
after he has given up all desire, that he makes a Law 
possible for himself, and gives to his view of true 
Keahty the form of a Law. 

Comprehend this profoundly, and therefore in the 
fulness of light, thus :— (1.) The Divine Nature does 
not enter, whole and undivided, into these reciprocally 
exclusive points of Freedom, but it enters them par- 
tially only: — beyond these points, however, it reveals 
itself, unconcealed by any veil whatever (every such 
veil has its foundation only in these points), — such as 
it is in itself, — in an infinitely progressive development 
and Manifestation,— in this Form of eternal, progres- 
sive Life which is inseparable from its pure, internal 
Life. This eternal forth-flowing of the Divine Life is 
the true, innermost and deepest root of Ex-istence, — 



CATEGORICAL IMPERATIVE. 157 

the absolutely indissoluble union of Essence with Form 
which we have referred to above. This Being of Ex- 
istence, like all other Being, obviously carries with it 
the Affection of itself; it is the abiding, eternal, and 
unchangeable WUl of the Absolute Reality thus con- 
tinuously to develope itself, as it necessarily must 
develope itself. (2.) So long as any Ego whatever 
occupies any one of the points of Freedom, he has 
still a personal, individual Being, which is a partial 
and imperfect Ex-istence of the Divine Ex-istence, and 
hence properly a negation of Being; and such an 
Ego has also an affection for this Being, and a fixed 
and unchangeable will to maintain this his Ex-istence. 
His actual will, ever present with him, is hence by 
no means identical with the abiding Affection and Will 
of the perfect Divine Ex-istence. (3.) Should an Ego, 
occupying this standing-point, be nevertheless capable 
of wiUing in conformity with that Eternal Will, yet 
could this never come to pass by means of his actually 
present will, but this Ego must first make the Eternal 
Will his own by means of a third intervening volition, 
usually called a determination of the Will. Exactly 
in this case stands the votary of Law; and he be- 
comes so just because he stands in this case. Since 
he professes, — and this is the peculiar root of his 
whole mode of thought, and that whereby we must 
comprehend him, — since he professes that he is also 
able to reftise obedience, — which (since we have no- 
thing to do here with mere physical power, the de- 
pendence of which upon will we must assume), is 
obviously equivalent to saying that he also has it in 
his power to will such disobedience, — to which asser- 

p 



158 LECTURE VIII. 

tion, as the immediate expression of his self-conscious- 
ness, we must doubtless accord faith, — this profession 
is equivalent to saying that it is not his predominant 
and ever-present will, to obey; — for who can act 
contrary to his own will, and who can think in 
opposition to his own ever-present and continually 
active will ? Not that he is disincUned to obedience ; 
— for then another, and indeed a sensual desire would 
necessarily bear sway in him, which is contrary to the 
supposition, since he would then not be even a moral 
being, but would require to be maintained in order 
and discipline by means of outward compulsion ; — 
but only that he is not positively inclined to it, and 
occupies a position of 'mere indifference. In conse- 
quence of this indifferencjB of his own actually present 
will, does that other Will become to him a foreign 
behest, which he at first regards as a Law to his own 
naturally inactive will ; and to the fulfilment of which 
he must first produce in himself the will that is natu- 
rally awanting, by means of a positive determination. 
And thus, the indifference towards the Eternal Will, 
which still remains after actual renunciation of the 
Sensual Will, is the source of a Categorical Impe- 
rative within us ; as the faith which we still retain in 
our own, at least formal. Independence, is the source 
of that indifference. 

Just as this faith disappears by means of the highest 
crowning act of Freedom, does the previously existing 
Ego likewise disappear in the pure Divine Ex-istence ; 
and we can no longer say, strictly speakings that the 
Affection, the Love, and the Will of this Divine Ex-ist- 
ence is ours, since there are no longer two Ex-istences 
and two Wills ; but now one Ex-istence, and one and 



PASSAGE TO THE HIGHER MORALITY. 159 

the same Will, is all in all. So long as man cherishes 
the desire of being himself something, God comes not 
to him, for no man can become God. But so soon as 
he renoimces himself sincerely, wholly, and radically, 
then God alone remains, and is all in all. Man can 
create no God for himself; but he can renounce him- 
self, as the true negation, — and then he is wholly 
absorbed in God. 

This self-renunciation is the entrance into the Higher 
Life which is wholly opposed to the lower Ufe, — the 
latter taking its distinctive character from the ex- 
istence of a self; and it is, according to our former 
mode of computation, the attainment of the Third 
standing-point in the view of the World; — that of 
the pure and Higher Morality. 

The pecuhar and essential nature of this MoraHty, 
and of the Blessedness which dwells in the central-point 
of this world, we shall describe in our next lecture. 
At present we shall only point out the relation of this 
standing-point to the lower and sensual world. I 
hope that I have already laid my foundation so deep, 
that I shall not fail of success in my subsidiary 
purpose of taking away all possible subterfuge or 
evasion from the common practice of confounding 
together Blessedness and Happiness. This mode of 
thought, which, when it is superseded by a more ear- 
nest sentiment, would much rather not have said what 
it is yet continually saying, Joves much a charitable 
twiUght, and a certain indefiniteness of conception; 
and it is therefore the more desirable to drag it forth 
into clear light, and to separate ourselves from it with 
the strictest precision. Its supporters would indeed 
willingly accommodate the matter, — we know it well, 



160 LBCTURB VIII. 

— they do not wish to cast aside the spirit altogether, 
— we are not so unjust as to accuse them of that,-^ 
hut neither will they give iip aught of the flesh. We 
however neither will nor can accommodate the matter ; 
for these two things are utterly irreconcilable, and he 
who would possess the one must renounce the other. 

The view of self, as a person existing for ita own 
sake and in a World of Sense, does indeed still remain 
for him who has attained the third standing-point; 
for this is a necessary and inevitable part of Form ; 
but the Love and Affection for it are here no longer 
felt. What is now to him this person, and all sen- 
suous activity ? Obviously, only means for the purpose 
of doing that which he himself wishes and loves above 
all else, — namely, the Will of God manifesting itself 
in him; — just as this personaUty is to the Stoic only 
the means of obeying the Law : and both are herein 
alike, and of equal value in our estimation. To the 
sensuous man, on the contrary, his personal sensual 
Ex-istence is his ultimate and especial object, and 
everything else which he does or beUeves beyond it, 
is to him but the means for the fulfilment of ita 
purposes. 

It is wholly impossible, and an absolute contradic- 
tion, that any one should love in twb different direc- 
tions, or hold two opposite purposes. The Love of 
Crod, which we have described, entirely extirpates per- 
sonal Self-love. For only by the annihilation of the 
latter do we attain the former. Again, where personal 
Self-love is, there the Love of God is not; for the 
latter suffers no other Love beside it. 

This, as we have formerly observed, is the fonda- 
mental character of sensuous Self-love, — ^that it requires 



PASSAGE TO THE HIGHER MORALITY. 161 

a Life fashioned in a particular way, and seeks its 
Happiness in some particular object; while, on the 
contrary, the Love of God regards every form of Life, 
and all objects, but as means ; and knows that every- 
thing which is given is the proper and necessary 
means ; and therefore by no means desires any object 
determined in this or that particular way, but accepts 
all as they present themselves. 

What then would the sensuous man who requires an 
objective Enjoyment do, were he indeed a man, and 
consistent? I should think he would, relying upon 
himself, exert all his strength to gather around him 
the objects of his Enjojrment; enjoy what he had, 
and do without that which was beyond his reach. 
But what happens to him, if he be a superstitious 
child? He says to himself that the objects of his 
Enjoyment are in the gift of a God who will indeed 
grant them to him, but who for this service demands 
something from him in exchange; — he alleges that 
there has been a covenant made with him on the 
subject; — he exhibits a collection of writings as the 
voucher of this pretended covenant. 

When he ftdly enters into this conception, how is 
it then with him ? • Enjoyment still remains his especial 
object, and his duty to his imagined God only the 
means for the attainment of this object. This must 
be confessed, — there is no escaping it. It will not do 
to say, as is frequently said: — "I desire that the 
Will of God be done for its own sake ; — I wish Hap- 
piness — only by the way" Setting aside for a moment 
thy " hy the way,'' thou yet admittest that thou wish- 
est Happiness because it is Happiness; and because 

p 2 



162 LECTURE VIII. 

thou believest that, having it, it will be well with thee ; 
and because thou wouldst willingly have it well with 
thee. But then thou certainly dost not desire that 
the Will of God be done for its own sake alone ; for 
then thou couldst not desire Happiness, since the first 
desire supersedes and destroys the second; and it is 
absolutely impossible that that which is destroyed can 
exist beside, and be associated with, its destroyer. 
Dost thou also wish, as thou sayest, that the Will of 
God be done? — then thou canst wish this only because 
thou behevest that thou canst not otherwise obtain 
that which thou especially desirest, — namely Happi- 
ness; — and because this wish is imposed upon thee by 
the desire by which thou art more especiaUy animated; 
— thou wishest therefore the Will of God only "'6y 
ths way,'' and because thou art constrained to do so ; 
but from the bottom of thy heart, and with thy own 
good will, thou wishest only for Happiness. 

It is nothing to the purpose that this Happiness is 
removed far from immediate sight, and placed in an- 
other world beyond the grave, where it is thought 
that it may be possible to confound the two ideas with 
less trouble. Whatever you may say with regard to 
this your Heaven, — or rather whatever you may not 
say, in order that your true meaning may not come to 
light, — yet the single circumstance that you make it 
dependent upon Time, and place it in another world, 
proves already incontrovertibly that it is a Heaven of 
Sensual Enjoyment. Here Heaven is not, you say ;— 
but yonder it shall be. I pray you, — What then is 
that which can be different yonder from what it is 
here? Obviously, only the objective constitution of 
the world, as the environment of our existence. It 



PASSAGE TO THE HIQHEB MORALITY. 163 

must therefore, according to your opinion, be the o\h 
jective constitution of the present world which makes 
it unfit for a Heaven, and the objective constitution of 
the future world which makes it fit for that purpose ; 
— and thus you cannot any longer conceal that your 
Blessedness depends upon outward circumstances, and 
therefore is a Sensual Enjoyment. Did you seek youx 
Blessedness there where alone it is to be found, solely 
in God, and in the truth of his Manifestation, but 
by no means in the mere casual Form in which he is 
manifested, — then would you not need to refer your- 
selves to another Life, for God is even now to-day, 
as he shall be in all Eternity. I assure you, — and 
remember my words when it shall come to pass,— ■ 
just as, in the second Life to which you shall then have 
attained, you will again make your Happiness depen- 
dent on outward circumstances, you shall &re just as 
ill there as you do here ; and you will then console 
yourselves with a third Life, and in the third with a 
fourth, and so on, for ever ; — for God neither can nor 
will confer Blessedness by means of outward circum- 
stances, since he desires, on the contrary, to give us 
Himself, independent of all Form. 

Li a word: — this mode of thought, thrown into 
the form of a prayer, would thus express itself: — 
" Lord I let but my wiU be done, and that throughout 
an Eternity which on that account shall be blessed ; 
and in return thou shalt have Thy WiU in this short 
and wearisome present Time." — And this is mani- 
fest immoraUty, senseless superstition, irreligion, and 
actual blasphemy of the holy and bUss-giving Will 
of God. 

On the contrary, the expression of the constant 



164 LECTURE VIII. 

mind of the truly Moral and Religious Man is this 
prayer: — " Lord! let but Thy Will be done, then is 
mine also done ; for I have no other will than this,— 
that Thy Will be done." This Divine Will is neces- 
sarily done now and for ever; — in the first place, in 
the Inward Life, of this man thus devoted to it, — of 
which in our next lecture ; — and then — what imme- 
diately belongs to our present subject — in everything 
that meets him in his Outward Life. All these events 
are nothing else than the necessary and unalterable 
Outward Manifestation of the Divine Work fulfilling 
itself in him, and he cannot wish that anything in 
these events should be otherwise than what it is, with- 
out wishing that the Inward Life, which can only 
thus manifest itself, should be otherwise ; and without 
thereby separating his wiU from the Will of God, and 
setting it in opposition thereto. He cannot any longer 
reserve to himself a choice in these things, for he must 
accept everything just as it happens ; for everything 
that comes to pass is the Will of God with him, and 
therefore the best that can possibly come to pass.* To 
those who love God, all things must work together 
for good, absolutely and immediately. 

To those also, in whom the Will of God is not 
inwardly accomplished, — because there is indeed no 
Inward Life in them, but who are altogether mere 
outward things, — to them also the Will of God is 
done outwardly, as alone it can reach them; — appear- 
ing at first sight ungracious and chastening, but in 
reality in the highest degree merciful and loving; — 

* [For an account of a remarkable incident connected with this 
passive, see " Memoir of Fichte," pp. 162, 163.] — TranslcUor. 



PASSAGE TO THE HIGHER MORALITY, 165 

while with them it grows worse and worse, and they 
weary themselves out, and even render themselves 
despicable and ridiculous, in the vain chase after a 
good which ever floats before their vision and ever 
eludes their grasp, — until they are thereby at last 
driven to seek for Happiness there where alone it is 
to be found. To those who do not love God, all 
things must work together immediately for pain and 
torment, until, by means of this torment, they are at 
last led to Salvation. 



(166) 



LECTURE IX. 

EXPOSITION OF THE HIGHER MORALITY — PASSAGE TO 
THE STANDING-POINT OF TRUE RELIGION- 
CHARACTERIZATION OF THE MORAL- 
RELIGIOUS WILL. 

The following were the results of our last lecture, 
and indicate the point at which we now stand: — So 
long as man still desires to be something on his own 
account, the True Being and Life cannot develope 
itself within him, and hence he Ukewise remains in- 
accessible to Blessedness; for all personal, individual 
Being is but Non-Being, and obstruction of the True 
Being ; and, on that very account, is either obvious 
Unblessedness, — as in the case of the first standing- 
point, that of mere Sensuousness, which looks to out- 
ward objects only for its enjoyment, whilst no outward 
object can possibly satisfy man ; — or else, if not actual 
Unblessedness, yet just as Uttle Blessedness, but mere 
Apathy, passive indifference, and absolute incapacity 
for all enjoyment of Life, — as in the case of the 
second standing-point, that of mere formal Legality. 
On the contrary, as soon as man, by an act of the 
Highest Freedom, surrenders and lays aside his per- 
sonal, individual Freedom and Independence, he be- 
comes a partaker of the Only True Being, the Divine, 
and of all the Blessedness that is contained therein. 



EXPOSITION OF THE HIGHER MORALITY. 167 

We showed, in the first place, — in order to separate 
ourselves distinctly from the opposite sensuous mode 
of thought, and to lay this aside once and for ever, — 
how such an one, who has attained the True Life, looks 
upon the outward and sensuous Life; and we found 
that he regards his whole personal Ex-istence, and all 
outward occurrences that affect it, but as means for 
the fulfilment of the Divine Work in him ; and indeed 
all of them as they occur as necessarily the best and 
most legitimate means ; and hence he desires to pos- 
sess no voice or choice whatever with regard to the 
objective disposition of these occurrences, but accepts 
them all as they present themselves. On the other 
hand, we reserved for our present lecture, the descrip- 
tion of the inward and peculiar Life of such a man : — 
which description we now begin. 

I have already shown, on a former occasion, that 
the Third standing-point of the Spiritual Life, — which 
undoubtedly is that at which we have now arrived, 
that, namely, of the Higher Morality, — is distin- 
guished from the second, that of mere formal Legahty, 
by the creation of a wholly new and truly Super- 
sensual World, and by the development of this world 
within the world of sense as its sphere; while, on 
the contrary, the Law of Stoicism is only the Law of 
an order in the sensual world. It is this assertion 
that I have, in the next place, to establish on a deeper 
foundation, and thus more clearly explain and more 
strictly define it. 

On this standing-point, the whole sensible world, 
which is assumed only in consequence of our love and 
affection for a determinate Ex-istence in outward ob- 
jects, becomes only a means ; but unquestionably not 



168 LECTURE IX. 

a means for nothing, — upon which supposition it 
would not be a means, since besides itself there would 
then be nothing, and it would consequently remain 
for ever an end, as the sole and absolute Ex-istence,— 
but it becomes imdoubtedly a means for an Actual, 
True, and Real Being. What is this Being? We 
know it from what has been said above. It is the 
inward Essential Being of God himself, as it is ab- 
solutely, in itself and through itself, immediately, 
purely, and without intervening medium, without be- 
ing modified, veiled, or obscured by any Form which 
is contained in the personaUty of the Ego, and which 
is, on that accoimt, obstructive and limiting; — but 
broken only by the indestructible Form of Infinity. 
Since this Being is determined only, on the one hand, 
by the Essential Divine Nature which is founded ab- 
solutely in itself alone, and, on the other, by the 
Form of Infinity, which, in Actual Ex-istence, can 
never be dissolved or brought to a conclusion, — as we 
have very distinctly set forth in our last lecture, — it 
is clear that we cannot by any means comprehend 
mediately y through any other conception, and thus a 
priori, how this Being will disclose itself; but that 
it can only be immediately perceived and experienced, 
and only apprehended in the act of its living forth^ 
flowing from Being into Ex-istence ; so that the spe- 
cific knowledge of this new and Super-sensual World 
cannot be communicated, by means of description and 
characterization, to those who do not themselves live 
therein. He who is inspired of God reveals to us how 
it is; — and it is as he reveals it, just for this reason 
—because He so reveals it ; but without inward re- 
velation no man can speak of it. 



EXPOSITION OF THE HIGHER MORALITY. 169 

In general, however, and by means of an outward 
and merely negative mark, this Divine World may 
be characterized; and that in the following way: — 
All Being carries with it the Love and Affection of 
itself, and so also the immediate Divine Being which 
is manifested in the Form of Infinity. Now this Be- 
ing is, such as it is, not through anything else, or for 
the sake of anything else, but through itself, and 
for its own sake alone ; and when it appears and is 
beloved, then it must necessarily be beloved and en- 
joyed through itself alone, purely and solely on its 
own account; — but by no means on account of any- 
thing else, and thus only as a means for this other 
thing, which would then become the ultimate end of 
its being. And thus we have found the desiderated 
outward criterion of the Divine World, whereby it is 
completely separated from the World of Sense. What- 
ever is a source of enjoyment in itself, and indeed of 
the highest degree of enjoyment, infinitely transcend- 
ing all other degrees, is a Manifestation of the im- 
mediate and essential Divine Nature in Reality. We 
may even describe it as the most perfect phenomenon 
of each particular moment, and under the given con- 
ditions of Time; ^—provided we do not understand 
thereby such a perfection as is given by means of a 
logical conception, which contains nothing more than 
the order and completeness of the Manifold, — but, on 
the contrary, a perfection given through an immediate 
affection towards a determinate Being. 

Thus much as to the possible characterization of the 
New World created by the Higher MoraUty within the 
World of Sense. Should you desire of me yet greater 
clearness on this point, you will doubtless not expect 



170 LECTURE IX. 

that I should attempt a clearer characterization, for I 
think that in this way nothing can be added to what 
we have already said, — but you will require from me 
examples. WiUingly indeed shall I satisfy this desire, 
finding myself in these regions so concealed from the 
vulgar eye; reminding you, nevertheless, that I can 
here adduce only individual examples, which cannot of 
themselves exhaust that which can only be exhausted 
in characterization, and which we have already so ex- 
hausted; — examples which themselves can only be 
Tully comprehended by means of characterization. 

I say: — The inward and absolute Nature of God 
manifests itself in Beauty ; it manifests itself in the 
perfect Dominion of Man over Nature ; it manifests 
itself in the perfect State and Polity of Nations ; it 
manifests itself in Science; — in short, it manifests 
itself in those conceptions which, in the strict and 
pecuUar sense, I term Ideas, and to which I have 
directed attention in many ways, both in the lectures 
which I deUvered here last winter,* and in others 
which have some time ago appeared in print.f In 
order to explain my fundamental conception by means 
of the lowest form of the Idea, concerning which we 
may venture to hope that we shall be able at once to 
attain the requisite clearness — namely Beauty : — There 
is much talk of the splendours of the surrounding 
world, of the beauties of nature, &c. ; as if, — were it 
intended that we should accept these words in their 
Uteral acceptation, — as if the Beautiful could ever 
appertain to the Earthly and Perishable, or could be 

* " Characteristics of the Present Age." 

t '' On the Nature of the Scholar and its Manifestations." 



EXPOSITION OF THE HIGHER MORALITY. 171 

transferred to these. But the source of Beauty is in 
God alone, and it reveals itself only in the minds of 
those who are inspired by Him. Imagine, for example, 
a Holy Virgin, who, being ascended into Heaven, en- 
circled by the heavenly hosts who fall down before her 
presence in rapt contemplation, surroimded by all the 
splendours of a Heaven of which she is herself the 
highest ornament and glory, can yet, alone of those 
present, see nothing of all that takes place around her, 
being wholly overwhelmed and lost in this one feel- 
ing: — " Behold the handmaiden of the Lord: be it 
unto me according to his will;" — clothe this feeling, 
thus surrounded, in a human body, and then imques- 
tioAably you have Beauty in a determinate Form. Now 
what is it that makes this Form beautiful ? Is it the 
separate parts and members of which it is composed ? 
Is it not much rather the single feeUng which speaks 
in all these members ? The Form is superadded, only 
because in it, and by means of it, the Thought becomes 
visible; and it is transferred by means of lines and 
colours to the canvass, because thus only can it be com- 
municated to others. Perhaps this Thought might also 
have been expressed in hard and senseless stone, or 
in any other material. Would then the stone thereby 
become beautiful? The stone ever remains stone, and 
is wholly unsusceptible of such a predicate ; but the 
soul of the Artist was beautiful when he conceived 
his work, and the soul of every inteUigent beholder 
in whom the conception is repeated will likewise be- 
come beautiftd; — the stone ever remains only that 
which fixes the limits of the outward perception during 
this inward spiritual development. 

This ideal Being and the creative Affection of it. 



172 LECTURE IX. 

as a mere natural phenomenon, generally appears as 
Genius for Art, for Government, for Science, &c. It 
is of course understood, and, to every one who has any 
experience whatever in matters of this kind, it is, by 
means of this very experience, sufficiently known, that 
— since the natural affection for such creations of 
Genius is the fundamental affection of the Life of 
Genius in which all its other life is swallowed up, — 
that, I say, true Genius does not require to stimulate 
and urge itself on to industry in its Art or in its 
Science by any Categorical Imperative, but that all its 
powers, of their own accord, direct themselves towards 
this its all-engrossing object ; — further, that, so smrely 
as any one possesses True Genius, his work always 
prospers well, and the products of his labour are sd* 
ways pleasing to him, and thus he is ever surrounded, 
inwardly and outwardly, by the Beautiful and Agree- 
able; — that, finally, he does not employ this Activity 
for the attainment of any object whatever beyond 
itself, nor will receive aught for it ; but, on the con^ 
trary, no earthly consideration would induce bim to 
leave undone what he alone may do, or to do it other^ 
wise than as seems right and pleasing to himself;—* 
that he consequently finds his true and satisfying 
Enjoyment of Life only in such work, purely and 
solely as work, and for the work's sake ; and whatever 
of the external world he may appropriate besides, does 
not of itself engross his attention, but he appropriates 
it only in order that, renewed and strengthened by it, 
he may return to his own true element. And thus 
mere natural Genius soars far above both the low 
desires of the Sensualist, and the callous indifferentism 
of the Stoic, and carries its possessor through an un- 



EXPOSITION OF THE HIGHER MORALITY. 173 

interrupted succession of blissful momenta, for which 
he needs nothing beyond himself, and which, without 
painful effort or labour on his part, arise spontaneous- 
ly out of his Life, The Enjoyment of a single hour, 
passed happily in the pursuit of Art or of Science, 
j&r outweighs a whole lifetime of Sensual Enjoyment ; 
and before the picture of this Blessedness, the mere 
Sensuous Man, could it but be brought home to him, 
would sink in envy and dismay. 

In the illustration we have thus adduced, we have 
assumed that natural Genius is the pecuHar source and 
root of the Spiritual Enjoyment of Life, as well as of 
the scorn of mere Sensual Enjoyment; and I have 
desired, by means of this single example of the Higher 
Morality and its Blessedness, to lead you to a more 
universal conception of it. But this Genius, — notwith- 
standing that its object is in itself truly super-sensual, 
and the pure expression of the Godhead, as we showed 
in particular by the example of the Beautiful, — does 
yet desire, and must desire, that its Spiritual Object 
should receive a certain form and clothing in the 
World of Sense, and thus Genius does also desire, in 
a certain sense, such a determinate Form of its World 
and its environment, as in our previous lecture we un- 
conditionally censured and condemned in the case of 
Sensuousness ; — and if the self-enjoyment of Genius 
were dependent on the accidental realization or non- 
realization of this outward result which is the aim of 
its efforts, then would the peace and tranquiUity of 
Genius itself be at an end ; and the Higher MoraUty 
would be exposed to all the miseries of the lower Sen- 
suousness. What in particular concerns Genius: — 
So surely as it is Genius^ it assuredly always succeeds 

2Q 



174 LECTURE IX. 

in the expression and representation of its Idea in th^ 
appropriate medium ; its desired Form and environment 
can therefore never be awanting ; while nevertheless 
the peculiar seat of its immediate enjoyment ia only 
the Activity with which it produces this Form, the 
Form itself giving it but mediate joy because in it only 
does this Activity become apparent;— from which it 
is obvious that True Genius never lingers long by 
anything it has already attained, nor dwells in volup- 
tuous enjoyment of it, and of itself in it, but proceeds 
onward without delay to new developments. In gene- 
ral, however, apart from particular Genius, and viith 
reference to all possible Life in which the Divine Being 
manifests itself purely, I lay down the following prin- 
ciple : — So long as joy in the deed is mixed up vnth 
desires regarding the outward product of the deed, 
even the possessor of the Higher Morahty is not yet 
perfect in purity and clearness ; and thus, in the Divine 
Economy, the outward failure of his deed is the means 
of forcing him in upon himself, and of raising him to 
the yet higher standing-point of True BeUgion, — that 
is, to the comprehension of what it really is that he 
loves and strives after. Understand this as a whole, 
and in its connexion, thus : — 

(1.) The Free Ego, deduced and described with 
sufficient distinctness in our previous lecture, and 
which, as Reflexion, ever remains one and the same, 
does yet, as Object — that is, as the reflecting substance 
that exists only in Appearance — become divided, at 
the first glance into an Infinity, but also, for a reason 
that lies too deep to be treated of in these lectures, into 
a progressive system of Individual Personalities. (This 
separation is a portion of that division of the objective 



PASSAGE TO THE TRUE RELIGION. 175 

world into the Form of Infinity which we have aheady 
sufficiently described upon several occasions ; and thus 
belongs to the absolutely fundan^ental Form of Ex- 
istence, which cannot be cast off even by the Godhead 
itself: — As Being originally separated itself in thig 
division, so it remains separated in all Eternity ; and 
hence no Individual given in this division — that is, no 
Individual who has come into Actual Ex-istence, — cau 
ever perish; — this is to be noticed only in passing, 
and in opposition to those among our contemporaries, 
who by means of a half philosophy and whole be- 
wilderment esteem themselves in the highest degree 
enlightened when they deny the continued Ex-istence 
in higher spheres of the Individuals actually existing 
here.) In them,. — these Individual PersonaUties thus 
arising from the fundamental Form of Ex-istence, — 
is the entire Divine Being separated into an infinite 
progressive development in Time ; and is, as it were, 
divided among them, according to the Absolute Law 
of such a division which is founded in the Essential 
Divine Nature itself; whilst, further, every one of 
these Individuals, as a^ section of the One Ego deter- 
mined by its own essential Form, necessarily carries 
with it this latter Form entire, — that is, according to 
what we have previously said, it is free and inde- 
pendent in relation to the five standing-points. Each 
Individual has therefore, in his own free choice, which 
cannot be taken away from him even by the Divinity 
himself, the possibihty of viewing and of enjoyixig, 
from any of these five standing-points, that peculiar 
portion in the Absolute Being which belongs to him 
as an Actual Individual, Thus has each Individual, 
in the first place, his determinate portion in the Sen- 



176 LECTURE IX. 

Bual Life, and its Love; which Life will appear to 
him as the ultimate and absolute end and purpose of 
his Being so long as the Freedom, which can only 
be discovered by its actual use, is wholly engrossed 
therein. But if he should rise, perhaps through the 
sphere of Legality, to that of the Higher Morality, 
then will that Sensual Life become to him but a means ; 
and his portion in the Higher, Super-sensual, and im« 
mediately Divine Life, will be revealed to his Love. 
Every one without exception necessarily recmes, by 
his mere entrance into Actual Ex-istence, his portion 
in this Super-sensual Being ; for otherwise, he would 
be no result of that division of the Absolute Being, 
according to its own Essential Law, without which 
there is no Actual Ex-istence, and he would not other- 
wise even have become actual ; but this Super-sensual 
Being may nevertheless remain concealed from all 
without exception, should they be unable to renounce 
their Sensual Being and its objective independence. 
Every one without exception, I say, receives that por- 
tion in the Super-sensual Being which is exclusively 
his own, and which belongs, in the same manner, to 
no other Individual whatever but himself; which por- 
tion now developes itself in him, in all Eternity, — 
manifesting itself as a continuous course of action, — in 
such a form as it can absolutely assiune in no other 
Individual; — and this, in short, may be called the 
individual character of his Higher Vocation. Not that 
the Essential Divine Nature is divided in itself; — in 
all men, without exception, the one and unchangeable 
Divine Nature, as it is in itself, is assiuned; — and if 
they can but attain True Freedom, may also appear 
in actual manifestation; — but this Nature manifests 



PASSAGE TO THE TRUE RELIGION. 177 

itself in each Individual in a different Form, peculiar 
to himsel£ Let Being, as we have already supposed, 
be = Ay and Form = B ; then A, .which has absolutely 
entered into By divides itself by this very act of 
entrance, not according to its Essential Nature, but 
according to its Absolute Form in Reflexion, into 
(6 + 6 + 6 . . ^ .) = a System of Individuals: and each 
individual 6 contains in itself — (1.) the whole and 
indivisible Ay (2.) the whole and indivisible By (3.) its 
own particular 6; — and the same with all the other 
results of A throughout (6 + 6 + 6 . . . .) 

(2.) No one can discover, by means of mere thought 
alone, this his peculiar portion in the Super-sensual 
Being ; nor can he deduce it by way of inference from 
any other truth : nor can he be made acquainted with 
it through any other individual, since'this portion 
cannot be known to any other individual; — but he can 
attain a knowledge of it only by immediate personal 
perception ; and his Being must spontaneously assume 
tins Form so soon as he has surrendered and wholly 
annihilated all personal will and personal piurposea 
within him. Hence it is clear, in the first place, 
that with respect to this, which each man can only 
clearly comprehend for himself in his own immediate 
consciousness, it is impossible to speak in general 
terms, and that I must here necessarily stop short. 
And what end, indeed> could here be served by speech, 
even were speech possible ? He to whom his especial 
Higher Vocation has revealed itself, knows it as it is 
revealed to him; and he may conclude by analogy 
how it is in general with others to whom their Higher 
Vocation has also become clear and inteUigible. But a9 
for him to whom it has not revealed itself, to him no 



178 LECTURE IX. 

information on this subject can be communicated; — 
it serves no purpose to speak of colours to the blind* 

Has this peculiar Vocation revealed itself to him : — 
then does it penetrate him with unspeakable Love, and 
with the purest Enjo)anent; — penetrates him wholly, 
and takes possession of all his Life. And thus it is the 
very first act of the Higher MoraUty, which must 
infeUibly ensue so soon as the mere personal will has 
been resigned, that man becomes wholly penetrated 
with his own especial Vocation, and desires to be no- 
thing whatever but that which he, and only he, can 
be ; which he, and only he, in virtue of his Higher 
Nature, that is, of the Divine Nature in him, ought to 
be; — in short, that he desires nothing whatever but 
that which, at bottom, he actually wiUs. How could 
such a man ever do anjrthing with unwillingness, since 
he never does anything else but that in which he has 
the highest dehght. What I said above of natural 
Genius, is even stiU more appUcable to the Virtue 
which is born of perfect Freedom ; for this Virtue is 
the highest expression of Genius ; it is the immediate 
power of Genius, — i, e, that Form which the Essential 
Divine Nature has assmned in our LidividuaUty. On 
the contrary, the desire and effort to be something else 
than that to which we are called, how great and noble 
soever this other thing may seem, is the highest Im- 
moraUty; and all the constraints that man imposes 
upon himself for that purpose, and aU the unhappiness 
that he consequently suffers, are themselves rebellions 
against the Divine Rule and resistances of our will to 
the Divine. What is it then that has thus set up 
within us a purpose not imposed upon us by our Na- 
ture, but individual wiU, individual choice, individual 



PASSAGE TO THE TRUE RELIGION. 179 

self-complacent wisdom? — and thus we are very far 
indeed from the renunciation of our own personal, 
individual will. This effort is necessarily the source 
of the greatest unhappiness. In this position, we must 
constantly enforce, constrain, urge, and deny ourselves; 
for we can never do that willingly, which, at bottom, 
we cannot will ; and we can never attain a successful 
issue, for we cannot accompUsh that which our Nature 
itself forbids. This is the affectation of outward sanc- 
tity against which we are warned by Christianity. It 
may remove mountains, and even give its body to be 
burned, and yet it will profit it nothing if such be not 
the dictate of true Love, — that is, if it be not its own 
peculiar Spiritual Being that necessarily brings with it 
its own Affection. Will to be — we mean in super- 
sensual things, for in mere sense there is no Blessed- 
ness — will to be what thou oughtst to be, w^hat thou 
canst be, and what therefore thou wilt be: — this is 
the fundamental Law, as well of the Higher Morality 
as of the Blessed Life. 

(3.) This Higher Vocation of Man, which, as we said, 
penetrates him with complete and undivided Love, ex- 
hibits itself indeed, in the first place, in his own con- 
duct ; but, in the second place, and by means of that 
conduct, it Ukewise manifests itself in a determinate 
result in the World of Sense. So long as man does not 
yet know the true root and essential central-point of his 
Ex-istence, the two elements we have named, — his own 
Inward Being and its Outward Result, — remain undis- 
tinguished. Something proves unsuccessful with him; 
and the outward result at which he aims does not 
ensue, — which indeed is not his fault, for he wills only 
that which he can, but that of outward circumstances 



180 LECTURE IX. 

which are not susceptible of his influence, — and then 
his LoYe, which has still a mixed object, is dissatisfied 
with this failure, and thereby his Blessedness is dis- 
turbed and destroyed. This forces him more deeply 
in upon himself, in order that he may make it perfectly 
clear to himself what it really is that he strives after ; 
and what, on the contrary, it is that in deed and truth 
he does not striye after, but which is indifferent to 
him. In this self-examination he will find that which 
we have plainly annoimced above, although he may 
not express it in the same words — namely, that it is 
the development of the Divine Being and Life in him, 
this particular Individual, which he strives after espe- 
cially and in the first place; — and hereby his whole 
Being and Love will become perfectly clear to him, 
and he will be raised from the Third standing-point of 
the Higher MoraHty, in which we have hitherto held 
him fast, to the Fourth — that of Religion. This 
Divine Life now continually developes itself within him, 
without hindrance or obstruction, as it can and must 
develope itself only in him and his individuality ; this 
alone it is that he properly wills ; his will is therefore 
always accomphshed, and it is absolutely impossible 
that anything contrary to it should ever come to pass. 
This his proper Inward Life does indeed still dedie 
constantly to flow forth in surrounding circumstances, 
and to fashion these after itself, and only in this effort 
aft^ outward expression does it show itself to be true 
Inward Life, and not mere dead devotion. But the 
result of this effort after outward expression does not 
depend on his own isolated Individual Life alone, but 
upon the general Freedom of other Individuals besides 
himself: this Freedom God himself cannot wish to 



THE MORAL-RELIGIOUS WILL. 181 

destroy, therefore neither can the man who is devoted 
to God, and who has attained a clear knowledge of 
God, — neither can he wish that it should be destroyed. 
While, therefore, he certainly desires this outward re- 
sult, and labours unceasingly and with aU his power 
to effect it, — because he cannot abstain from doing 
so, and because this is his own proper Inward Life, — he 
yet does not will it absolutely and unconditionally, and 
it therefore would not, even for a single moment, 
disturb his Peace and Blessedness should it nevertheless 
remain unaccomphshed ; his Love and his Blessedness 
return into his own proper Life, where they always, 
and without exception, find their true satisfaction. 
Thus much in general. For the rest, the matters we 
have touched upon above demand a farther exposition, 
which we reserve for our next lecture, in order that 
we may in the present arrive at a result which wiU 
spread a general Ught over the whole : — namely, 

(4.) Everything which this Moral-Religious Man wills 
and incessantly urges forward, has, in and for itself, 
no value whatever to him ; — as indeed it has none in 
itself, and is not in itself the most perfect, but only 
that which is most perfect in this moment of Time, to 
be superseded in a Future Time by something still 
more perfect; — but it has value for him only because 
it is the immediate Manifestation of God, — the Form 
which God assumes in him, this definite Lidividual. 
Now God also dwells originally, Ukewise in a pecu- 
har Form, in all other surrounding Individuals, not- 
withstanding that he remains concealed from most 
of them in consequence of their personal, individual 
Will, and their want of the highest Freedom, and thus 
is not actually manifested either in themselves, or in 

R 



182 LECTURE IX. 

their conduct towards others. In this poedtion, the 
Moral-Beligious Man — although with reference to him- 
self he has entered upon his portion of True Being — 
is, with reference to other Individuals, separated and 
cut off from the constituent parts of Being which are 
related to him ; and there abides in him a sorrowftil 
striving and longing to unite and associate himself 
with these kindred elements: — not indeed that this 
longing disturbs his Blessedness, for this is the per- 
manent lot of his Finite Being, and a part of his al- 
legiance to God, to embrace which with Love is itself 
a portion of his Blessedness. 

For what then would this concealed Inward Beii^, 
were it manifested in the conduct of other Individuals, 
—for what would it possess a value in the estimation 
of our supposed Religious Man ? Obviously not for 
itself,— since even his own nature has no value what- 
ever to him in itself, — but because it is the Manifesta- 
tion of God in these Individuals. Further, for what 
will he desire that this Manifestation should possess a 
value in the estimation of these Individuals themselres? 
Obviously, only that it may be recognised by them as 
the Manifestation of God in themselves. Finally, for 
what will he desire that his own conduct and effort 
should possess a value in the estimation of these In- 
dividuals? Obviously, only that they may recognise 
in it the Manifestation of God in him. 

And thus have we now a general outward charac- 
terization of the Moral-Religious Will, in so far as it 
comes forth from its Inward Life, which always re- 
mains hidden in itself, into Outward Manifestation. 
In the first place, the object of this Will is ever only 
the Spiritual World of reasonable Individuals ; for the 



THE MORAL-RELIOIOUS WILL. 183 

Sensual World of objects has long ago with him beai 
sunk to the level of a mere sphere of spiritual activity. 
In this Spiritual World, his positive will is this,— that 
in the conduct of each Individual there may be ma- 
nifested purely that Form which the Essential Divine 
Nature has assumed in him, this particular Individual ; 
— that, on the other hand, each Individual may re- 
cognise God, as he is outwardly manifested to him in 
the conduct of all other men; — that all others may, 
in hke manner, recognise God, as he k outwardly 
manifested to them in the conduct of this particular 
Individual; — and that thus God alone may ever be 
manifested in all Outward Appearance, that He alone 
may Eve and rule, and nothing besides him ; and that, 
everywhere and at all times. He alone may appear 
before the eye of mortals. 

Thus^ as it is expressed by Christianity in the form 
of a prayer :— " Thy kingd(Mn come : — even that con- 
dition of the world in which thou alone art, and livest, 
and rulest, so that — Thy Will may be done on Earth, 
— in the Actual, by means of that Freedom which 
thou thyself wilt not take away, — as it ever is done, 
and indeed never can be otherwise done, in Heaven, — 
in the Idea, in the world as it is in itself and without 
relation to Freedom." 

For example: — Yonder they complain that misery 
is so abundant in the world, and go about with a zeal, 
praiseworthy in itself, to make it somewhat less. Alas 1 
the misery that lies most open to view is not the true 
misery; — since things are as they are, misery is the 
best of all that is in the world ; and since the world 
does not improve notwithstanding all this misery, one 
might almost believe that there is not yet enough 



184 LECTURE IX. 

of misery in it : — that the image of God, Humanity^ 
should be sullied, degraded, and trodden in the dust, 
-this is the true misery in tihe world, which fills the 
Religious Man with holy indignation. Thou dost al- 
leviate, perhaps, the sorrows of humanity, so fer as thy 
hand reaeheth, by the sacrifice of thine own dearest 
enjoyments. But perhaps this only happens on account 
of Nature having given thee a system of nerves so 
sensitive, and so harmoniously attuned with the rest of 
humanity, that every sorrow which thou beholdest re- 
peats itself more keenly in thine own organization; — 
and then it is to this delicate organization that our 
thanks are due ; — in the Spiritual World thy deed passes 
unnoticed. But hadst thou done the like deed in 
holy indignation that the Son of Eternity, in whom also 
there dwells something god-like, should be tormented 
by such trifles as these, and should be left there so 
forsaken by his fellows; — with the desire that he nfiight 
have at least one glad hour in which he might raise 
his eyes joyfully and thankfully to Heaven ; — with the 
purpose that in thy hand he might see the saving 
hand of God, and might know of a surety that the arm 
of God is not yet shortened, but that he has yet every- 
where instruments and servants to do his will, and 
that thus Faith and Hope and Love might arise in his 
soul; — if thus what thou desiredst to help had been 
his Inward Nature, and not his outward, which is ever 
without true value ; — then had thy deed been the out- 
ward expression of a Moral-Religious Spirit. 



(185) 



LECTUKE X. 

SURYEY OF THE WHOLE SUBJECT FROM THE STANDING- 
POINT OF TRUE RELIGION; — DELINEATION 
OF THE BLESSED LIFE. 

Now that it is our purpose to bring these lectures to 
a dose, let us once more combine into one view the 
doctrine which we have built up before you. 

Life in itself is one; it remains unchangeably the 
same; and, since it is the perfect fulfilment of the 
Love of Life that dwells in it, it is perfect Blessed- 
ness. This True Life exists, at bottom, wherever any 
form or degree of Life is to be found ; but it may be 
concealed by an admixture of the elements of Death 
and Nothingness ; and then, by means of pain and 
torment and mortification of this imperfect Life, it 
forces itself onward towards its development. We 
have foUowed, with our own eyes, this development 
of the True Life out of the imperfect Apparent Life 
by which it may at first be concealed, and it is our 
purpose to-day to accompany this Life into the central- 
point of its dominion and to invest it with all its 
glory. Li our last lecture we characterized the highest 
Form of Actual Life, — that is — since Reality consists 
wholly in a Form of Reflexion, whilst the absolutely 
indestructible Form of Reflexion is Lifinity — that Life 
which flows forth in an Lifinite Time, and employs 

R2 



186 LECTURE X. 

the personal Ex-istence of Man as its instrument, and 
hence manifesto itself as Action, — we have, I say, 
characterized this Life by the name of the Higher 
MoraUty. We were constrained to admit that, on 
account of the separation of the one Essential Divine 
Nature into many Individuals — a separation unalter- 
ably imposed by the law of Reflexion — the activity of 
each particular Individual cannot avoid striving afler 
an outward result, not wholly dependent on the In- 
dividual himself, in the surrounding world of Free- 
dom; — that nevertheless the Blessedness of such an 
Individual will not^ be disturbed by the failure of this 
result, provided only that he raise himself to a true 
comprehension of that which he strives after uncoiv- 
ditionaUy, as distinguished from that which he only 
seeks conditionally ; — which comprehension we termed 
the standing-point of True Religion. With respect 
to this latter point especially, I referred you to our 
present lecture, in which I promised a more profound 
exposition of this subject. 

I shall prepare the way for this exposition by a 
survey of our whole subject from its profoundest 
standing-point. 

Being exists ; and the Ex-istence of Being is neces- 
sarily Consciousness, or Reflexion according to fixed 
laws, which are contained in, and are to be developed 
from. Reflexion itself: — this is the ftmdamental prin- 
ciple, now sufficiently explained on all sides, of our 
whole doctrine. It is Being alone that exists, — that 
" w," in Ex-istence, and by whose being in it alone 
Ex-istence is; — that eternally abides in it as it is in 
itself, and without whose indweUing within it Ex- 
istence would vanish into Nothingness : — no one doubts 



THE STANDING-POINT OF TRUE RELIGION. 



187 



this, and no one who understands it can doubt it. 
But in Ex-istence, as Ex-istence, — i.e. in Reflexion, 
Being immediately changes its absolutely incompre- 
hensible Form, which can only be described as pure 
Life and Activity, into an Essence or Nature — a 
specific and definite mode of Being ; so that we have 
never spoken of Being, and no one can ever speak 
of Being, otherwise than by speaking of its Essence 
or Nature. Although, therefore, our Being is ever 
in itself the Being of Being, and thus remains, and 
can never become other than this ; yet that which we 
ourselves, and^' ourselves, are, have, and possess, — 
i. e, in the Form o£ ourselves, of the Ego, of Reflexion 
in Consciousness, — this is never Being in itself, but 
only Being in our Form, as Essence or Nature. How 
then is this Being, which certainly does not enter 
into Form in all its native purity, — how is it yet con- 
nected with Form? — does it not thereby irrevocably 
project forth from itself, and set up beside itself, a 
second, wholly new Being, — which new and second 
Being is altogether impossible? Answer: — Ask not 
for the ''How;" — be satisfied with the fact. They 
are connected; there is such a bond, which, — higher 
than all Reflexion, proceeding from no Reflexion, and 
not recognising the jurisdiction of Reflexion, — appears 
beside, and indissolubly associated with. Reflexion. In 
this companionship with Reflexion, this bond is Feel- 
ing; — and, since it is a bond, it is Love ; — and, since 
it is the bond that unites True Being and Reflexion, 
it is the Love of God. In this Love, Being and Ex- 
istence, God and Man, are one ; wholly transftised and 
lost in each other; — it is the point of intersection of 
the A and B we have spoken of above; — the act of 



188 LECTURE X. 

Being in supporting and maintaining itself in Ex- 
istence is its Love for itself, which wfe are prevented 
from conceiving of as Feeling cmlj because we may 
not conceive of it at alL The appearance of this act 
of Being in supporting and maintaining itself in Ex- 
istence in presence of Reflexion, — that is, the Feeling 
of this act of Self-existence, — is our Love towards it ; 
or, in strict truth, its own Love towards itself in the 
form of Feeling; since we have no power to love it, 
but only itself has power to love itself in us. 

This — not its, nor ours — but this reciprocal Love, 
which first separates us into two, and then binds us 
together into one, is the original Creator of our oft- 
mentioned abstract conception of a pure Being, or a 
God. What is it which thus carries us beyond all 
determinate and comprehensible Ex-iatence, and beyond 
the whole world of absolute Reflexion ? It is our Love 
which no Ex-istence can satisfy. Conception does here 
that only which it alone can do; — it feshions and 
interprets this Love, emptying its object, which only 
by its means becomes an object, of everything that 
does not satisfy this Love ; leaving in it nothing but 
the pure negation of all Conceivability associated with 
infinite and eternal Loveableness. What then is it that 
assures us of God but pure, self-sufficing Love, which 
is superior to all the doubt that is bom of Reflexion 
and is only possible therein? — and what makes this 
Love thus self-sufficient, but that it is the inunediate 
self-supporting and self-maintaining Life of the Ab- 
solute itself? Not Reflexion, which by virtue of its 
very nature divides itself into parts, and thus is ever 
at variance with itself; — no, — Love is the source of 
all Certainty, all Truth, and all Reality. 



THE STANDING-POINT OF TRUE RELIGION. 189 

The Conception of God, which has thus become a 
purely abstract conception, gives shape and meaning 
to this Love, we said. In its immediate Life, on the 
contrary — and I entreat you to note this well — this 
Love is not thus fashioned and interpreted ; but it is, 
and it has and holds its object, not by any means in 
Conception, which never overtakes it, but immediately 
in Love ; and that indeed as it is in itself, because it 
is in truth nothing else than the self-supporting Life 
of Absolute Being. Now it is this Substance and 
material of Love, which, in the first place, makes the 
Reflexion of Life assume the form of a permanent 
objective Essence or Nature ; and then again divides, 
even to Infinity, the Nature which has thus arisen, 
clothing it with new and ever-varied Forms; — and 
thus creates its World. I ask: — What is it then that 
gives a true and proper fundamental Substance to this 
World, the Nature and Form of which are evidently 
products of Reflexion ? It is obviously the Absolute 
Love; — the Absolute, I say, — or, as we may now 
express it, — the Love of God towards his Ex-istence, 
or, the Love of that Ex-istence towards the Living God. 
And what remains for Reflexion? To give an ob- 
jective standing to this Substance, and to fashion it 
into an infinite succession of objective Forms. But 
even with reference to this last point, — What is it 
then that prevents Reflexion from ever pausing in this 
work, and impels it incessantly forward from eaxih 
Form to which it has attained, towards another, and 
from this again to another, in endless succession ? It 
is the inextinguishable Love for that which necessarily 
escapes Reflexion, which lies concealed behind all Re- 
flexion, and is therefore necessarily to be sought for 



190 LBCTURB X. 

behind all Beflexion^' and under all its infbutelj varied 
Forms, — the pure and real Absolute; — this it is 
which impels Beflexion onward through Eternity, an.d 
stretches it out into a living Eternity. Love ia there- 
fore higher than all Reason ; it* is itself the fountain 
of Season and the root of BeaUtj ; the sole Creator 
of life and Time ; — and thus I have finally declared 
to you the highest, real point of view of a Doctrine 
of Being, Life, and Blessedness, — that is, of True 
Speculation, towards which we have hitherto been 
gradually advancing. 

(Finally, Love, as it is the source of all Truth and 
Certainty generally, so is it the source of completed 
Truth in the actual man, and his life. Completed 
Truth is Science ; and the element of Science is Re- 
flexion. Just as Science becomes clear to itself as the 
Love of the Absolute, and comprehends this Absolute, 
aa it necessarily must, as lying wholly beycmd all Re- 
flexion, and inaccessible to it iu any possible Form, — 
does it attain to pure objective Truth ; and so does it 
even thereby become capable of apprehending and dis- 
tinguishing Beflexion, which formerly it had always 
confounded with Beality; of completely recognising and 
setting forth all the products of Beflexion in Beality ; 
— and, thus, of laying the foundation of a Doctrine of 
Knowledge. In short, the Beflexion which has become 
Divine Love, and is therefore wholly overshadowed by 
God himself, — is the standing-point of Science: — 
which I desired to avail myself of this fitting opportu- 
nity to mention in passing.) 

And now to present this to you in a form which 
may be easily retained, and also to connect it with a 
previous illustration: — We have already twice trans- 



THE STANDING-POINT OF TRUE RELIGION. 191 

lated the words of John — " In the "beginning -was 
the Word, &c.*' — into the language of our immediate 
theme :— in the first instance, thus.: — ** In the begin- 
ning, and absolutely associated with Being, was Ex- 
istence ;" and then, in the second instance, after we 
had more distinctly recognised the manifold inward 
modifications c^ Ez-istence, and had combined these 
together under the name Form, thus: — " In the be- 
ginning, and absolutely associated with God, or Being, 
was Form." Now, however, since we have seen that 
Consciousness with all its manifold Forms, which before 
we had held to be the True Ex-istence, is but Ex-istence 
at second hand, and indeed the mere Appearance or 
Manifestation of Ex-istence, and have recognised the 
True and Absolute Ex-istence, in its own proper Form, 
as Love ; — ^now, we render these same words, thus : — 
** In the beginning, before all Time, and the absolute 
Creator of all Time, is Love; and Love is in God, 
for it is his own act whereby he maintains himself 
in Ex-istence; and Love is itself God, — God is in it, 
and for ever abides in it, as he is in himself. By it 
and firom it, as the iundamental Substance of all Ex- 
istence, are, by means of living Reflexion, all things 
made, and without it is not anjrthing made that is 
made ; and it for ever becomes flesh, in us and around 
us, and dweUs among us ; and, if we will, we may 
behold for ever before our eyes, its glory, as the glory 
of the Eternal and necesssary Effluence of the God- 
head." 

True life is Love ; and, as Love, holds and possesses 
within itself its own object — the object of this Love — 
bound up, interpenetrated, transfused, and wholly ab- 
sorbed in it: — eternally One and the same Love. It 



192 LECTURE X. 

is not Love that sets up this object before it in out- 
ward representation, and separates it into parts; — it 
is Reflexion that does this. Thus, in so far as man is 
Love, — and this he is always in the root of his Life, 
and can be nothing but this, although it may be that 
he is the Love of himself, — and especially in so far 
as he is the Love of God, he remains eternally and 
for ever One, True, and Unchangeable as God himself, 
and is indeed essentially God himself; and it is not 
merely a bold metaphor, but a literal truth, that John 
utters when he says : — " He who d welleth in Love, 
dwelleth in God, and God in him." It is only his 
Reflexion which first estranges him from this which 
is his own, proper Being, and no foreign Being; — 
and which strives, throughout a whole manifold Li- 
finity, to lay hold of that which he himself is and 
remains, now, everywhere, and for ever. Hence it is 
not his Inward Essential Nature, — that which is his 
own, which belongs to himself and to no other, — 
which is subject to continual change, but it is only 
the Appearance or Manifestation of this Nature, which 
in itself is withdrawn from outward Appearance, that 
suffers this continual change. Formerly we said: — 
The eye of man conceals God from him, and separates 
the pure hght into coloured rays. Now we say: — 
The eye of man conceals God from him, only because 
he himself is concealed by it, and because his vision 
never reaches his own True Being. What he sees 
is ever he himself, as we also said formerly; — but 
he does not see himself as he truly is; — his Being is 
one, but his vision is infinite. 

Love necessarily enters into Reflexion, and manifests 
itself there immediately as a Life which employs as 



THE STANDING-POINT OF TRUE RELIGION. 193 

its instrument a personal, sensuous Ex-istence, — and 
thus as the Activity of the Individual; — and that in- 
deed in a sphere pecuhar to itself and lying beyond all 
Sensuousness — in a wholly If ew World. Wherever the 
Divine Love is, there is necessarily this Manifestation ; 
for thus only does this Love reveal itself, and that 
without any new intervening principle ; and, on the 
contrary, where this Manifestation is not, there also 
the Divine Love is not. It is altogether in vain to 
say to him who does not dwell in Love — " Act mo- 
rdly," — ^for only in Love is the Moral World revealed, 
and without Love there is no such world ; and just 
as superfluous is it to say this to him who does dwell 
in Love, — for his Love is already living in itself, and 
his activity, his Moral Activity, is merely the silent Ma- 
nifestation of this his Life. The Activity is nothing in 
and for itself, and it has no proper principle in itself; 
but it flows forth, calmly and silently, from Love, 
as light seems to flow forth from the sun, and as the 
World does actually flow forth from the inward Love 
of God to himself. If any man does not act, neither 
does he love ; and he who imagines that he loves, and 
yet does not act, in him fancy alone is excited by 
some picture of Love which is conveyed to him from 
without, to which picture there is within him no cor- 
responding, inward, self-supporting reahty. " He who 
says, I love God," — thus speaks the same John, after 
representing brotherly love, in a certain very just sense, 
as in itself the Higher MoraUty — " he who says, I love 
God, and hateth his brother, is a liar;" — or, as we 
would say, in language more suitable to our age, 
although not a whit more tenderly, — he is a sham, 
and has not the Love of God abiding in him ; — abiding, 

s 



194 LBOTURB X. 

I say, really indwelling within him, — it is not the 
root of his True Life, but he can at most only pictiire 
it to himself 

Love is eternally complete, and contained within 
itself; and, as Love, it has ever within itself complete 
ReaUty; it is Reflexion alone that separates and di« 
vides into parts. Hence, — and thus we return to tihe 
point at which we stood in our previous lecture, — 
hence the division of the One Divine Life into dif* 
fsrent Lidividuals does not by any means take plaoe 
in Love, but solely in Reflexion. The Lidividual, who 
is revealed to himself only in Action, and all oiher 
Individuals who appear around him, are but the dfo- 
nifestation of this One Love, not by any means the 
tlung itself In his own Activity, Love muat be rnani^ 
fest, for otherwise it would not exkt ; but the Moml 
Activity of others is not to him the immediately ap* 
par^it Manifestation of Love ; the absence of this doek 
not immediately prove the absence of Love; — ^therefore* 
as we said already in our previous lecture, the MotaKty 
and Religion of others are not unconditionally willed 
by him, but only under the condition of the Freedom 
of others ; and the absence of this universal MoraUij 
does not disturb the peace of Love, which is wholly 
independent of everything beyond itself 

The Morality and Religion of the whole Spiritual 
World are closely connected with the Activity of each 
particular Individual, as effect with cause. The Moral. 
ReUgious Man desires to spread MoraUty and Religion 
universally. The distinction between his Reh&don and 
the Religion of others is but a distinction in I^exkm. 
The affection produced in him by success or £ulare 
must therefore take place according to the Law of 



THE STANDINGrPOINT OF TRUE RELIGION. 195 

Reflesion. But, as we have already sieen on iM^ther 
occasion, ihe peculiar affection of Befiexioii ia appro- 
bation or disapprobation; which indeed cannot be cold^ 
but becomes tiiie more passionate, the more loving the 
natore of the man. But Beflexm alwaya bears with 
it an affection towards the Morality of others; for 
this Reflexion is the highest enjoyment of all to the 
Religious Man, and the true root of the World around 
him, which he embraces with affection, and which is, 
to him, purely and solely a Spiritual World. 

Prom what we have now said, we obtain the prin- 
ciples by which we may characterize more profoundly 
than we could do in our former lecture, the disposition 
of the ReUgious Man towards others ; — or what would 
be commonly called Im Philanthropy. 

In the first place, there is nothing further removed 
from this Religious Philanthropy than a certain tender- 
hearted catholicity of sentiment which we hear much 
bepraised now-a-days. This mode of thought, f^ from 
bdng the Love of God, is much rather that absolute 
shallowness and inward vagrancy of a mind that is 
capable neither of Love nor of Hate, which we have 
sufficiently described in one of our earlier lectures. 
The ReUgious man does not concern himself about 
the physical happiness of the Human Race, — unless it 
be his especial calling to provide a more worthy sub- 
sistence for men; — he desires no happiness for men 
but in the ways of the Divine Order. He cannot desire 
to make them happy by means of outward circum- 
stances, as little as Ood can desire this ; (or the Will 
and Counsel of God, even with regard to his feUow-r 
men, are always his. As it is the Will of God that 
no one shall find peace and repose but in Him, and 



196 LECTURE X. 

that all men shall be continaally driyen onward by 
means of sorrows and vexations to renounce themselves 
and to seek a refuge in God ;— so is this also the wifl 
and wish of the man who is devoted to God. When 
they have again found their Being in God, he will 
love this Being; their Being out of God he hates 
with a perfect hatred, and his very love towards 
their True Being consists in hate towards their partial 
Being. " Ye think that I am come to bring peace on 
earth," says Jesus, — peace, that is, this same catholic 
tender-hearted acceptance of things as they are; — 
" no ; "since ye are such as ye are, I come not to bring 
peace but a sword." The ReUgious Man is likewise 
far removed from the well-known and much-com- 
mended .effort of this same superficiality to put such 
a construction upon surrounding events as may ena:ble 
it to maintain itself in this comfortable frame of mind: 
— to explain them away, and to interpret them into 
the Good and the Beautiful. He wishes to see them 
as they are in truth ; and he does so see them, for 
Love sharpens his sight ; he judges strictly but justly, 
and penetrates even to the root of every prevalent 
mode of thought. 

Having m his view what men might be, his govern- 
ing affection is a holy indignation at their actual exist* 
ence, so unworthy and void of honour: — seeing that 
in the profoundest depths of their nature they still bear 
within them the Divine, although it does not force 
its way to outward Manifestation; — considering that 
all of which they are accused by others is the source 
of the greatest wretchedness to themselves, and that 
what men are inclined to call their wickedness is but 
the outbreak of their own deeper misery; — reflecting 



\ 

THE STANDING-POINT OP TRUE RELIGION^ 197 

that tbey need but to stii^etoh forth tb^b hand to the 
Good that constantly snrrpunds them in order to be- 
come at once worthy and blesi^ed;: — seeing all this, he 
is filled with the deepest i6ela^oholy,-T-the most heart- 
felt sorrow. His hate is excited only by the fanatidism 
of peryersity, which is not satisfied with being worthies^ 
i^ its own person, but, so &r as its influence extepds, 
endeavours to make all others as unworthy as itself; 
and which is profoundly irritated and moved to hatred 
at the sight of anjrthing better than itself. For 
whfle the former is but the wretched work of Sin, the 
latter is the work of the Devil; — for the Deyil also 
hates Goodness, not simply because it is good, which 
would be wholly unintelligible, but from Envy, and 
becau0e he himself cannot attain to it. Just as, ac- 
cording to our recent description, the man inspired of 
God desires that God alone, as he is in himself, should 
be revealed in his glory, at all times, on all sides, and 
in all events, to him, and to a}l his lH*ethren ;— sp, on 
the contrary, he who is inspired of himself desires, 
that, to him and to his fellow-men, there should be 
revealed at all times, on all sides, and in all events, 
only the image of his own worthlessness. By thus 
going beyond his own In(Uviduality, he passes the 
human and natural boundaries of Egoism, and makes 
himself the universal Ideal and God; — all wfaie^ the 
Devil ajso does in like manner. 

Finally, the Love of his fellow-men reveals itself in 
the Religious Man, unalterably determined and for ever 
remaining the same, in this: — that he never, under 
any condition, ceases to labour f(^ tbeir ennoblement, 
and ccHQsequ^tly never, under any co^tion^, ^ves up 
his Hope in them. His 4^ctiyity i$ in4eed the necessary 

s 2 



■^ 



198 LECTURE X. 

Manifestation of his Love ; but, on the other hand, this 
Activily necessarily proceeds towards an outward world, 
presupposes an outward world as its sphere, and as- 
sumes that he entertains the Thought of something 
actually existing in this outward world. Without the 
extinction of this Love in him, neither his Activity, nor 
this Thought necessarily assumed in his Activity, can 
ever cease. As often as it fails of the anticipated result, 
is he forced back upon himself, to create, firom the 
fountain of Love that eternally flows within him, new 
dehght and love, and new means of accomplishing his 
purpose; and is thereby impeUed to a fresh effort, and 
should even this fail, again to another; — at each re- 
newed attempt, assuming that what has not hitherto 
been successful, may yet be accomplished this time, or 
the next time, or at some future time ; — or, even if it 
should not be accompKshed by him individually, yet 
that, through his aid, and by means of his previous 
labours, it may be accomplished by some one following 
in his steps. Thus does Love become to him an ever- 
flowing fountain of Faith and Hope : — not in Crod, for 
God is ever-present, Uving within him, and therefore 
he has no need of Faith to enable him to see God; and 
God ever gives himself to him whole and perfect as he 
is in himself, and therefore there is no room for Hope : 
— but Faith in Man, and Hope in Man. It is this 
firm and immovable Faith, this untiring Hope, through 
which he can raise himself, so soon as he will, &r 
above all the indignation or the sorrow with which he 
might be filled by the contemplation of Reahty, and 
can invite into his heart the surest peace and the most 
indestructible repose. Let him look beyond the Pre- 
sent to the Future I — and in that glance ho has a 



THE BLESSED LIFE. 199 

whole Eternity before him, and may, without cost to 
himself, add to the vista cycle upon cycle as far as 
thought can reach. 

At last — and where then is the End? — at last all 
must arrive at the sure haven of Eternal Peace and 
Blessedness; — at last the Kingdom and the Power 
and the Glory of God must surely come I 

And thus have we gathered into one point the 
essential elements of a picture of the Blessed Life, in 
so far as such a picture is possible. Blessedness itself 
consists in Love, and in the eternal satisfaction of 
Love ; and it is inaccessible to Reflexion : — it can only 
be negatively expressed by the understanding, and 
hence by our description, which is the language of the 
understanding. We can only show that the Blessed 
are free from pain, trouble, and privation;— wherein 
their Blessedness positively consists, cannot be de- 
scribed, but must be immediately felt. 

Unblessedness comes of Doubt which continually 
drags us to and fro, and of Uncertainty which spreads 
around us an impenetrable night in which our feet can 
find no sure path. The ReUgious Man is for ever 
secured from the possibihty of Doubt and Uncertainty. 
Li every moment he knows distinctly what he wills, 
and ought to will ; for the innermost root of his Life — 
his WiU— for ever flows forth from the Divinity, un- 
mediately and without the possibility of error; its 
indication is in&Uible, and for that indication he has 
an infallible perception. Li every moment he knows 
assuredly that in all Eternity he shall know what he 
shall will, and ought to will ; that in all Eternity the 
fountain of Divine Love which has burst forth in him 
shall never be dried up, but shall uphold him securely. 



200 LBOTURB X. 

and bear him onward for ever. It is the root of his 
Eziatfnoe; it has now arisen upon him dear mi 
bright, and his eye is fixed upon it with unspeakable 
Love: — how could that fountain ever be drie^ up, 
how could that leader and guardian ever torn anide? 
Whatever comes to pass around him, nothing ax^^ears 
to him strange or unaccountable ; — ^be knows assuredly^ 
wheth^ he understand it or not, that it is in Gk)d's 
World, and that there nothing can be that does not 
directly tend to Good. 

In him there is no fear for the Future, for the ab- 
solute fountain of all Blessedness eternally bears him 
on towards it ; — no sorrow for the Past, for in so fiur 
as he was not in God he was nothing, and this is now 
at an end, and since he has dwelt in God he has been 
bom into Life; while in so far as he was in God, that 
which he has done is assuredly right and good. He has 
never aught to deny himself, nor aught to long far ; 
for he is at all times in eternal possession of the ful- 
ness of all that he is capable of enjo3dng. For him all 
labour and effort have vanished ; his whole Outward 
Ex-istence flows forth, softly and gently, from his In- 
ward Being, and issues out into ReaUty without diffi- 
culty or hindrance. To use the language of one of 
our great Poets: — 



(t 



Ever pure and mirror-bright and even, 
Light as zephyr-breath of Heaven, 
Life amidst the Immortals glides away. 
Moons are waning, generati(ms wasting^-i- 
Their celestial youth blooms everlasting, 
Changeless 'midst a ruined world's decay." * 



* Schilkr'B '' Das Ideal und das Leben/* Merivale's Trandaeiou, 



THE BLESSED LIFE. 201 

Thus much have I desired to say to you, in these 
lectures, concerning the True Life and its Blessedness. 
It is true that we might say much more on this subject ; 
and that, in particiJar, it would be very interesting, 
now that we have learned to know the Moral-Religious 
Man in the central-point of his Being, to accompany 
him thence out into common life, and even into the 
most ordinary concerns and circumstances of his Ex- 
istence, and there to contemplate him in all his ad- 
mirable serenity and loveHness. But, without a fun- 
damental knowledge of that first central-point, such a 
description might become, to the hearer, either empty 
declamation, or else a mere air-castle, producing in- 
deed for the moment an aesthetic pleasure, but con- 
taining within itself no true ground of persistence ; — 
and this is the reason why we rather choose to ab- 
stain firom this prolongation of our subject. As to 
principles, we have abeady said enough — perhaps more 
than enough. 

In order that we may add a fitting conclusion to our 
whole work, I invite you here once again. 



(202) 



LECTURE XI 



CONCLUSION. 



The subject of our present inquiry has been completely 
exhausted in our last lecture, so &r as it can be here 
exhausted; and it only remains for me to point out 
its general practical application, — ^respecting, of course, 
those limits which are imposed upon me by good 
manners, and by that free and liberal relation which 
these Lectures have established between you and me, 
and which this day brings to a close. 

It was my desire to establish between us the fullest 
possible understanding; as it were, to penetrate you 
with mjrself, and in turn to be penetrated by you. I 
believe that I have actually expressed the ideas which 
were here to be clothed in words, with a clearness that 
at least had not previously been attained, and also that 
I have succeeded in setting forth these ideas in their 
natural connexion. But even after the clearest ex- 
position of such ideas, and after a very accurate com- 
prehension of them, there may yet remain a great 
gulf fixed between the giver and the receiver ; and 
much may be awanting to a complete understanding 
after 'exhausting all possible means of communication. 
In this our Age, we have to calculate upon this defect 
as the rule; — the opposite is the exception. 



CONCLUSION. 203 

There are two chief causes ihai, giye rise to this 
want of a thorough reception of proffered instruction 
in this Age. 

In the first plaoe, the hearer does not give himself up, 
as he ought to do, with his whole mind, to the instruc- 
tion presented to him ; but he maj perhaps approach 
it only with the understanding, or with the fancy. In 
the first case, he regards it merely with curiosity, or 
with the desire of knowing what shape and form it may 
assume; — but is otherwise indifferent about its sub- 
stance, whether it may prove to be this or the other 
thin?. Or, in the second case, he merely amuses him- 
self ^th the saccession of pictures, phenomena, pleas- 
ing words, and modes of speech that may be passed in 
review before his fancy, but is otherwise indifferent to 
the substance. He represents it to himself as something 
out of, and separate firom himself; and thus places it 
at a distance from himself, instead of trying it by his 
own irue Love, as he ought to do, and seeing how it 
may correspond with that. He thei\ attributes this 
same disposition to the speaker, believing that he too 
has no other motive than that of speculating how he 
may pass the time in an agreeable way, of letting his 
ingenuity and dialectic art be admired, producing fine 
phrases, and such like. But were he to put the ques- 
tion, even although it were only to his own heart, 
whether the speaker is himself earnestly and vitaUy 
penetrated by what he says, and were he to suppose 
that he Ukewise wished so to penetrate others, if he 
were able to do so, — he would fear thereby to trans- 
gress the limits of individual right, insult the speaker, 
perhaps even make him out to be a fimatic. Should 
this supposition not be made, where nevertheless it 



204 LECTURE XI. 

both could and should be made, then indeed no harm 
is done to the speaker, since he can easily disremrd 
this foreign jud^ent which falls so fer short of Ms 
true sentiments; but harm is assuredly done to the 
hearer himself, for to him the imparted instruction is 
no more than what he takes it to be, and for him it 
contains no reference to Life if he himself does not 
give it this reference. This cold and indiJBferent con- 
templation by the Understanding alone is the charac- 
teristic of the scientific mode of thought, and all ac- 
tual development of Science commences with this indif- 
ference towards the Substance and interest only in the 
correctness of the Form ; — remaining in this indifference 
until it has attained its completion ; but, as soon 
as it is thus completed, streaming back into Life, to 
which aU things are at last related. Our aim in the 
present lectures was not in the first instance Scientific, 
— notwithstanding that, in passing, I have frequently 
taken notice of the scientific wants of my hearers, so 
far as they were known to me, — but it was PracticaL 
Now therefore, at their close, we must by all means 
avow that we have nothing to say against the sup- 
position being made that what we have said in these 
lectures has been said by us with entire and perfect 
earnestness; — that the principles we have asserted 
have, in our own case, arisen firom Life and returned 
back upon Life ; — that we have certainly desired that 
these principles should also influence the Love and 
Life of our hearers; — and that only in the event of 
such an influence having been actually exerted we 
should consider our object perfectly accomplished, and 
believe that our communication has been as complete 
as it ought to have been. 



CONCLUSION. 205 

A second obstacle to thorough communication in our 
Age is the prevalent maxim, that we ought to embrace 
no party, and decide neither for nor against; — a mode 
of lliought which is called Scepticism, and assumes also 
many other distinguished names. We have already 
spoken of this mode of thought in the course of these 
lectures. It is founded upon an absolute want of Love, 
even in its most common form — that of Self-love;— 
and this is the lowest grade of that vagrancy of mind 
which we have already described, in which man cannot 
even trouble himself concerning his own destiny; — 
or it is the wholly animal opinion that Truth is of no 
value, and that no advantage can be had from the know- 
ledge of it. In order to escape from this treacherous 
Scepticism, — which is by no means acuteness, but, on 
the contrary, the lowest degree of stupidity, — we must 
at least md^e up our minds as to whether there is any 
Truth at all, whether it is attainable by man, and 
whether, when attained, it possesses any value for him. 
Now at the conclusion of these discourses I must 
confess, that should any man not yet have attained 
to certainty on these points, — should he even find 
it necessary to ask time for consideration before re- 
solving on a decisive yes or no with reference to 
the results we have announced,— and perhaps, admit" 
ting the expertness of the statement, yet profess that 
he has not arrived at any judgment on the matter 
itself, — I must, I say, confess that the communication 
and mutual influence between such an one and myself 
has proved to be of the shallowest sort ; and that he 
has only received an addition to his existing store of 
possible opinions, whilst I intended something much 
better for him. To me it is — not so certain as the 



206 LECTURE XI. 

sun in heaven, or as this feeUng of my ownbodj, — 
but infinitely more certain, that there is Truth, that it 
is attainable by man, and clearly conceivable bj him. 
I am also firmly convinced that I, for my part, have 
seized upon this Truth fi'om a certain point of view 
pecuUar to myself, and with a certain degree of clear- 
ness; for otherwise I would assuredly have kept silence, 
and abstained from teaching it either by speech or wri- 
ting. Finally, I am also firmly convinced that what 
I have declared, here as elsewhere, is that same Eter- 
nal, Unchangeable Truth, which makes everything 
that is opposed to it Untruth ; for otherwise assuredly 
1 would not have thus taught it, but rather have 
taught whatever else I held to be Truth. For a long 
time it has been attempted, in and out of rhjrme, 
among the great reading and writing pubUc, to bring 
upon me the suspicion that I hold this last-mentioned 
singular opinion ; and I have fi'equently pled guilty to 
the charge in print. But printed letters do not blush, 
— thus do my accusers seem to think, — and they conti- 
nue to entertain good hope of me that I shall, one day 
or other, become ashamed of this charge, which, for that 
purpose, they still continue to repeat; — and I have 
therefore desired once for all, by word of mouth, in 
the presence of a numerous and honourable assembly, 
and looking them in the face, to confess the truth of 
this accusation against me. In all my attempts at 
communication with my fellow-men, and consequently 
in these discourses also, it has ever been, in the first 
place, my earnest purpose and aim, by every means 
in my power, to make that which I myself have per- 
ceived, clear and intelligible to others, and, in so far 
as it lay with me, to force them to such comprehension ; 



CONCLUSION. 207 

being well assured that a conyiction of the truth and 
justice of what I had taught would then follow of 
itself; — and thus it has certainly been my aim, at all 
times, and consequently at this time, to disseminate 
my convictions, to make proselytes, or by whatever 
other phrase they who hate this design, which I thus 
candidly avow, may choose to describe it. That mo- 
desty which is so frequently, and in so many ways, 
recommended to me, which says : — " See, here is my 
opinion, and how I for my part regard the matter, 
although I am likewise of opinion that this opinion 
of mine is no better than all the other opinions that 
have arisen ance the begbning of the world, or those 

that will arise even till its end" such modesty, 

I say, I cannot assume, for reasons which I have al- 
ready adduced, and likewise for this reason: — that I 
consider such modesty to be the greatest immodesty ; 
and even hold it to be a frightM arrogance, and 
worthy of all abhorrence, to suppose that any one should 
desire to know how we personally regard the matter ; 
or to open our mouth to teach, so long as we are not 
conscious of Knowledge but only of Opinion. When 
it has happened that my hearers have not imderstood 
me, and for that reason have not been convinced, I 
have then had no alternative but submission; for 
there are no outward logical means of compelling 
imderstanding, but understanding and conviction arise 
only from the inmost depths of Life and its Love;- 
but to submit beforehand to this want of imderstand- 
ing, and to reckon upon it, even during instruction, 
as upon a necessary result, — this I cannot do, nor 
have I ever done it, either at any previous time or 
in these lectures. 



208 LBCTUBE XI. 

These obstacles to a more intimate and finitfid 
communication upon subjects of earnest thonght are 
constantly maintained and renewed, eyen in those who 
possess both the desire and the power of rising superior 
to them, by means of the daily influences that sor* 
round us in this Age. When my meaning shall appear 
more distinctly, you will perceive that I haye hitiierto 
neither directly mentioned these things, nor indirecdy 
hinted at them ;— now, however, after mature reflexion 
and consideration, I have determined to explore the 
nature of these influences, to try them by their priii- 
dples, and, by means of this deeper investigation^ to 
arm you against them for the future, so far as I, or 
any other foreign power, can do so. 

I shall not be withheld from doing this by the al- 
most universal hatred which, as I am well aware, is 
entertained against what is called polemics; for this 
hatred itself proceeds from that very influence which 
I undertake to combat, and is indeed one of its chief 
elements. Where this hatred has not yet become some- 
thing still more worthless and contemptible, — of which 
more hereafter, — it is at least a diseased aversion to 
aU that strict distinction and discrimination which is 
necessarily produced by controversy ; and the uncon- 
querable love of that confusion and vagrancy of spirit, 
in which the most opposite things are confounded, and 
which we have already sufficiently described. 

As little shall I be withheld from this investigation 
by the admonition which one hears so frequently : — 
that we should rise superior to such things, and des- 
pise them. It is surely not to be expected that, in 
our Age, any man of character who is possessed of 
clear Knowledge should fail to despise the supposition 



CONCLUSION. 209 

that he could, in his own person, be hurt or degraded 
by a judgment proceeding from such influences ; and 
such admonisbers perhaps do not consider what ful- 
ness of contempt they themselves deserve, and oflen 
indeed receive, in consequence of their supposing that 
they must first remind us of the contempt which is 
due from us to such things. 

I shall not be withheld from this investigation by 
the common supposition that we only wrangle and 
dispute in order to gratify personal feelings, and to 
retaliate Upon those who have injured us in some way; 
—by which supposition weak men, who are ignorant 
of any certain Truth and of its value, think they have 
obtained a creditable gromid for hating and despising, 
with seeming justice, those polemics which otherwise 
would drive them from their propriety. That any 
one should beUeve that we could set ourselves in 
opposition to anything upon mere personal grounds, 
proves nothing more than that such an one, for his 
part, would do so merely upon such groimds; and 
that, should he at any time enter into controversy, mere 
personal ill-will would certainly be his only motive 
for doing so ; and here then we willingly accept the 
counsel, given to us above, to despise such things ; 
for that such an one should, without farther proof, 
set us down as his fellow, is an insult which can only 
be repaid by contempt, and will be so requited by 
every honest man. 

Neither shall I be withheld from this investigation 
by its being said that there are but few who speak or 
think thus; for this assertion is simply a falsehood, 
with which the culpable timidity of better men imposes 
upon itself. At a moderate calculation, ninety-nine 

T 2 



210 LSCTURB XI. 

out of every hundred among the cultirated daases in 
Germany think thus ; and in the highest circles^ whidi 
give the tone to all the others, this Scepticism is most 
virulent; and therefore the party we have indicated 
cannot at present decrease, but must increase. And 
even if there are but few speakers belonging to it, and 
but few who publish its sentiments through the press^ 
this arises only from the speakers being always, and in 
every case, the fewer in number; while the portion 
who do not print anything, read and refresh themselves 
in the secret silence of their minds at the well-defined 
expression of their own true sentiments. That this is 
indeed the case with the last-mentioned section of this 
party, and that we do no injustice to the public by 
this accusation, however carefully they may watch over 
their expressions so long as they preserve their ocm* 
posure, yet becomes iudisputably manifest so soon as 
they get into a passion; — which always ensues when 
any one attacks one of their speakers and mouthpieces. 
Then they all arise, man by man, and unite against 
the common enemy, as if each individual thought him- 
self attacked in his dearest possessions. 

Thus although we may set aside and disregard the 
individual persons composing this party who are known 
to us, yet we ought not to dismiss the thing itself with 
mere contempt ; since it is the cause of the decisive 
majority of the age, — nay, carries with it almost uni- 
versal consent, and will long continue to do so. The 
careful avoidance of any contact with such things, 
imder the pretext of being superior to them, is not 
unlike cowardice ; and it seems as if one was afraid of 
soiUng one's fingers in those dim corners ; — while, on 
the contrary, the potent sun-light must be able to dis- 



CONCLUSION. 2U 

perse the darkness of these deiis, without xiecessarilj 
absorbing any piurt of it. It cannot indeed open the 
eyes of the blind inhabitants of these dens, but it may 
enable the seeing to perceive what goes on there. 

In our former lectures* we have shown, adverting to 
it also from time to time in these, that the mode of 
thought prevalent in this Age precisely reverses the 
ideas of Honour and Shame, — regarding what is in 
truth dishonourable as its real glory, and the truly 
honourable as its shame. Thus, as must be immedi- 
ately evident to every one who has listened to us with 
calm attention, the above-mentioned Scepticism, which 
the Age is accustomed to honour under the name 
of acuteness, is obvious stupidity, shallowness, and 
weakness of understanding. Most especially and pre- 
eminently, however, this total perversity of the Age 
is e^ibited in its judgment of Religion, I must have 
altogether wasted my words if I have not made this 
much at least evident to you, — that all Irreligion goes 
no further than the sur&ce of things and mere empty 
show; — that it therefore presupposes a want of strength 
and energy of mind, and consequently betrays weakness 
both of intellect and character ; — that Religion, on the 
contrary, raising itself above mere appearance, and pene- 
trating to the very nature of things, necessarily exhibits 
the most felicitous use of the spiritual powers, the great- 
est depth and acuteness of tiiought, and the highest 
strength of character, which is indeed inseparable from 
these ; — that, therefore, according to the principles by 
which we pass judgment upon Honour, the IrreUgious 
Man must be held in light esteem and despised; — the 

* " Characteristics of the Present Age." 



212 LBOTURE XI. 

Religious Man, on the contrary, highly honoured. The 
mode of thought prevalent in this Age completely re- 
verses all this. With the majority of the men of our day, 
nothing causes more immediate and certain disgrace 
than when any one allows himself to be penetrated 
by a religious thought or sentiment; coJTquently 
nothing can more surely bring honour to a man than 
to keep himself free from such thoughts or sentiments. 
What appears to furnish some excuse to the Age tar 
holding such an opinion, is this : — that it can conceiye 
of Religion only as Superstition, and that it thinks it 
has a right to despise this Superstition as something to 
which it is vastly superior ; and, since this Superstition 
and Religion are identical, therefore to despise all 
ReUgion. Herein, its total want of imderstanding, 
and the immeasurable ignorance arising therefrom, 
plays it two mischievous tricks at once. For, in the 
first place, it is not true that the Age is superior to 
Superstition; — the Age, as one may plainly see at 
every turn, is yet essentially filled with Superstition, for 
it trembles with terror whenever the root of its Super- 
stition is even touched by any powerful hand. Besides, 
and this is the chief thing, Superstition is itself the 
absolute antipodes of Religion; it is even Irreligion 
merely in another form ; — it is the melancholy form of 
IrreUgion, while that which the Age would willingly 
assume if it could, merely as a Uberation from that 
melancholy, is the gay form of IrreUgion. Now, we 
can easily imderstand how a man may enjoy a more 
comfortable frame of mind in the latter state than in 
the former, — and one cannot grudge men this little 
improvement in their condition; — but how Irreligion, 
which, notwithstanding this change in the nature of 



CONCLUSION. 213 

its outward form, still remains essentially the same, 
can bj such change become reasonable and worthy of 
honour, no man of understanding wiU erer compre^ 
bend. 

Thus the majority of the Age unconditionally scorn 
and despise Beligion, How then do they find it prac- 
ticable to give outward expression to this scorn? Do 
they assail ReUgion with argument ? How could that 
be, since they know nothing whatever about BeUgion ? 
Or perhaps with derision 1 How could that be, since 
even derision neces^y pr^upposes some conception 
of that which is derided, which they haye not? No! — 
they only repeat by rote that, here or there, such or 
such thiigs Ce been «ud. which may perhaps refer 
to Beligion; and then, without adding anything of 
their own. Aey laugh, and of course every poUte 
person laughs with them for company; — not, by any 
means, as if the first or any of his followers were 
actually moved to laughter by a really comical re* 
presentation in his own mind, — which indeed is wholly 
unpossible without a similar conception,— but only in 
accordance with the general agreement; and so, by 
and by, the whole company laugh together without 
any single individual among them being conscious of 
any groimd for laughter, although each one supposes 
that his neighbour may perchance have some such 
ground. 

To continue our illustration by reference to present 
circimistanees, and indeed to our immediate occupa- 
tion :— for the narrative of how I was firat induced to 
deliver courses of popular-phibsophical lectures to a 
mixed audience in this city, would carry us too far. 
This, however, once got over, every one who has any 



214 LECTURE XI. 

acquaintance whatever with the subject will imme- 
diately understand, that if the purely scientific pur- 
pose be laid aside, there is nothing left in Philosophy, 
generally interesting or generally intelligible to a mixed 
audience, but BeUgion. That the awakening of reli- 
gious sentiment would be the true and proper purpose 
of these addresses, I distinctly announced at the con- 
clusion of my lectures of last winter,* which are now 
in print, and in print for this same purpose ; — and I 
added, by way of explanation, that those lectures were 
but a preparation for this purpose, and that in them 
we had traversed only the principal sphere of the 
ReUgion of the Understanding, while we had left al- 
together untouched the whole sphere of the Religion 
of Reason. It was to be expected of me that, if I 
should ever resume these discourses, I should resume 
them where I had left off. Further, it was requisite 
that I should describe the subject of such popular 
lectures in a popular way; and I found that the title 
" The Way towards the* Blessed Life" would com- 
pletely and truly characterize these lectures. I still 
beheve that I have not erred in this ; and you your- 
selves can determine, now that you have heard the 
matter to an end, whether you have heard me point 
out the Way towards the Blessed Life, and whether 
you have heard anything else than this. And thus it 
came to pass that an announcement to that effect was 
made in the pubUc journals, which to this moment 
seems to me quite fitting and natural 

It could not, however, be unexpected on my part, 
and indeed it seemed to me quite as natural as my an- 



* (« 



Characteristics of the Present Age/ 



CONCLUSION. 215 

nouncement itself, that to a majority, such as we have 
described, my amioimcement and my whole undertaking 
should seem preeminently comic, and that they should 
discover in it a rich source of laughter. I should have 
foimd it quite natural that publishers of newspapers 
and editors of pamphlets would place regular report- 
ers in my lecture-hall in order to guide into their 
own channels the foimtain of the ridiculous which was 
here expected to flow forth in such abundance, and 
thus employ it for the amusement of their readers. 
" The Way towards the Blessed Life I — We do not 
know indeed what the man means by Life, or by 
Blessed Life, but it is a strange collocation of words 
which have never before reached our ears in this con- 
nexion : it is easy to see that nothing will come of 
this but things which no well-bred man would choose 
to mention in good society ; — and, in any case, could 
not the man have foreseen that we should laugh at 
him? — and since, if he were a reasonable man, he 
would have desired to avoid this at all hazards, his 
unpolished stupidity is manifest. We shall have a 
laugh beforehand, in accordance with the general 
agreement ; and then during this operation some idea 
may perchance occur to one of us by which to justify 
our laughter." 

Nor is it altogether impossible that such an idea 
might be discovered. For example, might it not be 
said: — "How blessed ought we to esteem the man 
himself who seeks to show others the Way towards the 
Blessed Life I " At first glance the sally seems witty ; 
but let us take patience to cast a second glance upon it. 
Suppose the case that he who is spoken of rests calm 
and tranquil in clear possession of his own principles ; 



216 LBOTURE XI. 

— have you not done him an unmerited insult by thus 
speaking of him? — ** Yes, but then to speak so of 
himself, — is not that shameless self-praise V To hare 
spoken directly of himself, — that surely he could not 
do ; for a grave man must have other topics besides 
himself on which to speak, if he will speak. But 
suppose that in the assertion that there is a oertain 
mode of thought by which peace and tranquillity are 
spread over Life, and in the promise to commimicate 
this mode of thought to others^ there is necessarily 
contained the assumption that one does himself possess 
it; and, since nothing but peace can thereby arise, that 
he has likewise, by means of it, attained this peace and 
tranquillity ; and also that it is impossible to declare 
the first of these thinf^s in a rational way without at 
the same time tacitlyTecognising the other ;-then we 
must let the result be as it will. And would it then 
be such gross presumption, and give room for such 
inextinguishable laughter, if such an one, compelled 
by the connexion of his subject, had remarked that be 
did not regard himself either as a blockhead, or as a 
bad and miserable man. 

And this, indeed, is precisely the peculiar impudence 
and peculiar absurdity of the majority of which we 
now speak; and in what we have just said we have 
brought tQ light the innermost principle of their Life. 
According to the principles which, although they may 
perhaps be unperceived by this majority, yet lie at the 
bottom of all their judgments, all intercourse among 
men ought to be founded on the tacit assumption that 
we are all in the same way miserable sinners ; he who 
regards others as anything better than this is a fool, 
and he who represents himself to be anything better 



CONCLUSION. 217 

is a presumptuous coxcomb : — both should be laughed 
at. Miserable sinners in Art and Science: — none of 
us indeed can either know or do anything ; we shall, 
nevertheless, all enter into a reciprocal agreement, 
humbly and modestly to acknowledge, and confess, and 
talk about each other's merits; — but he who misin- 
terprets this bargain, and conducts himself in real 
earnest, as if he actually knew and could do some- 
thing, acts in opposition to the agreement, and is a 
presumptuous fool. Miserable sinners in Life: — the 
ultimate purpose of all our emotions and endeavours 
is to improve our outward cbcumstances,— who does 
not know that ? — the conventional mode of life in- 
deed requires that this should not exactly be said to 
others in so many words, for then others would be 
compelled to admit it in words, and to avoid this, 
certain conventional pretexts have been set up; but 
each one must be supposed tacitly to assume it, and 
he who sets himself in opposition to this tacit assump- 
tion is not only a presumptuous fool, but a hypocrite 
into the bargain. 

From the principle to which we have adverted arises 
the well-known complaint which is made against the 
few in the nation who are animated by better principles 
— a complaint which we hear everywhere, and every- 
where may read ; the complaint: — "What! the man 
will speak to us of the Beautiful and the Noble! How 
little does he know us ! Let him give us, in insipid 
jests, the true picture of our own trivial and frivolous 
life ; for that pleases us, and then he is our man, and 
has a knowledge of his Age. We indeed see well 
enough that that which we do not desire is excellent, 
and that that which pleases us is bad and miserable ; 

u 



218 LECTURE XI. 

but yet we only desire the latter, for — such indeed 
we are." From this principle also proceed all the 
accusations of arrogance and presumption which the 
authors make against each other in print, and the 
men of the world against each other in words ; and 
the whole amount of the recognised coinage of wit 
which passes current among the pubUc. I pledge 
myself, if the problem should be proposed, to trace 
back the whole store of ridicule in the world, setting 
aside at most a mere fraction for other causes, either 
to this principle : — "He knows not yet that men are 
miserable sinners," or to this other: — "He thinks 
himself something better than all of us besides," — or 
to both of these principles put together. Usually the 
the two principles are found united. Thus, to the mind 
of the majority, the ridiculousness of attempting to 
point out the Way towards the Blessed Life did not 
consist merely in my beUeving that I could point out 
such a way, but also in my assuming that I should 
find hearers at all, and especially hearers who should 
return to a second lecture with the intention of having 
this way pointed out to them ; and, in case I should 
find such, in their beUeving that they should find here 
anything to carry away with them. 

In this supposition of the sinfulness of all men the 
majority live on; — this supposition they require every 
one to make ; and he who on the contrary rejects it, 
him they laugh at if they are in a good humour, or 
get angry with if they are irritated; — which latter is 
usually the case when they encounter such searching 
investigations into their true nature as the present has 
been. Through this supposition they thus become 
bad, profane, irreligious, and all the more so the longer 



CONCLUSION. 219 

they abide in it. On the contraly, the good and 
honest man, although he acknowledges his defects and 
unweariedly labours to amend them, yet does not es- 
teem himself as radically bad, and essentially a sinner ; 
for he who recognises himself as such in his own 
nature is thereby reconciled to it, and consequently 
is so, and remains so. Besides what is deficient in 
him, the good man also recognises what he has, and 
must recognise it, for he has to make use of it. That 
he does not give the honour to himself, is imderstood ; 
for he who still has a self, — in him assuredly there is 
nothing good. Just as little does he assume men to 
be bad, and to be miserable sinners, in his actual 
intercourse with them, whatever he may think theo- 
retically of the society around him ; but he assumes 
them on the contrary to be good. With the sinfulness 
that is in them he has nothing to do, and to that he 
does not address himself; but he addresses himself to 
the good that is assuredly in them, although it may 
be concealed. With respect to everything that ought 
not to be in them, he does not calculate upon it, and 
he acts towards them as if it were not there ; while, 
on the contrary, he calculates with confidence on 
everything that, according to existing circumstances, 
ought to be in them, as upon something that must be, 
something that is to be assumed, and from which they 
can on no account be released. For example : — should 
he teach, he will not be understood by mere Ustless 
vagrancy, but only by earnest attention; for such 
listless vagrancy ought not to be, and it is of far more 
importance that a man should learn the value of 
earnest attention, than that he should learn particular 
principles. He will not spare nor conciliate the aver- 



220 LECTURE XI. 

sion to ascertained Truth, but he will defy it; — for 
this aversion ought not to exist, and he who cannot 
suffer Truth ought not to receive it at his hands; — 
firmness of character is of far higher value than any 
positive truth, and without the former no one is cap- 
able of appropriating anything resembling the latter. 
But will he not then deUght and influence others ? 
Certainly: — but only by means of what is just and 
right, and only in the way of the Divine Order; — 
in any other way than this he will assuredly neither 
influence nor dehght them. It is a very complacent 
supposition indulged in by that majority, that there 
is many an excellent man, in art, in doctrine, or in 
hfe, who is most anxious to please them ; only that he 
does not know how to set about it rightly, because he 
is not sufficiently versed in the depths of their cha- 
racter, and that therefore they must tell him how 
they would wish to have it done. What if he under- 
stood them infinitely more deeply than they themselves 
shall ever be able to do, but did not desire to make 
this his knowledge apparent in his intercourse with 
them, only because he cared not to hve after their 
fashion, and would not accommodate himself to them 
until they themselves had first become pure in his 
sight ? 

And thus, with the deUneation of what we usually 
see around us in this Age, I have also pointed out the 
means by which we may rise superior to it, and sepa- 
rate ourselves from it. Let a man only not be ashamed 
of being wise, even if he alone be wise in a world of 
fools ! As to their ridicule : — ^let him but have courage 
not to join in the laugh, but to keep his earnestness 
for a moment and look the thing in the face; — he 



CONCLUSION. 221 

shall not thereby lose his laugh, for in such cases true 
wit Ues in the background, and this belongs to us ; and 
just in so far as the good man transcends the bad, in 
so far does his wit also transcend that of the bad. As 
to their love and their approbation : — ^let him but have 
courage resolutely to cast it from him, for otherwise 
he can never obtain it without becoming bad himself; 
— and it is this alone that so cripples and weakens 
even the better men of our day, and so hinders their 
mutual recognition of each other and their imion 
among themselves, that they will not give up the 
attempt to imite two things that never can be united, 
— their own uprightness and the applause of the crowd, 
— and cannot determine to know the bad only as bad. 
If a man has once raised himself above this hope and 
this want, then he has nothing more to fear: — Life 
proceeds in its accustomed course; and though the 
world may hate, it cannot harm him; — nay, after it 
has abandoned the hope of making us like itself, its 
ill-will decreases, and it becomes more disposed to 
accept and use us as we are : — or, in the worst case, 
a good man, if he be but resolute and consistent, is 
stronger than a hundred bad men. 

And now I beUeve that I have said everything to 
you that I intended to say, — and here I close these 
lectures ; — not unconditionally desiring your approval, 
but, should it be accorded to me, then so desiring it 
that it may do honour both to you and to me. 



# 



PRINTED BY ROBHBT HARDIE <te COMPANY, 
FREDERICK STREET, EDINBURGH. 



FICHTE'S POPULAR WORKS AND LIFE. 



JUST PUBUSHED, 

I. 

In Two Volumes Post Octavo, Cloth, Price 24«. 

The Popular Works of Johaim Gk)ttlieb Fichte. 

With a Mbmoib of the Author by William Smith. 

Volume First containing — 1. Memoib op Fichtb — 2. The Vocation 
OP THE Scholar — 3. The Nature op the Scholar — 4. The Voca- 
tion OP Man. 

Volume Second containing — 1. The Characteristics op the Present 
Age — 2. The Way towards the Blessed Lipe; or. The Doctrine 
op Religion — 3. Outlines op the Doctrine op Knowledge. 



" We state Fichte's character as it is 
known and admitted by men of all parties 
among the Germans, when we say that so 
robust an intellect, a sonl so calm, so lofty, 
massive, and immoyable, has not mingled 
in philosophical discussion since the time 
of Luther. . . . Fichte^s opinions may 



be true or false; but his character as a 
thinker can be slightly valued only by such 
as know it ill; and as a man approved by 
action and suffering, in his life and in bis 
death, he ranks with a class of men who 
! were common only in better ages than onrs." 
I — ^ate of German Literaimty by T. CarJyle* 



Tkefollomng Works may he had separately: — 

TI. 

Memoir of Joliann Gk)ttlieb Fichte. 

By William Smith. Second Edition, Post Octavo, cloth boards, 
price 4s. 6d. 



'"•»... A Life of Fichte, ftill of 
nobleness and instruction, of grand pur- 
pose, tender feeling, and brave effort; 
.... the compUation of which is exe- 
cuted with great judgment and fidelity." — 
Prospective Review. 

" The material trials that Fichte encoun- 
tered in the body are lost sight of in the 



spiritual contest which he maintained with 
his own mind. The page that keeps the 
record of incidents is dignified throughout 
by the strong moral light that falls every- 
where upon it like a glory, and sweetened 
by a living episode that flows through its 
dark and bright places like a stream of 
music" — Athenceum. 



III. 

The Vocation of the Scholar. 

Translated by William Smith. Post Octavo, cloth boards, price 28. 



"'TheVocation of the Scholar* ... is 
distinguished by the same high moral tone, 
and manly, vigorous expression, which cha- 
racterize all Hchte's works in the German, 
and is nothing lost in Mr. Smith's clear, 
unembarrassed, and thoroughly English 
translation.** — Dougku JerrokTs Paper. 

*' We are glad to see this excellent trans- 
lation of one of ^e best of Fichte's works 



presented to the public in a very neat form. 
. ... No class needs an earnest and 
sincere spirit more than the literary class; 
and therefore the * Vocation of the Scholar,' 
the * Guide of the Human Race,' written in 
Fichte's most earnest, most commanding 
temper, will be welcomed in its ^glish 
dress by public writers, and be beneflcUd to 
the cause of truth.'"— Economic 






17. The If atore of the Scholar and its Manifestations. 

Translated by William Smith. Second Edition, Post Octaro^ 

cloth boards, price 3s. 6d. 

religions feeling breathes thrcmghont the 
whole."— /risA Monthly Maffozme. 

" This work must inevitehly arrest the 
attention of the sdentiflc physician, hj the 
grand spirituality of its doctrines, and the 
pure morality it teaches. .... Shall 
we be presmnptaous if we recommend these 
views to our professional brethren? or if 
we say to the enlightened, tiie ttionghtfhl, 
the serious, This— if you be true Scholars- 
is yotir Vocation ? We know not a higher 
morality than this, or more noble principles 
than these : they are fiill of truth." — British 
and foreign Medtco-Chirurgicca Bevietc. 



'* With great satisfaction we welcome this 
first English translation of an author who 
occupies the most exalted position as a 
profound and original thinker; as an ir- 
resistible orator in the cause of what he 
believed to be truth ; as a thoroughly honest 

and heroic man The appearance 

of any of his works in our language is, we 
believe, a perfect novelty .... These 
orations are admirably fitted for their pur- 
pose ; so grand is the position taken by the 
lecturer, and so irresistible their eloquence." 
— Examiner. 

" A pure and exalted morality and deep 

V. The Vocation of Man. 



Translated by William Smith. Post Octavo, cloth bds. 48. 6d. 



excites thought If it rouses you to combat 
his conclusions, it has done a good work; 
for in that very effort you are stirred to a 
consideration of points which have hither- 
to escaped your indolent acquiescence. " — 
Foreign Quarterly Review. 

" This is Fichte's most popular work, and 
is every way remarlcable. Aware that the 
great public was fully competent to grapple 
with the most arduous problems of philoso- 
phy, when lucidly stated, however it might 
shrink from the jargon of the schools, Fichte 
undertook to present his opinions in a popu- 
lar form." — A tlas. 

"It appears to us the boldest and most 
emphatic attempt that has yet been made 
to explain to man his restless and uncon- 
querable desire to win the True and the 
Eternal"— Sentinel 



" In the progress of my present work, I 
have taken a deeper glance into religion 
than ever I did before. In me the emotions 
of the heart proceed only from perfect in- 
tellectual clearness : — it cannot be but that 
the clearness I have now attained on this 
subject shall also take possession of my 
heart. " — Fichte's Correspondence. 

" ' The Vocation of Man ' is, as Fichte 
truly says, intelligible to all readers who are 
really able to understand a book at all ; and 
as the history of the mind in its various 
phases of doubt knowledge, and faith, it is 
of interest to all. Agree with Fichte, or dis- 
agree wHOi him, you cannot help being car- 
ried along by his earnestness ; you cannot 
help being struck with his subtlety and 
depth. Argument, in such a matter, we 
take to be wholly indifferent A book of this 
stamp is sure to teach you much, because it I 

VI. The Characteristics of the Present Age. 

Translated by William Smith. Post Octavo, cloth boards, 78. 

"■ He makes us think, and perhaps more 
sublimely than we have ever fbrmerly 
thought, but it is only in order that we may 
the more nobly act 

" As a majestic and most stirring utter- 
ance frt)m the Ups of the greatest German 
prophet, we trust that the book will find a 
response in many an English soul, and 
potently help to regenerate English society." 
— Critic. 

VII. The Way towards the Blessed Life; or, The Doctrine 

of Bel^^On. Translated by William Smith. Post Octavo, 

cloth boards, price 6s. 

" These Lectiu*es, conjoined with those 
which have already appeared under the 
titles of ' The Characteristics of the Present 
Age,' and ' The Nature of the Scholar,' in 
the latter of which the tone of thought that 
governs the present course is applied to a 
particular subject form a complete scheme 
of popular instruction, of which the present 
work exhibits the highest and clearest sum- 
mit; and, taken together, they are the re- 



" A noble and most notable acquisition 
to the literature of England." — Douglas Jer- 
rolds Weekly Paper. 

" We accept these lectures as a true and 
most admirable delineation of the present 
age ; and on this ground alone we should 
bestow on them our heartiest recommenda- 
tion ; but it is because they teach us how 
we may rise above the age, that we bestow 
on them our most emphatic praise. 



suit of a process of self-culture, unceasingly 
pursued during the last six or seven years 
of my life, with greater leisure and in riper 
maturity, by means of that Philosophy in 
which I have been a partaker for thirteen 
years, and which, although, I hope, it has 
changed many things in me, has never- 
theless itself suffered no change whatever 
during that -peTiod."— Author's Frefaet. 



3%, 1849. 

^»* Mr. Chapman will supply this, as well as his Catalogue of American works, 

gratis, <R> post free, on application. 



LIST OF NEW AND RECENT WORKS 

PUBLISHED BY 

JOHN CHAPMAN, 

142, STRAND, LONDON. 



Tke Nemesis of Faith. 

By J. A. Froude, M.A., Fellow of Exeter College, Oxford, 
cloth, 6s 



Post 8vo, 



" This remarkable hook is an emana> 
tion of that deep thought on the con- 
dition of man and the conventions of 
society, which is going on to a much 
greater extent, we imagine, than Par- 
uamentary or public-meeting speakers 
wot of, though it takes very various and 
even opposite directions, according to 
the circumstances, education, and re- 
ligious temperament of the thinker. . . . 

* The Nemesis of Faith' possesses 

the first requisites of a book. It has 
power, matter, and mastery of sul:tject, 
with that largeness which must arise 
from the writer's mind, and that indivi- 
dual character— those truths of detail— 
which spring from experience or obser- 
vation. The pictures of an English 
home in childhood, youth, and early 
manhood, as well as the thoughts and 
feelings of the student at Oxtord, are 
painted with feeling pervaded by a cur- 
rent of thought ; the remarlcs on tlie 
humbug of the three learned profes- 
sions, more especially on the worldliness 
of the church, are not mere declamation, 
but the outpouring of an earnest con- 
viction ; the picture of Anglican Pro- 
testantism, dead to faith, to love, and to 
almost everything but wealth-worship, 
with the statement of the ottjects that 
Newman first proposed to himself, form 
the best defence of Tractarianism that 
has appeared, though defence does not 
seem to be the ot^^ct of the author. 
The circumstances connected with the 
growth of the passion between Helen 
and Markham are not perhaps verv 
probable, bnt they are skilfully contn- 
Ted for their pnrpose; and the display 



of the pasdon itself— the recUessness tQ 
everjrthing in the woman, and the coii« 
sideration of friture consequmMi in 
the man— are portrayed with great 
sldU. As the main literary otilect is to 
display the struggles of a mind with 
the growth and grounds of opinion, in- 
cident are subordinate to the intellec- 
tual results that spring fh)m them ; but 
there is no paucity of incident if the 
work be judged by its own standard. 
The mind of the writer has not the 
poetical or mystic tenderness of New- 
man or Wilberforce. though not devoid 
of depth and feeling, and possessing 
considerable "power. Traces of a train- 
ing for the preacher are found in a pe- 
cuuar kind, of hcHlative exclamation ; 
and the general character of the com- 
position IS rhetorical— but it is the 
rhetoric of earnestness, not of empti- 
ness." — Spectator. 

" The most striking quality in Mr. 
Fronde's writing is his descriptive elo- 
quence. His characters are all living 
before us, and have no sameness. His 
quiclmess of eye is manifest equally in 
his insight into human minds, and in 

his perceptions of natural beauty 

His pages are full of beauty and inter- 
est. The fourth letter on old Paganism 
is an exquisite piece of poetry. The 
style of the letters is everv where charm- 
ing. The confessions ox a Sceptic are 
often brilliant, and always touching. 
The closing narrative is fluent, graphic, 
and only too highly wrought in painful 
he&ntf.'*— Prospective Sevtewt Mtw 1849. 

** The book becomes in its sout-bum. 
ing tmthfrdness, a quite inv«JUv«3&Nfttft.- 



\ 



fForks pvlliahed hy 



=1 



cord of the fiery struggles and tempta- 
tions through wliich uie youth of this 
nineteenth century has to force its wav 

in religious matters Especially^ is 

it a great warning and protest against 
three great falsenoods. Against self- 
deluded word orthodoxy and bibliola- 
try, setting up the Bible for a mere dead 
idol instead of a living witness to 
Christ. Against frothy pliilosophic 
Infidelity, merely changing the chaffof 
old systems for the chanof new, ad- 
dressm^ mens' intellects and ignoring 
their Hpirits. Against Tractananism, 



trying to make men all belief, as Stras- 
burghers make geese all liver, by dark- 
ness and cramminff ; xnanafactnring 
state folly as the inndel state wisdom^ 
deliberately givine the lie to God, who 
has made man in his own image, body, 
soul, and spirit, by making the two first 
decrepit for the sake of pamperine the 

last Against these tnree nUse- 

hoods, we say* does tlie book befbre us 
protest ; afterits own monmfbl Aishlon, 
most strongly when most unconscioiu- 
\Y."—Frazer'8 Mag., May, 1849. 



The Beauties of Channiiig. 

With an Essay prefixed. By William Mountford. 12mo, doth, Ss. 6d. 



" This is 
no 



really a book of beauties. 
It is no collection of shreds and 
patches, but a faithful representative 
of a mind which deserves to have its 
image reproduced in a thousand forms. 
It is such a selection from Channing as 
Channing himself might have made. 
It is as though we had the choicest 
passages of those divine discourses read 



to us by a kindred spirit Those 

who have read Martyria will feel that 
no man can be better qualified than its 
author, to bring together those passa- 
ges which are at once most characteris- 
tic, and most rich in matter tending to 
the moral and religious deration of 
human beings." — Inquirer. 



The Soul : her Sorrows and her Aspirations. 



An Essay towards the Natural History of the Soul, as the basis of Theology. 
By Francis William Newman, formerly Fellow of Baliol College, 
Oxford. Post 8vo, cloth. 

CONTENTS. 



IV. Progress of the Spirit. 
y. Hopes concerning Future lASe. 
VI. l*rospects of Chnstiamty, 



I. Contents of the Infinite without us. 
II. Sense of Sin. 
III. Sense of personal Relation to God. 

Letters to a Female Friend. 

By William von Humbolt. Translated from the German. Post 8vo, 
cloth. [/« the Press. 

Popular Christianity s its Transition State and probable Dere- 

lopment. Post 8vo, cloth. {In the Press. 

Rererberations. 

Fcp. 8vo, in paper cover. Is. \Nmo Recufy. 

DR. CHANNING'S MEMOIR. 

Memoir of Ifilliam Ellery Channing^ D.D. 

With Extracts from his Correspondence and Manuscripts. Edited by 
his Nephew, William Hknry Channing; and embellished by t?FO 
very superior Portraits of Dr. Channing, engraved on steel, from paint- 
ings by the eminent artists Allston and Gambardella. 8 vols, post 8vo., 
cloth, £1 8*. 

"This is a valuable contribution to I reached by Dr. Channing daring his 
literature. The peculiar eionMince \ \i& m^kee a history of nimselr and 



John Ohapmany 142, Strand. 



of his mind indispensable to the Aiture 
student of opinion.'*— JM^mrum. 

" It is a work of hi^h merit, and of 
deep interest.** — Examiner. 

"He had none of the narrow into- 
lerance that distinguishes the more ri- 
gid sectarians."— 6?j9ecto^or. 

"It is pleasing to add, that objections 
to the theological tenets of Dr. Chan< 
ning, do not prevent our entertaining a 
high admiration of hi§ general writ- 
ings ; but tills admiration rises to a for 
higher feeling as we study his biogra- 
phy ; for we see tliat, • singularly lofty 
as is the spirit which his writings 
breathe, he was true to them in heart 
and life :' and we find the secret of his 
eloquence in the power which elevated 
ideas and enlarged conceptions of all 
that is just, pure.tnie, grand, beautiful, 
loving, and holy, had in the transform- 
ation of his being." — Chambers' Journal. 

"The felicitous combination of a 
chaste and eloquent stvle with clear and 
powerflil reasoning, placed his writings 
before his age generally, and far before 
his age in the United States."— Tawf* 
Magazine. 

" He was a remarkable man, and he 
rendered remarkable service. Ilis men- 
tal history is deeply interesting." — 
Eclectic Review. 

" We find it difficult to tear ourselves 
from these deeply interesting volumes, 
which we are aisposed to rank among 
the best biographies of the age."— 
Christian Reformer. 

*• It is long since a piece of biography 
has issued m>m the press more fraught 



with instructi(m than are the volumes 
before us. Everjr page teems vritb. 
thought, is expressive of elevated sym- 
pathies, and brin^ us in fellowship with 
mind in some of its highest tones of cul- 
ture and experience.'*— .ffrtiwA Quar- 
terly Review. 

^'This Memoir will be read in all 
denominations ; and wherever it is read, 
must exert a most powerflil and eleva- 
ting influence.** — Inquirer. 

" There are many among us who owe 
more than they can tell to Dr. Chan- 
ning, who received fh>m him impres- 
sions never to be erased,"— Cftrwftan 
Examiner. 

"He was emphatically a Christian 
minister, in all the high meaning of that 
term. His life was eminently usefiil 
and beautifhl. He died in good season, 
leaving a memory that will long be 
blessed." — Massachussetts Quarterly Re- 
view. 

" Dr. Channing was no ordinary man, 
and it is well that a memoir of him 
should be given to the public."— 5tenrf- 
ard of Freedom. 

"We believe that the infltience of 
Channing has far exceeded the measure 
of power usually attained by moral 
writers; and we are sure that its quality 
has been as pure as its extent has been 
vast The popularity of liis writings 
is one of many signs— needed indeed to 
cheer us amid more conspicuous encou- 
ragements— that a sound and noble 
heart yet lives, and may be reached, in 
this working, weary England."— Pro- 
ipective Review. 



The Artist's larried Life : being tliat of Albert Diirer. 

For devout Disciples of the Arts, Prudent Maidens, as well as for the 
Profit and Instruction of all Christendom, given to the light. Translated 
from the German of Leopold Schefer, by Mrs. J. R. Stodart. 1 vol. 
fop. 8vo, ornamental binding, 6s. 



" It is the worthy aim of the novel- , 
ist to show that even the trialsof genius 
are part of its education— that its very 

wounds are furrows for its harvest 

No one, indeed, would have a right to 
expect from the author of the ' Laien- '■ 
brevier* (see Ath. No. 437) such a stem 
and forcible picture of old times and i 
trials as a Meinhold can give— still less \ 
the wirc-<lrawn sentimentalities of a j 
Hahn-Hahn ; but pure thoughts -higli ; 
morals — tender reelings — mi^ht be ' 

looked for The merits of this story ; 

consist in its fine purpose, and its ; 
thoughtitil, and for the most part just, , 
exposition of man's inner life. To tiiose 
who, cldcfly appreciating such oualities, | 
oan dispense witli the stimulants of. 
incident and passion, the book before us 
will not be unacceptable.**— ./i^/urtMn. 



" The work reminds ns of the happiest 

efibrts of Tieck The design 

is to show how, in spite of every obsta- 
cle, genius will manifest itself"^ to the 
world, and give shape and substance to 

its beautiful dreams and fancies 

It is a very pure and delighttul compo- 
sition, is tasteAilly produced in an anti- 
que style, and retains in the translation 
all the peculiarities (witliout wliich the 
book would lose half its merit) of Ger- 
man thought and idiom.'*— Rritannia. 

" Simply then we assure our readers 
that we have been much pleas^ with 
this work. The narrative portion is well 
concdved, and completely illustrates 
the author's moral; while it is inter- 
spersed with many passages which are 
full of beauty and pathos."— /is^usVer. 



\ 



Works published by 



Italy I past and present. 

Or, General Views of its Histokt, Kelioion, Politics, Litkratubs, 
and Art. By L. Mariotti. 2 vols, post Svo, Cloth, £1 Is. 

*«* The first of these volumes is a reprint, revised and enlarged, of f 
work pnhhshed under the same title in 1841, and now out of print. The 
second volume is altogether new, and refers solely to the preseni eolidition oi 
the country, and will be sold separately if required, price 10s. 6d. 

reader in forming a jnst estimate of the 
great events now in progress in Italy. 
pTot the least wonderftu part of the 
book is the entire mastery the anthw 
has acquired of our language." — Ex- 
aminer, JpriL 

**This important work treats the 
literature and politics of Italy tn a 
masterly manner, and will repay ten- 
fold the labour of perusal.** — DougUu 
Jerrold^t Weekly Paper. 

*'This is an exceedingly seasonable, 
intelligent, and interesting work.**— 
Dttiltf News, 

" Our author has an earnest, nay en- 
thusiastic, love and admiration of his 
native country; with the ability and 
eloquence to render his sut^Ject very 
interesting and attractive.** — J^ — = — 
AdverUter. 



** This is a useful book, informed with 
lively feeling and sound Judgment. It 
contains an exhibition of It^an views 
of matters, social and political, by an 
Italian who has learned to speak 
through English thoughts as well as 
English words. Particularly valuable 
are the sketches of recent Italian 
history; for the prominent characters 
are delineated in a cordial and sympa- 
thetic spirit, yet free fiom enthusiastic 
ideas, and with unsparing discrimina- 
tion ..... .The criticisms on " The Past'* 

will richly repay perusal; it is, how- 
ever, on *• The Present" of Italy that 
the main interest of the book resides. 
This volume does not merdy possess an 
interest similar to that of contemporary 
worlcs ; it supplies a desideratum, and 
is well adapted to aid the English 



The following notices refer to the first volume of the work : — 



'* The work is admirable, useful, in- 
structive. I am delighted to find an 
Italian coming forward with so much 
noble enthusiasm, to vindicate his 
country and obtain for it its proper 
interest in the eyes of Europe. The 

English is wonderful I never saw 

any approach to such a style in a 
foreigner before— as full of beauty in 
diction as in thought." — Sir E. Bwwer 
Lytton, Bart. 

" I recognise the rare characteristics 
of genius— a large conception of the 
topic, a picturesque diction founded on 
profound thought, and that passionate 
sensibility which becomes the subject— 
a subject bcautiflil as its climate, and 
inexhaustible as its soil."— -B. Disraeli, 
Esq., M.P. 

" A very rapid and summary resume 
of the fortunes of Italy from the fall of 
tho Roman Empire to the present 
moment. — A work of industry and 
labour, written with a good purpose. — 
A bird's-eye view of the suligect that 
will revive the recollections of the 
scholar, and seduce the tyro into a 
longer course of reading.**— Affierueum. 
••This work contains more inform- 
ation on the suliject, and more refsr- 
ences to the present position of Italy, 
than we have seen in any recent pro- 
duction.** — Foreign Quarterly Remew. 

"In reference to style, the work 



before us is altogether extraordinary, 
as that of a foreigner, and in the higher 
quality of thought we may commend 
the author for his acute, and often 
original, criticism, and his quick per- 
ception of the grand and beautiftu in 
his native literature.** — Prescott (in ffke 
North American Review.) 

** The work before us consists of a 
continuous parallel of the political and 
literary history of Italy from the earli- 
est period of the middle ages to the 
present time. The author not only 

Senetrates the inner relations of those 
ual appearances of national life, but 
possesses the power of displaying them 
to the reader with great clearness and 
effect. We remember no other work in 
which the civil conditions and literary 
achievements of a people have been 
blended in such a series of living pic- 
tures, representiufj successive periods of 
\n9,toTf.*'^Algemetne Zeiiung. 

"An earnest and eloquent work."— 
Examiner. 

**A work ranking distinctiy in the 
class of belles lettres, and well desenr- 
in^ of a library place in England."— 
Ltterary Gazette. 

** A work vrannly admired by excel- 
lent judges.**— TVwf* Magazine. 

"An admirable work written with 
great power and beauty.*'— Prof. Loag^ 
\ jeMow. (Poets onsd Poetry of Europe.) 



John Ckapnuin, 142, Strand, 



The Principles of Nature^ her Bififte Revelations^ ani a Voiee 

TO MANKIND^ By and througk Andrew Jackson Davis, the 
" Pooghkeepsie Seer," and " Clairvoyant." 2 vols, large 8vo. cloth, 

188. 






The Work consists of 800 jNiges, including a history of its produc- 
tion, with a Biographical Sketch, and Portrait (engraved on Steel) of the 
Author. 



** Taken as a whole, the worit is a 

Jrofoond and elaborate discussion of the 
'hilonphy of the Umeene, and for gran- 
deur 01 conception, soundness of prin- 
ciple, deamess of illustration, order of 
arrangement and encydopediacal range 
of suljects, I know of no work of any 
single mind that will bear away from it 
the palm. To every theme the inditing 
mind approaches with a certain latent 
consciousness of mastery of all its 
principles, details, and technicalities; 
and yet without the least ostentatious 
displayof superior mental powers."— Dr. 
Btuhf Profexwr of Hebrew in New York. 

" In whatever view the work is 
regarded, it is a very remarkable pro- 
duction, and will assuredly attract 
extensive attention here, as it already 
has in AmencA."— Morning Advertiser. 

"The book has excited so much 
interest in America, that though large, 
consisting of 800 pages, 900 copies were 
sold in one week.**— Family Herald. 



** Yi^ved as one will, the book is one 
of the most remarkable literary curi- 
osities ever heard of.**— Ma$9achiuetts 
Qaarterfy Review. 

** The main idea is skilfully sustained 
and developed, and there is a great deal 
in the book that we admire, and have 
long admired in other connexions."— 
Americeai Christian Examiner. 

*• A very wonderAil book, exhibiting 
everywhere a gigantic grasp of thought.*' 
— CrUic, 

**Let our readers distinctly under- 
stand that we do not on any supposition 
regard this book as common place, or 
easily explained. Be it fraud, delusion, 
or mixture,— be it mesmerism, or newly 
invented communication from the 
sphritual world, or downright revelation, 
be it any one of these, or anything else, 
it is very curious. As soon as the right 
name is found for it, we will be the mrst 
to call, of that name, extraordinary, — 
very extrwjrdmary.^—Atkeiueum. 



Peter Jones^ or Onward Boand. 

An Autobiography. Post 8vo, cloth. 3s. 



"The idea of the biography is to 
depict a mind rising from a condition 
of ignorance, and, by means of me- 
chamcs' institutions, and the reading of 
books in the English tongue, realismg 
for itself the relations between philoso- 
phy, science, and religion, and the 



bearing of all on theological dogmata 
and the literature of the Hebrews. 
The writer is manifestly competent to 
his task, and has accomplished it with 
uncommon ability ana considerable 
taste." — Dottglas Jerrold^s Newspaper. 



Poems. By Ralph If aldo Emerson. 

Post 8vo. 6s. cloth gilt. 



** There are in these stanzas many 
a fine image and sometimes a cluster 
of such— scattered symbols of deep sig- 
nificance—and the presence of dncere 

and earnest thinking everywhere 

A wild low music accompanies these 
artless strains ; an indistinct, uncertain 
melody — such a tune as an untaught 
musical nature might choose to itself in 
solitary places There are some- 
times stanzas which are raggestive, not 
only in a political relation, out in one 
far higher— as touching those social re- 
f(Hrms which now everywhere command 
the attention of society. Some portions 
of a series of poems entitled *Wood 
Notes,* are in their peculiar way yet 
finer; and the entire succession nas 
been eathnsiasticaUT received on the 
other side of the Atlantic."— ^««uniM. 



** There are in this volume unmistake- 
able evidences of genius; the soul of 
the poet flashes out continually ; and the 
hand of the poet is seen Q/Sten.**—CrUie. 

** He occasionally reminds us of the 
reflective depth of Wordsworth ; and 
sometimes evinces a delicate ftmcy and 
richness of epithetworthyof Tennyson." 
— Manchetter Examiner. 

*'His lines are fhll of meaning."— 
Ingnirer. 

** To read his finer pieces is to onr 
poetic feeling like receiving a succes- 
sion of electnc shocks ; . . . . even his un- 
shaped fragments are not bits of glass 
but of diamond, and have always the 
true poetic lustre. We know of no 
compositions that surpass his in their 
characteristic ezoeUenoe.*'~C%fifMem 
Examiner, 



" — iMnaum 



Works puhlisked hy 



EftdeaTMurg after the Chriitiaa Life. (First Series.) 

By Jaj«£8 Martineau. Second Edition. 12iao, It, 6ff. (dotb. 

EndeaTonrs after the Christian life. (Second Series.) 

By Jaues MARTiNEAn. lame, la. 6<f. clotli. 



" Heartily do we welcome a gecond 
Yolome of 'Endeavonrs after the 
Christian Life,' because when all that 
siiita not our taste is omitted, we have 
still left more to instruct, interest, im- 
prove, and elevate, than in almost any 
other volume with which we are ae- 

auainted 12?hatever may be its 
efects, we regard it as one of the most 
precious ^fts to the religious world in 
modem timesv" — Inqtnrer. 

**Mr. Martiaeau is knowD^ much 
beyond the limits of his own denomin- 
ation, as a man of great gifts and ac- 
complishments, and his publications 
have been aU marlced by subtle and 
vigorous thought, much beauty oL 
imagination, and certain charms of 
composition, which are sure to iind 

admirers There is a delicacy and 

ethereality of ethical sentiment in 
these discourses whidi must commend 
them, and we may sfdely say that many 



of the orthodox in all depurtmeirter 
might receive fit)m them intelleetnal 
stimulus, moral polish, and in wnne 
moods r^igious edificatioB," — Nonam- 
fortniH. 

** One of the most interestiiig, attme- 
tive, and most valuable series of essays 
which the literature of Christiaiyty has 
received from priest or laynuiA fiv 
many a year, 

** Volumes that have in them both 
intellect and true doquence, and which 
satisfy the understanding while they 
please the taste and inq)rove the heart. 

** Whoi we say that these Ditc&urgm 
are eminently praUkait we mean that 
they are adapted, not only for waaxk in 
the abstractr-to tea<^ the duties of 
Christianity evervwhere — but also with 
reference- to the oircsumstanoes of 
society— of the age and aountiy ia 
which our let is cast."— Cr»lic. 



I 



ii 



Political EeoBomj^ and the Philosophy of OoTemmeBl. 

A Series of Essays selected from the works o( M. de Sismondi. With 
an Historical Notice of his Life and "Writings by M. Mignet. Trans- 
lated firom the French, and illustrated by Extracts from an nnpublished 
Memoir, and from M. de Sismondi's private Journals and Letters, to 
which is- added a List of his Works, and a prehniinarT- Sss&y, by the 
Thmslator. 8vo. etoth, 12s. 

EooBomy have claims on ear attention 
equal to those of Sismondi. In England 
he is best known as an historian, bnt he 
is no less entitled to high reputation as 
a sound and thoughtnu expounder of I 
the socialsciences~ "..We cordially re^ . 
commend this volume, as forming a 

most pleasant introduction to thettmhr ' 
of the sciences of which it treats. It fo ! 
both valuable in its^ and peraBarly i 
well timed."~i«fcw. 

" The woric is admirably translatedv : 
It has all the vigour of original; com** 
position. The preliminary netiee hf , 
the translate* is replete with cnl^hv ' 
ened ideas. We heartily eonunend ttie 
volume to all who feel an interest in tiie 
great social and potitioal preblemi i 
which must soon be solved and adjust- ' 
ed, lest England is reduced to the state 
of Ireland."-— Dm^-Zcw Jerr»ld'» Netm. ' 

" We should like that these emiys 
should have a wide drculatioo, and 
that the tone of pure benevoleaee ■ 
which pervades them shovld I^U the 
hearts of eoM-blooded eoonendsti with ' 
tenderer feelings ef oommisenitkfli ■ 
than usually mingle with their frigid < 
eakulations. There can be no ^ei^na ' 



** In this country the views of Sismon- 
di, long derided, and long kept down^ 
have latelv achieved a signal triumph, 
and are still advancing for the amelio- 
ration of social ills The essays 

embody Sismondi's settled views on 
Political Economy, and on the true 
policy which should animate a Govern- 
ment Jifter having studied more 

deeply than most men, the science of 
Government and the ^peculations of 
Political Philosophy, he settled down 
into the ocmviction that the principles 
of Christianity we^e as appncable to 
the life of nations as to that of indivi- 
duals, and that the happiness of the 
people would be best promoted by ob- 
serving them Besides the essays 

the volume contains many curious illtis- 

trations of the Life of Sismondi 

In an ingenious preliminary essay by 
the translator, the views of Sismonai 
are applied to our social e(»dition at 
the present time. The volume is alto- 

§ ether admirably produrad, and, we 
link, is entitled to the earnest consi- 
deration ef all persons who take an 
interest in sodal polittcs."— frvAmma. 
"Few recent writers on PoliUcal 



John, Chapman, 142, Strand. 



7 



as to the evils he so powerfully- exposes 
beintf directly caused by the reckless 
appbcation of the principles he would 
entirely discard. 

" Thej will amply repay a careful 
reading, as each is a masterly discussion 
of the most prominent questions rela- 
ting to our social condition."— JWo»co». 



"A writer of first-rate ment in 
history and politics, and one whose 
sympathy with the poor and discern- 
ment of the true good of men and of 
nations must give weight to all his 
moral convictions, concerning the right 
and wrong of our t^smWa.^*— Prospective 
Hetiew. 



History of the Hebrew Monarchy^ from the Administration of 

Samuel to the Babylonish Captivity. 8vo, cloth, 10s. 6d. 

'* It is truly refreshing to find Jewish 
history treated, as in the volume before 
ns, according to the rules of sound 

criticism, and good sense The 

publication of rach a work will form 
an epoch in biblical literature in this 
country. **— Inquirer. 

"The Author has brought a very 
acute mind, familar with knowledge 
that is beyond the range of ordinary 
scholarship, to the task of combining 
and interpreting the antique and frag- 
mentary records which contain the 

Honour^ or^ the Story of the brare Caspar and the fair Annerl. 

By Clemens Brentano. With an Introduction aod a Biographical 
Notice of the Author, by T. W. AppEiJi, Translated from the German. 
Fcp. 8vo. gilt edges, 2s. 6d. 

8halis]ieare's Dramatic Art^ and his relation to Calderon and 

Translated from the German of Dr. Herhakn Ulrici. 8vo. 12s. 



only materials f<Mr his work.**— Prospec- 
tive Review, 

"This book must be regarded, we 
think, as the most valuable contribution 
ever made in the English Language to 
our means of understanding that por- 
tion of Hebrew History to which it 

relates The Author has not the 

common superstitious reverence for the 
Bible, but he shows everywhere a lai^e, 
humane, and Christian spirit."— Jifa«» 
sachuueUs Quarterly Review. 



Goethe, 
cloth. 



Outline of Contents. 



I. Sketch of the History of the Eng- 
lish Drama before Shakspeare. 
— B. Greene and Marlowe, 
n. Shakspeare's Life and Times. 
m. Shakspeare's Dramatic Style, and 
Poenc View of the World and 
Things. 

**We strongly recommend the book 
to the notice of every lover of Shaks- 
peare, for we may truly say that it is 
w^ calculated to fill up a void in our 
own as well as in German literature." — 
Wettminuter Review. 

" llie author has the ' Philosophic 
depth,* which we vainly look for in 
ScnlegeVs criticism of the great poet." 
—The Dial. 

** We welcome it as an addition to our 
books on the national dramatist— ex- 
haustive, comprehensive, and philo- 
sophical after a scholastic fashion, and 
throndng new lights upon many things 
in Shakspeare.*'— Spectetor. 

** The work of Ulrici in the original, 
has held, ever since its publication, an 
honoured place upon our shelves. We 
consider it as b^ng, when taken all in 
all, one of the most valuable contribu- 
ISons ever made to the critidsm of 
Shakspeare. The theoretical system 
upon which it rests, if not altogether 
accurate or completely exiiaustive, is. 



IV. Criticism of Shakspeare's Plays. 
V. Dramas ascribed to Shakspeare of 
doubtful Authority. 

vi. Calderon and Goethe in their rela- 
tion to Shakspeare. 



at all events, wide and searching ; its 
manner of expression is almost every- 
where clear and practical, and its 
critical expositions are ^ven with 
eanal delicacy of feeling and liveliness 

of fancy^ Here there are treated, 

successively, Shakspeare's language, 
his mode of representing characters, 

and his dramatic invention 

Our author has not only spoken 

with excellent good sense, but has 
placed one or two important points of 
Shakspeare's poetical character in a 
clearer light than that in which we are 
accustomed to regard them. Shakspeare 
is shown to be the historically-dramatic 
poet of enlightened Christianity ; and 
the hijghest value of his works consists 
in then: adequately representing, in the 
light of imagination, the CSuistian 
prospect of man's mysterious destiny.** 
— TaiFt Magazine. 

*' A gooa translation of Dr. Ulrici*s 
work on Shakspeare cannot fail of bdng 
welcome to the EngliaKU\S3Qi3»x. \\>x^ 



8 



Works publMed hf 



in fact, • Tindieation of our great poet 
from a charge which has latdy Decn 
iMDwht against him by critics on both 
sides of the Atlantic. Dr. Ubid boldlv 
claims for him the ranlL of an emi- 
nently Christian anthor The pre- 
sent work is the least German of all 
G^emnn books, and c<Mitain» remark- 
able novehy in its riews of the snhiect 
and the arrangement of its topics. The 
plan adopted W Dr. Ulrici of contem- 
plating each play in the light of a 
centnu idea is especially deserring of 
aD pndse. . ..We recommend the entire 
criticism to the perosal of the jodidoos 
reader.''— ^JAemniM. 

** Excellencies of a high order per- 
yade this performance, which, in ovr 
jodgment, entitle it to the gratefU re- 
ception of all who are dei&otts of be- 
coming better acquainted with the 

mind of Shakspeare The sketch 

of the modem dramatic art with which 
the book opens, as well as of the life of 
Shakspeare, is well drawn ; indeed, the 
histoncal sketches throoghoot are ad- 
mirably executed The author's 



Tiewis are ivgenioas, ajBd the eritidnns 
on the screnl draxnns are admiraUe, 
and win fUly rep^y the readers stndy.'' 

** We wdcome tiii» weric as « Ttim- 
aUe aeceasieii to Shakspcaiaa Htera- 
tore. It is the priadiM] of^leci of Dr. 
Ulrid's critidsms c# tne aercral plnyi, 
to trace and bring to Bght the nayam- 
mental and TiTiiyuig iden ef eadL. In 
this difficnK task we think he hna 
been eminenthr suooessftri. . . .. W^c can- 
not dismiss this Tery Talnahle woi^ 
niiich breathes a tone of jpwe and ex- 
alted morafity, derired mm n mind 
tndy rehgions, and whose holy aad 
chastening inloenoe expresses itsdf 
throeghoi^ withoet remarUiiif hew 
much we admiie thecxcdlent mnnBsr 
in which it is translated."— Jwf wij g i . 

**Ulrid's admirable ^ Shitkffpeaie'b 
Dramatic Arf has been latdy trans- 
lated with Mmsiderable skiB. We le* 
commend ttie wo^ as an additioB te 
onr higher eritical Uteratnre, and we 
rtionld like to recnr to it more fldly.*— 

CATMMM JCflMMMWIMVI^* 



The Life of Jesns^ Critieally Eiamiiied. 

By Dr. David Fsiedrich Stbavss. 3 vols. Sro. £1 16iB. elotb. 



**The extraordinary merit of this 

book Strauss's diaJectie dexterity, 

bis forensic coolness, the eren polish of 
his style, present him to us as the ac- 
complished pleader, too completely 
master of his work to feel the tempta- 
tion to unfair advantage or nnsecanly 
temper.... We can testify that the 
translat<Mr has achicTed a very tough 
work with remarkable spirit and fideli- 
ty. The author, though indeed a good 
writer, could hardly haye spoken better 
had his country and language been 
English. The work has eyidently fal- 
len mto the hands of one who has not 
only effectire command of both lan- 
guages, but a familiarity with the sub- 
ject-matter of theological criticism, and 
an initiation into its technical phraseo- 
logy.'' — Westminster mud Foreign Quar- 
terly Review, 1847. 

*• Whoever reads these volumes with- 
out any reference to the German, must 
be pleased with the easy, perspicuous, 
idiomatic, and harmonious force of the 
English style. But he will be still 
more satisned when, on turning to the 
original, he finds that the rendering 
is word for word, thought for thought, 
and sentence for sentence. In pre- 
paring so beautiful a rendering as the 
present, the difficulties can have been 
neither few nor small in the way 
of preserving, in various parts of the 
work, the exactness of the translation, 
combined with that uniform harmony 
and clearness of style* which impart 



to the volumes befbre as the air 
and 8|nrit of an eriginal. A medsst 
and kmdlr care for nis reader's esn- 
venience has indaoed the translator 
! often to supply the rendering iato Eng- 
lish of a Greek quotation, where there 
was no corresponding rendering inta 
German in the onginal. Indeed* 
Strauss may well say, as he does in the 
notice, which he writes for this En^ish 
edition, that as far as he has #fgfti»^T iyt 
it, the translation is, **et aocvrata et 
perspicua.' "—ProtpeeHne Memtw, 

** In regard to learning, acuteness, and 
sagadous coi^tures, the work resem- 
bles Niebuhr's ' History of Borne.' The 
general manner of treating the sulifect 
and arranging the chapters, sections* 
and parts of the argument, indicates 
consummate dialectical skill; while the 
style is clear, the expression direct, and 
the author's openness in referring to hde 
sources of inlormation, and sta^g tifa 
conclusions in all their simplidty, is 

candid and exemplaiy It not onW 

surpasses all its predecessors of its ^iid 
in learning, acuteness, and thorough in- 
vestigation, but it is marked by a serioas 
and earnestsj;>irit.*'— CAmfMmfjroMMMr. 

*' I found m M. Strauss a yonng man 
fUl of candour, gentlene88,.and modesty 
—one possessed of a soul that was u- 
most mysterious, and, as it were, sad- 
dened by the reputation he had nlned. 
He scarcely seems to be the anfliar of 
thework under consideration.'*— ~ ' 
JRevne de$ JtfimiiM. 






John ChapTtum, 142, Strand, 



The Dmiiias of IpUgenia in Tanris^ and Torqiiato Tasso^ of 

Goethe; and the MAID OF ORLEANS, of ScmiiLER. Translated, 
(omitting some passages,) with Introductory Remarks, by Anna Swanwick. 
8vo, cloth; 6s. 

are very beautlftd ; and while they will 
serve to make the mere English reader 
acquainted with two of the most perfect 
works eyer written, the Iphigema and 
the Tasso, they will form useral assist- 
ants to those who are commencing the 
study of the German language."— Fo- 
reign Qvarterly Review, 

'* This English version presents these 
poems to us in a garb not unworthy of 
the conceptions of their authors." — 
Morning Chromole, 

"The verse is smooth and harmo- 
nious, and no one acquainted with the 
original can fail to be struck with its 
great fidelity and accuracy."— CArtMtan 
Teacher, 



** It is seldom that we meet with a 
translator so competent as the lady 
who has here rendered these selections 
from the two great poets of Germany 
into elegant and vigorous English verse. 
The *Iphigenia' of GK)ethe has been 
already well done by Mr. William Tay- 
lor, of Norwich ; but his version is not, 
by many degrees, so readable as the 
one before us." — Athenaum. 

** We have to congratulate the trans- 
lator on perfect success in a very diffi- 
cult taskr—DtMin Universtiy Mageunne. 

"The translator has gone to her 
beautifiil task in the right spirit, ad- 
hering with fidelity to the words of the 
original, and evidently penetrating the 
mind of the poet. The translations 



Channing's Iforks^ Complete. 

Edited by Joseph Barker. In 6 vols. 12mo. 6s. sewed, 8s. cloth. 

A Retrospect of the Religions Life of England 3 

Or, the Church, Puritanism, and Free Inquiry. By John James Tatler, 
B.A. Post 8vo. lOs 6d. cloth. 



*' The work is written in a chastely 
beautiful style, manifests extensive 
reading and careftd research; is fVdl 
of thought, and decidedly original in 
its character. It is marked also by 
the modesty which usu^y characterises 
true merit.!' — Inquirer. 

" Mr. Tayler is actuated bv no sec- 
tarian bias, and we heat tily thank him 
for this addition to our rehgious litera- 
ture." — WeHmimter Review. 

** It is not often our good fortune to 
meet with a book so well conceived, 
so well written, and so instructive as 
this. Thevarious phases of the national 
mind, described with the clearness and 
force of Mr.Tavler.ftimish an inexhaust- 
ible material for reflection. Mr. Tayler 
regards all parties in turn from an equita- 
ble point of view, is tolerant towards in- \ 
tolerance, and admires zeal and excuses i 

The Elements of Indiyidnalisni, 



fanaticism, wherever he sees honesty. 
Nay, he openly asserts that the religion 
of mere reason is not the religion to 
produce a practical effect on a people ; 
and therefore regards his own class 
only as one element in a better possible 
church. The clear and comprehen- 
sive grasp with which he marshals his 
facts, is even less admirable than the 
impartiality, nay, more than that, the 

Seneral kindliness with which he re- 
ects upon them." — Examiner. 
" Tlie writer of this volume has 
all the calmness belonging to one who 
feels himself not mixed up vdth the 
struggle he describes. There is about 
it a toae of great moderation and can- 
dour : and we cannot but feel confident 
that we have here, at least, the product 
of a thoroughly honest mmd."— Lowe's 
Edinburgh Magazine. 



By William Maccall. Post 8vo, Is. ed. cloth. 



"It is a book wortliy of perusal. | 
Even those who can find no sympathy ! 
with its pliilosophy, will derive plea- | 
sure and improvement irom the many 
exquisite touches of feeling, and tlie 
many pictures of beauty which mark 
its pages. 

"The expansive philosophy, the pene- 
trative intellect, and the general 
humanity of the author, have rendered 



The Elements of Individttalism a book ol 
strong and general interest." — Critic. 
" We have been singularly interested 

by this book Here is a speaker and 

thinker whom we may securely feel to 
be a lover of truth, exhibiting in his 
work a form and temper of mmd very 
rare and peculiar in our time."— 3/an- 
diester Examiner. 



\ 



10 



VorkB published ly 



A SlsMiirM •f Matters pertaining to Religioli. 

By Theodore Fabker. Poet 8yo. 7s. cloth. 

CONTENTS: 



It 

'I 



Book 4.— The Belstion <tf the Religioiu 
Sentiment to the Greatest of Books ; 
or, a Discourse of the Bible. 

Book 5.— The Belation of the Religioas 
Sentiment to the Greatest of Human 
InstitiitionA ; or» a Discourse of the 
Church. 



Book 1.— Of Beligion in General ; or, 

a Discourse of uie Sentiment and its 

Manifestations. 
Book 2.— The Belation of the Beligions 

Sentiment to God; or, a Discourse 

of Inspiration. 
Book 3.— The £eUti(m of the Beligious 

Sentiment to Jesus of Nazareth; or, 

a Discourse of Christianity. 

" Mr. Parker is a yery original writer. 
We recommend the work to our readers 
as one of a very remarkable kind, which 
cannot fairly be judged of by detached 
extracts."— i^tftnSuTA'A Review^ October^ 
1847. 

*' Parker writes like a Hebrew 
prophet, enriched by the ripest culture 

of the modem world His loftiest 

theories come thundering down into 
life with a rapidity and directness of 
aim which, wmle tney alarm the timid 
and amaze the insincere, afford proof 
that he is less eager to be a reformer 
of men's thinking, than a thinker for 
their reformation. Whatever judgment 
the reader may pronounce on the philo- 
sophy of the volume, he will close it, we 
venture to affirm, with the consciousness 
that lie leaves the presence of a truly 
great mind ; of one who is not only un- 
opiH'essed by his large store of learning, 
but seems absolutely to require a mas- 
sive weight of knowledge to resist and 
regulate the native force of his thought, 
and occupy the grasp of his imagina- 
tion." — Westminster and Foreign Quar- 
terly RemeWt 1847. 

"There is a mastery shown over 
every element of the Great Sulject, 
and the slight treatment of it in parts 
no reader can help attributing to the 
plan of the work, rather than to the 
incapacity of the author. From the 
resources of a mind singularly exube- 
rant by nature and labonously enriched 
by culture, a system of results is here 
thrown up, and spread out in luminous 
exposition."— Prospecfe'tre Review. 

" Mr. Parker is no ephemeral teacher. 
His aspirations for the future 

The Life of lieliael Serretns. 

By W. H. Drummond, D.D. 12mo. cloth SU. ^ 

Historical Slietelies of tlie Old Painters. 

By the Author of the " Log Cabin." 28. 6d. paper cover ; 3s. cloth. 

Channing's Works^ Complete. (Hedderwick^s Edition.) 

6 vols, post 8vo. reduced to £\. Is. cloth. (Uniform with the Memoirs.) 

Ireland^ and her Famine. 

A Discourse. By James M.XBTHfr&x'G. Umo. 6d. 



are not less glowing than his estimate 
for the i)ast. He revels in warm anti- 
cipations of the orient splendours, of 
which all past systems are but the pre- 
cursors His language is neither 

narrow nor unattractive ; there is a 
consistency and boldness about it which 
will strike upon chords which, when 
they do vibrate, will make the ears 
more than tingle. We are living in 
an age which deals in broad and ex- 
haustive theories ; which requires a 
system that will account for everything^ 
and assigns to every fact a place, 
and that no forced one, in the vast 
economy of things. Whatever defects 
Mr. Parker's view mav have, it meets 
these requisites. It is large enough^ 
and promising enough ; it is not afraid 
of historv. It puts forth claims ; it is 
an articulately speaking voice. It deals 
neither in compromise n(»: abatement. 
It demands a hearing ; it speaks with 
authority. It has a complete and de- 
termined aspect. It is dencient neither 
in candour nor promises; and what> 
ever comes forward in this way will 
certainly find hearers."— CArtf^um Re- 
memhrancer. 

" It is impossible for any one to read I 
the writings of Theodore Parker with- I 
out being strongly impressed by them, i 
They abound in passages of fervid elo- 
quence—eloquence as remarkable for 
the truth of feeling wliich directs it, as < 
for the genius b^ which it is inspired, i | 
They are diifitingmshed by phUoso^cal 
thought and learned investigation, no 
less than by the sensibility to beauty 
and goodness which they manifest.**— 
Christian Reformer. 



John Chapman^ 142, Strand, 



11 



The BiUe and t]ie CUli. 

A Discourse on Beligious Education. By James Mabtineau. l2mo. 6d. 

Hymns for tke Christian Church and Home. 

Edited by James Martinbait. Sixth Edition, 12mo. Ss. 6d. cloth. 

The Education of Taste. * 

A Series of Lectures. By William Maccall. jl2mo. 28. 6d. 

The Agents of Cirilization. 

A Series of Lectures. By William Maccall. 12mo. 3s. 6d. cloth. 

Lectures to Young len. 

On the Cultivation of the Mind,the Formation of Character, and the Con- 
duct of Life. By George T^-. Burnap. Eoyal 8ro. 9d. 



" This, we can foresee, is destined to 
become a household book* and it is a 
long time since we met with any work 
better deserving of such distinction. 



We do not know of any work on the 
same subj^^ of equal excellence, and 
those of our readers who are wise will 
buy and study \X"—The Apprentice. 



Lectures on the Memory of the Just ^ 

Being a' Series of Discourses in the Lives and Times of the Ministers of Mill 
Hill Chapel, Leeds. By Kev. C. Wickstead. Second Edition, 8vo. cloth, 

An Inquiry concerning the Origin of Christianity. 

^ By Charles C. Hennell. Second Edition, 8vo. 12s. cloth. 

Christian Theism. 

By the Author of "An Inquiry concerning the Origin of Christianity." 8yo. 
2s. 6d. cloth. 

The Life of the Rer. Joseph Blanco White. 

Written by Himself. With Portions of his Correspondence. Edited by 
John Hamilton Thom. 3 vols, post 8vo. £1 4s. cloth. 

*' This is a book which rivets the at- 
tention, and makes the heart bleed. It 
has, indeed, with regajnd to himself, in 
its substance, though not in its ar- 
rangement, an almost dramatic cha- 
racter ; so clearly and strongly is the 
living, thinking, active man projected 
firom the face of the records which he 
has left. 

" His spirit was a battle-field, upon 
which, with fluctuating fortune and sin- 
gular intensity, the powers of belief and 
scepticism waged, m>m first to last, their 
unceasing war; and within the com- 
pass of his experience are presented to 
our view most of the great moral and 
spiritual problems that attach to the 
condition of our race."— Gwarter/y Rev. 

" This book will improve his (Blanco 
White's) reputation. There is much in 

Luther Reriyed. 

Or, a Short Account of Johannes Ronge, the Bold Befbrmer of the Catholic 
Church in Germany. By A. Andresen. 8vo. Is. 

Scenes and Characters^ Illustratiig Christian Truth. 

Edited by the Rev. H. Wabe. 2 vols. I8mo. cloth. Reduced to 58. 



the peculiar construction of his mind, 
in its close union of the moral with the 
intellectual faculties, and in its restless 
desire for truth, which may remind the 
reader of Doctor Arnold." — Examiner. 

" There is a depth and force in this 
book which tells.** — Christian Remem- 
brancer. 

"These volumes have an interest 
beyond the character of Blanco White. 
And beside the intrinsic interest of his 
self-portraiture, whose character is indi- 
cated in some of our extracts, the corre- 
spondence,in theletters of Lord Holland, 
Southey, Coleridge, Channing, Norton, 
Mill, ftofessor Powell, Dr. Hawkins, 
and other names of celebrity, has con- 
siderable attractions in itself, without 
any relation to the biographical purpose 
with whichitwas published."— 5p«eto<or. 



^ 



12 



WorTcB published by 



lemoirs •f the Life of the Ber. lant CtrpeiiiiV; LLB. 5 

With Selections from his COTTespondence. £dited bf his Sob, Bumbe!.!. 
Lant Cajrpenteb, B. A. With a portrait. 8yo. 13s. cloth. 

The Log Cabin j or the Vorld before yon. 

By the Author of ** Three Experiments of Liying," ** Sketches of the Old 
Painters.'* &c. Is. 6d: paper cover ; 2s. cloth ; 2s. 6d. extra ck^, ^It edges. 

Stories for Sanday Afternoons. 

From the Creation to the Adyent of the Messiali. For the use of C^iildien 
from 5 to II years of age. By Mrs. George Dawsok, (late Miss Susan 
Fannt Crompton.) I6mo, Is. 6d. cloth. 



// 



*' This is a yery pleasing little yolume, 
which we can confidently recommend. 
It is designed and admirably adapted 
for the use of children frx>m five to 
eleven years of age. It purposes to 
infuse into that tender age some ac- 
quaintance with the facts, and taste 
ror the study of the Old Testament. 
The style is simple, easy, and fw the 



most part correct. The stories are 
told in a spirited and graphic maimer. 
" Those who are engaged in teaching 
the young, and in laying the founda- 
tion of good character bv early reli- 
nous and moral impresuons, will be 
thankfkd for additional resources of a 
kind so judicious as this yolume."'-- 
Inquirer. 



latins and Vespers s 

With Hymns, and Occasional Devotional Pieces. By John Boirsmo. 
Third Edition, I8mo. cloth, reduced to 2s. 6d. 



ness and charm in many of the pie^^ 
which compose the volume that m^ 
lead a person who has once looked i^^ 
it to wish again and again to recuJr^ 
it."— C*rM«ion Examiner. ' ^ 



" This book is a little ^em in its way. 
Of the beautiful devotional poetry it 
contains we need not speak ; it is 
familiar to the lips and to uie hearts of 
multitudes. There is a peculiar sweet- 

Sl^etehes of Married Life. 

By Mrs. Foiii.£N. Royal 8vo. Is. 4d. 

The Complete Worlis of the Re?. Orrille Dewey^ D,9. 

8vo. 78. 6d. cloth. 

The Antobiojp'aphy and Justification of J. Ronge. 

Translated from the German, Fifth Edition, by J. Lord, A.M. Fcp. 
8vo. Is. 

*• A plain, straightforward, and manly I career of this remarkable man." Wert- 

statement of facts connected with the | inhuier Review. 

Christianity : the Delirerance of the Sonl^ and its Life. 

By WiiiiiiAM MouNTFORD, M. A. Fcp 8vo, cloth ; 28. 

lartyria t a Legend. 

Wherein are contained Homilies, Conversations, and Incidents of the Befgn 
of Edward the Sixth. Written by Wili^iam MouifTTFORD, Clerk. Fcp. 8vo. 
cloth; 6s. 

The Sick Chamber : a lannal for Nurses. 

18mo. Is. cloth. 

"A small but sensible and useful 
treatise, which might be fittingbr en- 
titled the Sick Koom Manual. It is a 
brief outline of the necessary cares 

^at is Religion I The ftnestion Answered. 

By Henry Colman. Fcp 8vo ; Is. 6d. cloth. 

Lirermore's Commentary on the Four fiospels. 

8yo. 4b. 6d. cloth. 



and precautions which the chamber of 
an invalid requires, but which even 
quick- sighted affection does not always 
divine."— J<to*. 



John Chapman, 142^ Strand. tS 



Two Orations against tal&ing awqr Inmatt Lift^ nder any 

CirciimBtaiices ; and In explanation and defbnce of tiie misrepresented doc- 
trine of Non-resistance. Bv TfiOMAi CooVBRt Author of " The Fargatory 
of Suicides." Foet 8yo. Is. m paper oorer. 



<( 



Mr. Cooper possesses undeniable 
abilities of no mean order, and moral 
courage beyond many The man- 
liness with which he arows, and the 
boldness and zeal with which he nrges, 
the doctrines of peace and love, respect 
for human rights, and moral power, 
in these lectures, are worthy of all 
honour." — Nonconformut. 

*' Mr. Cooper's style is intensely clear 
and forcible, and displays great 
earnestness and fine human sympathy ; 



it is in tiie hlc^iest degree manly, plain, 
and Tigoroos. — Morning Adver^*er. 

" These two orations are thorouffhlv 
imbued with the peace doctrines wnich 
hare lately been making rapid progicw 
in many unexpected quarters. ToaU 
who take an interest in that great 
movement, we would reccnnmena this 
book, on account of the fervid do* 
quence and earnest trothftilness whidi 
pervades every line of it,"— M(mehe$ter 
Examiner. 



The Trutk Seeker in Literature^ Pliilosopliy^ and Reli^on. 

Devoted to free and Cath(^c enquiry, and to theTranscendental and Spirit- 
ual Fhilosophy of the Age. New Series, Published Quarterly, Frice 2a. 

The Prospectife Reilew. 

A Quarterly Journal of Theology and Literature. 

RespicCj Aspice, Prospice. — St. Bernard, 

** The pROSPEcnvB Betiew is devoted to a free Theologt, and the moral 
aspects of Literature. Under the conviction that lingering influences from the 
doctrine of verbal inspiration are not only depriving the primitive records of the 
Gospel of their true interpretation, but even destroying faith in Christianity it- 
self, the Work is conducted in the confidence that only a living mind and heart, 
not in bondage to any letter, can receive the living nnri^ of Beveiation ; and in the 
fervent belief that for all such ffiere w a true Gospel of God, which ne critical or 
historical speculation can discredit or destroy. It aims to interpret and repesent 
Spiritual Christianity, in its character of the Universal Religion. Fully adopthig 
the sentiment of Coleridge, that * the exercise of the reas(«ing and reflective 
powers, increasing insight, and enlarging views, are requisite to keep aHve the 
substantial faith of the heart.' — ^with a grateful apjpredation of the labours of 
faithful predecessors of all Churches,— it esteems it the part of a true reverence 
not to rest in their conclusions, but to think and live in their spirit. By the name 
* Prospective Beview,' it is intended to lay no claim to Discovery, but simply 
to express the desire and the attitude of Progress ; to suggest continually the Duty 
of using Past and Present as a trust for the Future ; and openly to disown the 
idolatrous Conservatism, of whatever sect, which makes Christianity but a lifeless 
formula." — Extract firom the Frotpectus. 

No. XVII. was published on the Ist of February, 1849. Price 2s. 6d. 

Works for Beview to be sent to the Publish^ or Editors ; Advertis^nents in 
all cases to the Publisher. 

The Eiidences of the Genuineness of the Gospels. 

By Andrews Norton, Professor of Sacred Literature, Harvard University, 
Massachusetts. 2 vols. 8vo. JSl cloth. 

*«* There are about fifty pages of new matter in the first volume, and this 
edition of the work embodies throughout various alterations and corrections 
made by the author at the present time. 

The Work consists of three Parts, as follows :— 

PABT I. 

Proof that the Gospels remain Essentlaxlt the same as they were 

originai.lt Composed 

PABT II. 

IhsTORicAii Evidence that the Gospels have been Ascribed to their 

True Authors. 

PABT in. 

On the Evidences for the Genuineness of the Gospels afforded by 

the Early Heretics. 



14 



TToth pulluhed by 



The very ooploiu Notes appended to eaoh ydame constitiite about half t&e 
amount of the entire work, the principal subjects of which are as fi^ows }^ 

CONTSNTS OF THE NOTES. 



Note I.— Fnrther remarks on the 
present state of the Text of the Gos- 
pels. 

NoTfi II.— Various readings of the 
copies of the gospels extant in the time 
of Origen, which are particularly 
noticed by him. 

Note III— Undisputedlnterpolations 
in Manuscripts of the Gospels. 

Note IV.— On the Oriemof the Cor- 
respondences among the first three 
Gospels. 

Note V.— Justin Martyi's Quota- 
tions. 

Note VI.— On the Writings ascribed 
to Apostolical Fathers. 

Note VII.— On the Statue which is 
said by Justin Martyr, and others, to 
have been erected at Bome to Simon 
Magus. 



Note Vltl.— On the Clementine 
Homilies. 

Note IX— On the false Charges 
brought against the Heretics, parti- 
cularly by the later Fathers. 

Note X.— On the Jewish Dispensar 
tion, Pentateuch, and the other bools 
of the Old Testament. 

Note XI.- On the Distinction made 
by the Ancients between Things Intel- 
ligible and Things Sensible ; on the use 
of the Terms Spfritualand Material, as 
applied to their Specnlations ; and on 
the nature of Matter. 

Note XII.— On Basilides and the 
Basilidians. 

Note XIII.— Onthe Gospel of Mar- 
cion. 

Note XIV.— On the use of words 
©EOS and DEUS. 



NOTICES OF THE WORK. 



"Professor Norton has devoted a 
whole volume Aill of ingenious reason- 
ing and solid learning, to show that the 
Gnostic sects of the second century ad- 
mitted in general the same sacred books 
with the orthodox Christians. How- 
ever doubtful may be his complete suc- 
cess, he has made out a strong case, 
which, as far as it goe^ is one of the 
most valuable confutations of the ex- 
treme German vw^t^oyrff, an excellent 
subsidiary contribution to the proof of 
the * genuineness of the Scriptures.' * * * 
His work on the Genuineness of the 
Scriptures is of a high intellectual 
order." — Quarterly Eeview, March, 1846. 

" This (the 2nd and 3rd volumes) is a 
great work upon the philosophy of the 
early history of our faith, and upon the 
relations of that faith with the religious 
systems and the speculative opinions 
which then formed the belief or engaged 
the attention of the whole civilized 
world. Tlie subject is one of vast com- 
pass and great importance; and for- 
tunately it has been examined with 
much thoroughness, cautioil, and inde- 
pendence. The conclusions arrived at 
are those of one who thinks for himself, 
—not created by earlv prepossessions, 
nor restricted within the narrow limits 
of opinions peculiar to any school or 
sect. The originality and good sense of 
Mr. Norton's general remarlts impress 
the reader quite as strongly as the accu- 
racy of his scholarship, and the wide 
range of learning with which the subject 
is ulustrated. His mind is neither 
cumbered nor confhsed by the rich store 
of its acquisitions, but worlds with the I 
greatest clearness and effect wben en- \ 



gaged in the most discursive and tst- 
reaching investigations. Nearly the 
whole of the work, as the German 
would say. belongs to the history of 
*pure reason.' The originality of Mr. 
Norton's views is one of their most 
striking characteristics. He does not 
deem it necessary, as too many theo- 
logians have done, to defend the records 
or his faith by stratagem. The conse- 
quence is, that his work is one of the 
most unanswerable books that ever was 
written. It comes as near to d«non« 
stration as the nature of moral reaaoo- 
ing will admit. 

" As an almost unrivalled m<miiment 
of patience and industry, of ripe' scho- 
larship, thorough research, eminent 
ability, and conscientious devotion to 
the cause of truth, the work may well 
claim respectfal consideration. The 
reasonings 19 eminently clear, simple, 
and direct ; and abounds with the re- 
sults of the most profound learning." — 
North American Review. 

" The first volume of this work was 
published so long ago as the year 1837. 
At the close of it the author announces 
his intention to pursue the argument, 
by inquiring into the evidence to be 
derived from the -testimony of the 
difierent heretical Sects. It is to this 
part of the sul^ject that the second and 
third volumes, now before us, are 
directed,— which are evidently the 
fruit of much labour, research, and 
extensive reading ; and contsin a 
variety of very curious incidental mat- 
tor, highly interesting to the student of 
ecclesiastical history, and of the human 
mind." — Piotpeciive Review, 



John Ohapmcm^ 142, Strand. 15 



€\)t Catfeolir ^txits.* 



The Publisher of "The Catholic Series" intends it to 
consist of Works of a liberal and comprehensive character, 
judiciously selected, embracing various departments of literature. 

An attempt has been made by the Church of Rome to realize 
the idea of Catholicism — at least in form — and with but a 
partial success; an attempt will now be made to restore 
the word Catholic to its primitive significance, in its appli- 
cation to this Series, and to realize the idea of Catholicism 
in SPIKIT. 

It cannot be hoped that each volume of the Series will be 
essentially Catholic, and not partial, in its nature, for 
nearly aU men are partial; — ^the many-sided and mpartial, 
or truly Catholic man, has ever been the rare exception 
to his race. Catholicity may be expected in the Series, 
not in every volume composing it. 

An endeavour will be made to present to the Public 
a class of books of an interesting and thoughtful nature, 
and the authors of those of the Series which may be of a 
philosophical character will probably possess little in com- 
mon, except a love of intellectual freedom and a faith in 
human progress; they will be united rather by sympathy of 
SPIKIT than by agreement in speculation. 

* For list of Works already published in the series, see pages 17 to 24. 



1 



16 Worh% published 6y 



CHABAOTEBXZATZOK OF THE CATBOLZO SERIES 

BY THE PBESS. 



" The various works composing the " Catholic Series,'* should be known to 
all lovers of literature, and may be recommended as calculated to instruct and 
elevate by the proposition of noble aims and the inculcation of noble truths, 
furnishing reflective and cultivated minds with more wholesome food than the 
nauseous trash which the popular tale-writers of the day set before their 
readers." — Morning Chronicle, 

''Too much encouragement cannot be given to enterprising publications 
like the present. They are directly in the teeth of popular prejudice and 
popular trash. They are addressed to the higher class of readers — those who 
thmk as well as read. They are works at which ordinary publishers shudder 
as ' unsaleable/ but which are really capable of finding a very large public." 
— Foreign Quarterly. 

" The works already published embrace a great variety of subjects, and 
display a great variety of talent. They are not exclusivdy nor even chiefly 
religious ; and they are from the pens of German, French, American, as well 
as English authors. Without reference to the opinion which they contain, we 
may safely say that they are generally such as all men of free and philoso- 
phical minds would do well to know and ponder." — Nonconformist. 

" 'lids series deserves attention, both for what it has already given, and for 
what it promises." — Taifs 3Iagazine. 

" A series not intended to represent or maintain a form of opinion, but to 
bring together some of the works which do honour to our conmion nature, 
by the genius they display, or by their ennobling tendency and lofty aspira- 
tions." — Inquirer. 

" It is highly creditable to Mr. Chapman to find his name in connexion 
with so touch well-directed enterprise in the cause of German literJkure and 
philosophy. He is the first publisher who seems to have proposed to himself 
the worthy object of introducing the English reader to the philosophic mind 
of Germany, uninfluenced by the tradesman's distrust of the marketable nature 
of the article. It is a very praiseworthy ambition ; and we trust the public 
will justify his confidence. Nothing could be more unworthy than the at- 
tempt to discourage, and indeed punish, such imselfish enterprise, by attaching 
a bad reputation for orthodoxy to every thing connected with German philo- 
sophy and theology. This is especially unworthy in the 'student,* or the 
* scholar,' to borrow Fichte's names, who should disdain to set themselves the 
task of exciting, by their friction, a popular prejudice and clamour on matters 
on which the populace are no competent judges, and have, indeed, no judgment 
of their own, — and who should feel, as men themselves devoted to thought, 
that what makes a good book is not that it should gain its reader's acquiescence, 
but that it should multiply his mental experience ; that it should acquaint him 
with the ideas which philosophers and scholars, reared by a training difierent 
from their own, have laboriously reached and devoutly entertain ; that, in a 
word, it should enlarge his materials and his sympathies as a man and a 
thinker." — Prospective Beview. 

"A series of serious and manly publications." — Economist. 



John Chwpmtm^ 142, Strand, 



17 



'E'bz ®ai|^oltc <Sfr{fj». 



lemtir of Johann Gottlieb Fichte. 

By William Smith. Second edition, enlarged. Poet 8yo. cloth, 48. 6d 



" A Life of Fichte, ftaU of 

nobleness and instruction, of grand 
purpose, tender feeling, and brave effort ; 
the compilation of which is exe- 
cuted with great Judgment and fideli- 
ty.'* — Protpective Review. 

** The material trials that Fichte en- 
countered in the body are lost sight of 
in the spiritual contest which he main- 
tained with his own mind. The page 
that keeps the record of incidents is 
dignified throughout by the strong 
moral light that falls everywhere upon 
it, like a glory, and sweetened by a 
living episode that flows through its 
dark and bright places like a stream of 
music." — A&eruettm. 

The Vocation of the Scholar. 



** We state Fichte's character as it is 
known and admitted by men of all 
puties amonff the Germans, when we 
say that so robust an intellect, a soul so 
calm, so lofty, massive, and immove- 
able, has not mingled in philosohpioal 
dtecussion since the time of Luther... 

Fichte's opinions may be true 

or false ; but his character as a tliinker 
can be slightly valued only by such as 
know it ill ; and as a man, approved by 
action and suffering, in his me and in 
his deatfi, he ranks with a class of men 
who were common only in better ages 
than ours.**— 5tote of German Literal 
turct by Thomcu CarU/le. 



By Johann Gottlieb Fichte. Translated from the German, by William 
Smith. Post 8vo. cloth, 2s. ; paper cover. Is. 6d. 



•• • The Vocation of the Scholar* .... is 
distinguished by the same high moral 
tone, and manl^, vigorous expression 
which characterize ful Fichte's works 
in the German, and is nothing lost in 
Mr. Smith's clear, unembarrassed, and 
thoroughly English translation. " — 
Dougku JerroltFt Newtpaper, 

"We are glad to see this excellent 
translation of one of the best of 



Fichte's works nresented to the public 

in a very neat form IS'o class needs 

an earnest and sincere spirit more than 
the literary class; and, therefore the 
•Vocation of the Scholar,' the * Guide 
of the Human Bace,' written in Fichte's 
most earnest, most commanding tem- 
per, will be welcomed in its English 
dress by public writers, and be benefi- 
cial to the cause of truth."— fcononm^. 



On the Nature of the Scholar^ and its lanifestations. 

By Johann Gottlieb Fichte. Translated from the German by Wil- 
liam Smith. Second Edition. Post 8vo. cloth, 3s. 6d. 

" With great satisfaction we welcome 
this first English translation of an 
author who occupies the most exalted 
position as a profound and original 
thinker; as an irresistible orator in the 
cause of what he believed to be truth ; 
as a thoroughly honest and heroic man. 

liie appearance of any of bis 

works in our language is, we believe, a 

perfect novelty These orations 

are admirably fitted for their purpose ; 
so grand is the position taken by the 
lecturer, and so irresistible their elo- 
quence." — Examiner. 

" A pure and exalted morality and 
deep religious feeling breathes throng- 

The Vocation of Ian. 

By Johanh Gottlieb Fichte. Translated fltun the German, by Wu.- 
uam Smith. Post 8vo, cloth, 4fl. 6d. 



out the whole."— /mA Monthfy Mag- 
azine. 

''This work must inevitably arrest the 
attention of the scientific physician, by 
the grand spirituality of its doctrines, 

and the pure morality it teaches 

Shall we be presumptuous if we recom- 
mend these views to our professional 
brethren ? <»: if we say to the cnliffh- 
tened, the thoufrhtfril. the serious. This 
—if you be true Scholars— is jr<mr 
Vocation ? We know not a higher mo- 
rality than this, or more noble principles 
than these : they are ftiU of truth."— 
British and Foreign MedieO'Chirurgical 
Review. 



** In the progress of mj present wortc, 
I have taken a deeper slanoe into re- 
Ugion than ever I did Defiire. In me 



the emotions of the heart proceed only 
fi^om perfect inteUeotnaldleanieaa ;— n 
cannot be bat that the deamess I have 



^ 



1 8 fForks published by 



THE CATHOLIC SERIES — {contlHUed,) 

now attained on this subject shall also work ; for in that very effort you are 
take possesaion of my Iieart.'*— FtcWc** stirred to a consideration of points 
Correspondence. ■ which have hitlierto escaped your In- 

"*TiiE Vocation of Man' is, as ' dolent acquiescence." — Foreign Quar- 
Fichte truly says, intelligible to all . terl^. 

readers who are really able to uu- i " i'his is Ficlite's most popular work, 
derstand a book at all ; and as the his- \ and is every way remarkable.*'— J</(m. 
tory of the mind in its various phaties of "It appears to us the boldest and 
doubt, knowledge, and faith, it is of most emphatic attempt that has yet 
interest to all. A book of this stamp is been maae to explain to man his rest- 
sure to teach you much, because it ex- less and unconquerable desire to win 
cites thought. If it rouses you to com- the True and the £ternaL" — Sentinel. 
bat his conclusions, it has done a good 

The Characteristics of the Present Age. 

By JoiiANN Gottlieb Fichte. Translated from the German, by William 
Smith. Tost 8vo. cloth, 7s. 

"A noble and most notable acquisi* j "He makes us think, and perhaps 
tion to tlie literature of England.'*— 
Dougftu JerrolfPg IVeeMy Paper. 

** We accept tliese lectures as a true 
and most admirable delineation of the 
present age ; and on this ground alone 
we should bestow on them our heartiest 
recommendation ; but it is because they 
teach us how we may rise above the age 
that we bestow on them our most 
emphatic praise. 



more sublimely than we have ever for- 
merly thought, but it is only in order 
that we may the more nobly act. 

"As a msjestic and most stirring 
utterance from the lips of the greatest 
German prophet, we trust that the 
book will find a response in many an 
English soul, and notently help to re- 
generate English Society."— nitf Critic, 



The Popular Works of Johann Gottlieb Fichte. 

Post 8vo, cloth, 12s. i>er volume. 

Ck>ntents of Vol. I. :— 1. Memoir of the Author, by William Smith. 
2. The Vocation of the Scholar. 3. The Nature of the Scholar. 
4. The Vocation of Man. 

Contents of Vol. II. :— 1. The Characteristics of the Present Age. 
2. The Wat towards the Blessed Life; or, the Doctrine of Re- 
ligion. 

The Way towards the Blessed Life ] Wy The Boctrine of Beli^on. 

Translated by William Smith. Post 8vo, cloth. 

Characteristics of len of Genius 3 

A Series of Biographical, Historical, and Critical Essays, selected by pa*, 
mission, chiefly fh)m the North American Review, with Preface, by John 
Chapman. 2 vols, post 8vo. cloth, 12s. ; extra cloth, gilt edges. Us. 

CONTENTS. 

Gregory VTI., Loyola, Pascal. 

Dante, Petrarch, Shelley, Byron, Goethe, Wordswobth, 

Milton, Scott, The German Poets. 
Michael Angelo, Canova. 
Machiavelli, Louis IX., Peter the Great. 



I 



" Essavs of very high order, which literature of any country .*»- 

from their novelty, and their intrinsic tier Review. 

value, we are sure will receive from the ** Essays of great power and intenst. 

British public a reception common- In fi^edom of opinion, and oooa- 

surate with their merits They are sionally in catholidtv of judgment, the 

Easaya which would do honour to tVve writers are superior to our own periodi- 



John Chapman, 142, Strand. 



19 



THE CATHOLIC SERIES — Continued. 



cal essayists ; but we think there is less 
brilliancy and point in them ; though 
on that very account there is, perhaps, 
greater impartiality and justice." — 
Douglas Jerrold*s Magazine. 

**Kich as we are in this delightful 
department of Literature, we gladly 
accept another contribution to critical 

biography The American writers 

keep more closely to their text than onr 
own reviewers, and are less solicitous to 
construct a theory of their own, and 
thereby run the risk of discolouring the 
facts of history, than to take a calm 
and dispassionate survey of events and 
opinions." — Morning Chronicle. 

" Essays well worthy of an European 
Life." — Christian Reformer. 

** The collection before us is able and 
readable, with a good deal of interest 
in its subjects. They exhibit force, just- 
ness of remark, an acquaintance with 
their subject, beyond me mere book 
reviewed; much clear-headed pains- 
taking in the paper itself, where the 

The Worship of Genius | 



treatment requires pains, a larger and 
more liberal spirit than is often found 
in Transatlantic literature, and some- 
times a marked and forcible style." — 
Spectator. 

** A work that will be right welcome 
to all lovers of literature, and which 
ought to be ordered by every book- 
club."— CnTie. 

" There is hardly one of these papers 
that has not great merit." — In*/Hirer. 

" This is truly a delightful book. We 
heartily welcome it as worthy to take 
its stand bv the side of the • Contri- 
butions' of our own great reviewers. 
Each essay, having for its object the 
development of the characteristics of 
one mind, is complete in itself, and 
almost perfect in the elegance and 
beauty of its execution." — Nonconform. 

"The value, botli intrinsic and ex- 
trinsic, of these essavs justly claims for 
them a favourable reception and atten- 
tive perusal in England."— Afa/icfte^fer 
Examiner, 



Being an Examination of the Doctrine announced bjr D. F. Strauss, viz. 
** That to our A^e of Religious Disorganization nothing is left but a Worship 
of Genius ; that is, a Reverence lor those great Spirits who create Epochs in 
the Progrenss of the Human Race, and in whom, taken collectively, the God- 
like manifests itself to us most fUlIy," and thus having reference to the views 
unfolded in the work entitled, " Heroes and Hero-worship^* by Thomas Carlyle. 



AND 



The Bistinetiye Character or Essence of Christianity x 

An Essay relative to Modem Speculations and the present State of Opinion. 
Translated, from the German of Prof. C. Ullmann, by Lucy Sanford. 1 vol. 
post 8vo. 38. 6d. 

CONTENTS. 



1. General view of the object of the 

work. 

2. The different stages of development 

through which Christianity itself 
has passed. The same phases 
perceptible in the views which 
nave oe^i successively taken of it. 

3. Christianity as Doctrme. Under 

this head are comprised both 
Supematuralism and Natu- 
ralism. 

4. Christianitv as a Moral Law. The 

philosophy of Kant. Ration- 
alism. 

5. Christianity as the Religion of Re- 

demption. Schleiermacher's de- 
finition. 



6. The peculiar significance and in- 

fluence of Christ's individual 
character. 

7. The views of Hegel and his school. 

8. Christ as the exemj^Ufication of the 

union of the Divme and Human 
in one character. 

9. Iinportance of this truth for the de- 

finition of the distinctive Charac- 
ter of Christianity. 

10. Christianity as the rerfect Religion. 

1 1 . Inferences from the preceding. 

12. Retrospect and epitome of the 

argument. 

13. Application of the preceding to t^e 

idea of Faith. 

14. Application to the Church. 



*»* The above two works are comprised in one volume, post 8vo. Ss. <Sd. cloth. 



** There are many Just and beautiful 
conceptioiiB expressed and developed, 
and the mode of utterance and illustra- 
tion is mor* otear and limple than that 
adopted often by our German brethren 
in treating suob topic8."->^ofM»n/!>nnM<. 



" There is in it much important and 
original thouffht. Intelligent British 
Christians, who are inclined to take 
philosophical views of the Ghristian 
faith, will find much to delight and In- 
struot them."— JSdysttM Magatnises 



X 



20 



Wmrka published by 



THE CATHOLIC SERIES — {cOnttHUed.) 

Tke Life of Jean Paul Pr. Mchter. 

Ck>mpiled from various sonroes. Together with his Autobiography, 
ted from the German. 2 yoIs. paper cover, 7s. ; doth, 8s. 



TnmaU- 



IL 



** The autobiography of Richter, which 
extends onlv to his twelfth ^ear, is one 
of the most interesting studies of a true 
poet*8 childhood ever given to the 
world." — Lowers Edinbw^i Magazine. 

" Hichter has an intellect vehement, 
ru/rged, irresistible, crushing in pieces 
the haidest problems ; piercmg into Uie 
most hidden combinations of tilings, 
and grasping the most distant; an 
imagination vague, sombre, splendid, 
or appalling, broodmg over the abysses 
of bemg, wandering through infinitude, 
and summoning l^fore us, in its dim 
religious light, shapes of brilliancy, 
solemnity, or terror; a fancy of exu- 
berance literally unexampled, for it 
pours its treasures with a lavishness 
which knows no limit, hanging, like 
the sun, a jewel on every grass-blade, 
and sowing the earth at large with 
orient pearls. But deeper than all 
these lies humour, the ruling quality 
of RiCHTEK— as it were the central me 
that pervades and vivifies his whole 
being. He is a humorist from his in- 
most soul ; he thinks as a humorist ; he 
imagines, acts, feels as a humorist: 
sport is the element in which his 
nature lives and works."— Thomas 
Carlyle. 

" With such a writer it is no common 
treat to be intimately acquainted. In 
the proximitjr of great and virtuous 
min^ we imbibe a portion of their na- 
ture—feel, as mesmerists say, a health- 
ful contagion, are braced with the same 
Spirit of faith, hope, and patient en- 
urance -are fhmished with data for 
clearing up andworMng out the intri- 
cate problem of life, and are inspired, 
like them, with the prospect of immor- 
tality. No reader or sensibility can rise 
from the perusal of these volumes with- 
out becoming both wiser and better."— 
Atlas. 

"We find in the present biography | 
much that does not so much amuse j 
and instruct, as, to adopt a phrase from 
the religious world, positively edifies tlie I 
reader. The life of Richter is indeed \ 
a moral and a religious, as much as a 
literary treat, to allwlio have a sense 
exercised to discern religion and moral- 
ity as a thing essentially different from 
mere orthodoxy and asceticism. The 
two volumes before us cannot be se- 
riously read vrithout stimulating the 
reader, like a good sermon, to seli-ame- 
licnratiou, and in this respect they are 
invaluable. 

** Kichter is a thorough Christian, and 
a Cbnatitm with a large glowing human 



heart. The appearance of hia biography 
in an English form cannot, thererore, 
but be regarded as a great boon to tiie 
best interests of the ooontry.** — 7atf« 
Magaxine. 

" Apart from the interest of the work, 
as the life of Jean Paul, the reader 
learns something of G^erman life and 
German thought, and is introduced to 
Weimar during its most distingnithed 
period— when Goethe, Schiller, H^der, 
and Wieland, the great fixed stars of 
Germany, in ooi^junction with Jean 
Paul, were there, surrounded by bean- 
tifol and admiring women, of ttte most 
refined and exalted natures, and of 
princelv rank. It is Ml of passages so 
attractive and valuable that it is difll- 
cult to make a selection as examples of 
its character." — Jnfuirer. 

** This book will be found very valu- 
able as an introduction to the stndy of 
one of the most eccentric and difficult 
writers of Germany. Jean Paul's writ- 
ings are so much the reflex of Jean Paul 
himself, that every light that shines 
upon the one inevitably illumines the 
other. The work is a usefbl exhibition 
of a great and amiable man, who, pos- 
sessed of the kindliest feelines, and the 
most briUiant fantasy, turned to a high 
purpose that humour of whloh Babelais 
is the great grandfather, and Stenie one 
of the line of ancestors, and contrasted 
it with an exaltation of feeling and a 
rhapsodical poetry which are entirely 
his own. Let us hope that it will com- 
plete the work begun by Mr. Carlyle's 
Essays, and cause J can Paul to be really 
read in tliis countiy." — Examiner. 

** Richter is exhibited in a most ami- 
able light in this biography— industri- 
ous, fn^al, benevolent, with a child-like 
simplicity of character, and a heart 
overflowing with the purest love. His 
letters to tus wife are oeautifhl memo- 
rials of true affection, and the way in 
which he perpetually Eqpeaks of his chil- 
dren shows that he was the most at- 
tached and indulgent of fathers. Who* 
ever came within the sphere of his com- 
panionship appears to have contracted 
an affection for him that death only 
dissolved : and while his name was re- 
sounding through Germany, he re- 
mained as meek and humble as if he 
had still been an unknown adventurer 
on Parnassus."— 7%« Apprewtiee. 

" The life of Jean Paul is a ohaimhw 
piece of biography which draws aaa 
rivets the attention. The affections of 
the reader are fixed on the hero with an 
intensity rarely bestowed on an hit- 



John Cha/pman^ 142, Strand. 



21 



THE CATHOLIC SERIES — {continued,) 



torical character. It is impossible to 
read this biography without a convic- 
tion of its integrity' and truth; and 
though Ritcher's style is more difficult 
of translation than that of any other 



German, yet we feel that his golden 
thoughts haye reached us pure from the 
mine, to which he has given that impress 
of genius which makes them current in 
all countries." — Christum Rtformer. 



The lental History of an Inquiring Spirit. 

A Biography of Charles Elwood. By O. A. Bbownson. Post 8to. 4s. ploth ; 
3s. 6d. paper cover. 

We can cordially recommend the vo- 
lume, after a very careM perusal, to the 
layman who desires to tnink for him- 
self, and to the clergy, as eminently 
calculated to enlarge their views and 
increase their usenuness, by showing 
them the difference between sectarian- 
ism and Christianity."— S«i<»«c/. 

" The purposes, m this stage of his 
progress, wmch Mr. Brownson has in 
view are, the vindication of the reality of 
the rdigious principle in the nature of 
man ; the existence of an order of senti • 
ments higher than the calculations of 
the understanding and the deductions 
of logic ; the foundation of morals on 
the absolute idea of right in opposition 
to the popular doctrine of exj^iency ; 
the exposition of a spiritual philosophy ; 
and the connexion of Christianity with 
the progress of society. 

" The work presents the most profound 
ideas in a simple and attractive form. 
The discussion of these principles, 
which in their primitive abstraction are 
so repulsive to most minds, is carried 
on, through the medium of a slight fic- 
tion, with considerable dramatic effect. 
We become interested in the final 
opinions of the sutgects of the tale, as 
we do in the catastrophe of a romance. 
A slender thread of narrative is made 
to sustain the most weighty arguments 
on the philosophy of religion ; but the 
conduct both of the story and of the 
discussion is managed with so much 
skill, that they serve to relieve and for- 
ward each other."— 2)»a/. 



"This work is an attempt to pre- 
sent Christianity so that it shall satisfy 
the pliilosophic element of our nature. 
In this consists its peculiar merit and 
its distinctive characteristic. Such a 
book was certainly very much needed. 
We have no doubt that it will add many 
a doubter to a cheerfUl faith, and con- 
firm many a feeble mind in the faith it 
has already professed. Mr. Brownson 
addresses the philosophic element, and 
the men in whom this element is pre- 
dominant ; and, of course, he presents 
the arguments that would be the most 
striking and satisfactory to this cluss of 
men. In so far as he ha<t succeeded, he 
must be considered to have done a meri- 
torious work. We think Mr. Brownson 
eminently qualified for this task, and 
that his success is complete. The work 
will, doubtless, be the means of giving 
composure and serenity to the faith of 
many who are as yet weak in the faith, 
or halting between two opinions."- 
Christian Exmniner. 

•* In a series of chapters, Mr. Morton 
explains the nature of the Christian 
faith, and replies to the otdections 
raised by Elwood as the discussion pro- 
ceeds, and the argument we take to be 
conclusive, though of course every one 
may differ as to details. The mighty 
theme is handled in a most masterly 
style, and the reasoning may fairly be 
called 'mathematical.' There is nei- 
ther rant nor cant, hypothesis or dog- 
matism. Christianity is proved to be 
a * rational religious system,' and the 
priest is exhibited in his true character. 



Tlie Mission of the German Catholics. 

By Prof. G. G. Gervinus, Author of the " Geschichte der Poetischen 
National-Literatur der Deutschen." Post 8vo. Is. 4d. 

"The work well deserves an intro- 
duction to an English public. It con- 
tains the reflections of a German philo- 
sopher on tiie extraordinary religious 
movement which is now agitating his 
countrymen ; his anticipations, and his 
wishes respecting its resalts.**— /n^itifrtfr. 

In an artlole upon the Author's 
*' History of the Poetical Literature of 
the G^ermans,** the North American 



Review says:—" He exhibits tlie exten- 
sive and profound erudition, the his* 
torical faculty of bringing past and 
remote states of society near, and pro- 
jecting the present into the distance ; 
and the philosophical insight into the 
distinguishing features of Individuals, 
communities, and epochs, which so 
fayonrably characterize the recent his- 
toriography of the Germans.'* 



\. 



22 



Works published by 



THE CATHOLIC SERIES — {cOfltiflUed,) 

The Philosophical and Esthetic Letters and Essays of Schiller. 



by J. Weiss. Post Sva 7s. 6d. doth. 

I morally free, hence not responsible, as 
I there is no sphere for the operation of 
the will. 

" The stylein which the whole volume 
is written is particularly beantiAil, there 
is a consciousness of music in every page 
we read ; it it remarkable for the con- 
densation of thought and firm conast- 
eucy wliich prevails throughout; and. 
so far as we are able to Judee, the 
translation is admirably and faithf\illy 
rendered. The twenty-seven letters 
upon the * JSsthctic Culture of Man/ 
fonn the most prominent, and by far 
the most valuable, portion of the work ; 
they will be found ftill of interest and 
the choicest riches, which will abund- 
antly repay any amount of labour 
bestowed upon tliem." — Inquirer. 

" Tliis is a book wliich demands and 
deserves study. Either to translate or 
to appreciate it requires a somewhat 
peculiar turn of mind. Not that any 
body could read it without profit, but to 
gain from it all tliat it is capable oi 
yielding, there must be some aptitude 
for such studies, and some training in 

them too To bft appreciated 

it must be studied, and the study 
will be well repaid."— C%r«>^» Ex- 
amifwr. 

"Here we must close, unwillingly, 
this volume, so abounding in food for 
thought, so fruitful of nne passages, 
heartily commending it to all of our 
readers who desire to make acquaint- 
ance witli the philosoph;^ of art. The 
extracts we have taken will prove what 
a treasure is here, for they are but a 
fraction of the gems that are to be 
gutlicred in every page. We make no 
apology for having so long lingered over 
this book; for, albeit, phi^jsophy is 
somewhat out of fashion in our age of 
materialism, it yet will find its votaries, 
fit tliough few ; and even tliey who care 
not for the higher regions of reflection, 
cannot fail to reap infinite pleasure 
from tlic eloquent and truthful passages 
we have sought to cull for their ndD^Ied 
delight and edification." — Critic. 



Translated, with an Introduction, 

"These Letters stand unequalled in 
the department of Esthetics, and are so 
esteemed even in Germany, which is so 
fhiitful upon tliat topic. Schiller is 
Germany's best ^sthetioian, and these 
letters contain the highest moments of 
Schiller. Whether we desire rigorous 
logical investigation or noble poetic ex- 
pression, whether we wish to stimulate 
the intellect or inflame the heart, we 
need seek no ftuther than these. They 
are trophies won from an unpojiular, 
metaphysical form, by a lofty, inspiring, 
and absorbing subject." — Introduction. 

" It is not possible, in a brief notice 
like the present, to do more than inti- 
mate the kind of excellence of a book 
of this nature. It is a profound and 
beautiful dissertation, and must be dili- 
gently studied to be comprehended. 
After all tlie innumerable efforts t hat the 
present age has been some time making 
to cut a Royal road to everything, it w 
beginning to find that what sometimes 
seems the longest way round is the 
shortest way home ; and if there be a 
desire to have truth, the only way is to 
work at the \vindlass one's self, and 
bring up tlie buckets by the labour of 
one's ov^n good arm. Wlioever works 
at the present well, will find ample 
reward for the labour they may bestow 
on it ; the truths he will draw up arc 
universal, and from that pure elemen- 
tary fountain ' that maketh wise he tliat 
driuketh thereat.*" — Douglas Jerrold^s 
Magazine. 

"It is dilflcult, if not impossible^ to 
give a brief, and at the same time faith- 
ful, summary of the ideas affirmed by 
Schiller in this volume. Its aim is to 
develop the ideal of humanity, and to 
define the successive steps which must 
be trodden to attain it. Its spirit 
aspires after human improvment, and 
seeks to indicate the means of rciliza- 
tion. Scliiller insists upon the necessi- 
ty of aesthetic culture as preliminary to 
moral culture, and in order to make 
the latter possible. According to the 
doctrine here set forth, until man is 
aesthetically developed, he cannot be 

The Philosophy of Art. 

An Oration on the Relation of the Plastic Arts to Nature. Translated flrom 
the German of ¥. W. J. von Scuelling, by A. Jounson. Poet 8vo. Is. 
paper cover ; Is. 6d. cloth. 



// 



*< This excellent oration is an appli- 
cation to art of Schelling's general 
philosopliic principles. Scl idling takes 
the bola course, and declares that what 
18 ordinarily called nature is not the 
Bummit of perfection, but is on\y the 



inadequate manifestation of a high 

idea, which it is the office of nuin to 

penetrate. The true astronomer is not 

' he who notes down laws and causes 

I which were never revealed to sensnoos 

\ OT^aw*^ «iud wliicli are often opposed to 



John Chapman^ 142, Strand, 



23 



THE CATHOLIC SERIES — (continued.) 



the pnma facie inflaences of sensuous 
observers. The true artist is not he who 
merely imitates an isolated object in 
nature, but he who can penetrate into 
the unseen essence that lurks behind 
the visible crust, and afterwards re- 
produce it in a visible form. In the 
surrounding world means and ends are 
clashed and jarred together; in the 
work of art the heterog6n.-)us is ex- 
cluded, and an unity is attained not to 
be found elsewhere. Schelling, in his 
oration, chiefly, not exclusively, regards 
the arts of painting and sculpture; but 

Essays. By R. V. Emerson. 



his remarks will equally ai^ly to 
othets, such as poetry and music. This 
oration of Schelling's deserves an exten- 
sive perusal. The ti^nslation, with the 
exception of a few trifling inaccurrcies, 
is admirably done by Mr. Johnson; 
and we know of no work in our language 
better suited to give a notion of the turn 
Which German philosophy took after it 
abandoned the subjectivity of Kant and 
Fichte. The notion will, of course, be 
a faint one; but it is something to know 
the latitude and longitude of a mental 
position."— -Ba;'ai»i»eir. 



(Second Series.) 
3s. 6d. cloth. 



With a Notice by Thomas Carltle. 38. paper cover 



"Among the distinguishing features 
of Christianity— we are ready to say the 
distinguishing feature— is its humanity, 
its deep sympathy with human kind, 
and its strong advocacy of human wants 
and rights. In this particular, few 
have a oetter title to be ranked among 
the followers of Jesus than the author 
of this book." — American Christian Ex- 
aminer. 

" The difficulty we find in giving a 
proper notice of this volume, arises 
m)m tlie pervadingness of its excellence, 
and the compression of its matter. 
With more learning than Hazlitt, more 
perspicuity than Carlyle, more vigour 
and depth of thought than Addison, and 
with as much originality and fascination 
as any of them, this volume is a bril- 
liant addition to the Table Talk of in- 
tellectual men, be they wlio or where 
they may."— Pro«;pecftre Review. 

" Mr. Emerson is not a common man, 
and everything he writes contains sug- 
gestive matter of much thought and 
earnestness ." — Examiner. 

" That Emerson is, in a high degree, 
possessed of the faculty and vision of 
the «tfer, none can doubt who will ear- 
nestly and with a kind and reverential 
Spirit peruse these nine Essays. He 
eals only with the true and the eternal. 
His piercing gaze at once shoots swiftly, 
surely through the outward and the su- 
perficial, to the inmost causes and work- 
ings. Any one can tell the time wlio 
looks on the face of the clock, but he 
loves to lay bare the machinery and 
show its moving principle. His words 
and his thoughts are a firesh spring. 



that invigorates the soul that is steeped 
therein. His mind is ever dealing with 
the eternal ; and those who only five to 
exercise their lower intellectual facul- 
ties, and desire only new facts and new 
images, and those who have not a feel- 
ing or an interest in the ^at question 
of mind and matter, eternity and nature, 
will disregard him as unintelligible and 
uninteresting, as they do Bacon and 
Plato, and, indeed, philosophy itself."— 
Dotbglas Jerrold's Magazine. 
** Beyond social science, because be- 

J'^ond and outside social existence, there 
ies the science of self, the development 
of man in liis individual existence, 
within himself and for himself Of this 
latter science, which may perhaps be 
called the pliilosophy of individuality, 
Mr. Emerson is an able apostle and 
interpreter." — League. 

" As regards the particular volume of 
Emerson before us, we think it an im- 

?rovemeutupon the first series of essays, 
'he subjects are better chosen. ITiey 
come more home to the experience of 
the mass of makind, and are conse- 
quently more interesting. Their treat- 
ment also indicates an artistic improve- 
ment in the composition.*'— Spectotor. 

"All lovers of literature will read 
Mr. Emerson's new volume, as the 
most of them have read his former one ; 
and if correct taste, and sober views of 
life, and such ideas on the higher sub- 
jects of thought as we have been ac- 
customed to account as truths, are 
sometimes outrajged, we at least meet 
at every step with originality, imagi> 
nation, and eloquence." — In^rer. 



The Rationale of Religious Inquiry ] 

Or, the Question stated, of Reason, the Bible, and the Church. By James 
Martimeau. Third Edition, With a Critical Letter on Rationalism, Mira- 
cles, and the Authority of Scripture, by the late Rev. Joseph Blanco 
White. 4s. paper cover ; 4s. 6d. cloth. 






^ 



24 



Worki published by John Chapman, 



THE CATHOLIC SERIES — (cOnttflUedJ) 

The Roman dmrcli and lodern Society. 

By £. QuiNET» of the CkiUege of France. TnuislAted from the French Third 
Edition (with the Author's approbation), hy C. Cocks, B.L. 8to. 5s. cloth. 

'* This enlightened volume "— party, and has lately been conspicuous I 

m renstinff the pretensions of the Jesuit 
9iid Fren^ clergy to the exclusive edu- 
(Mltlon of the youth of France. He has 



// 



Chriftian Rgormer. 

" Considered as a whole, the book be- 
fore us is the most powerful and phflo- 
sophically consistent protest against 
the Roman Church which has ejrsr 
claimed our attention, and, as a strong 
confirmation of its stining effidency, 
we may mention that the excitement it 
has created in Paris has sol^leoted the 
author to a reprimand from both Cham- 
bers of the Legislature, and excommu- 
nication by the Pope." — Inquirer, 

'* K. Qumet belongs to the morement 

Sermons of Consolation. 

By F. W. P. Greenwood, D.D. 6s. cloth. 



gntppled with his theme both practi- 
«MUy, and in the philosophical spiiH of 

histoiry Bare merits are cominised 

in this Tolume a genuine spirit 

pervades it, and there are many pasa- 
ges of great depth, originality and elo- 
quence.*' — Atias. 

".... These eloquent and valuable 
lectures.**— N«to CJUavh Advocctte, 



will meet with a grateftd reception from 
all who seek instruction <ni the topics 
most interesting to a thoughtful mmd. 
There are twenty-seven sermons in the 
volume."— CArwfMm Examiner. 



" This is a really delightflil volume, 
which we would gladly see producing 
its puriMn^ and elevating influences in 
all our fanmies." — Inquirer. 

" This beautiful volume we are sure 

Self-Cnltnre. 

By William Ellebt Changing. 6d. paper cover ; Is. cloth. 

Christianity^ or Europe. 

Translated from the Crerman of Novalis (Friedrich von Hardenberg), by 
the Kev. J. Dalton. 6d. paper cover. 

The Critical and liseellaneons Writings of Theodore Parker. 

Post 8vo, cloth, 6s. 

" It will be seen fh)m these extracts 
that Theodore Parker is a writer of 
considerable power and freshness, if not 
oriprinalitv. Of the school of Carlyle, or 
rathertaking the same Grerman originals 
for his models, Parker has a more sober 
style and a less theatric taste. His 
composition wants the grotesque anima- 
mation and richness of Carlyle, but it is 
vivid, strong, and frequently pictur- 
esque, with a tenderness that tlie 
great Scotchman does not possess."— 
Spectator. 

" Viewing him as a most usefhl, as 
well as highly gifted man, we cordial I v 
welcome the appearance of an En^lisn 
reprint of some of his best -productions. 
The * Miscellaneous' Pieces are charac- 
terised by his peculiar eloquence, which 
is without a parallel in the works of 



English writers. His language is 
ahnost entirely figurative ; the glories of 
nature are pressM into his service, and 
convey his most careless thought. This 
is the principal charm of his writings; 
his eloquence is altogether unlike that 
of the English orator or essayist; it 
partakes of the grandeur of the forests 
in his native land; and we seem, when 
listening to his speech, to hear the 
music of the woods, the rustling of the 
pine-trees, and the ringing of the wood- 
man's axe. In this respect he resem- 
bles Emerson; but, unlike that cele- 
brated man, he never discourses audi- 
blywith himself, in a language unknown 
to the world— he is never obscure ; the 
stream, though deep, reveals the glit- 
tering gems which cluster so thickly on 
its bed. — Inquirer. 



